1164
Artificial_intelligence
File:TOPIO 3.0.jpg|350px|thumb|TOPIO, a robot, played tennis at Tokyo Robot Exhibition (IREX) 2009.(Artificial intelligence (AI) is the intelligence of machines and the branch of science that aims to create it. AI textbooks define the field as the study and design of intelligent agents( where an agent is a system that perceives its environment and takes actions that maximize its chances of success.( John McCarthy, who coined the term in 1956,( defines it as the science and engineering of making intelligent machines.(The field was founded on the claim that a central property of humans, intelligencethe sapience of sapienscan be so precisely described that it can be simulated by a machine.(See the Dartmouth proposal, under Philosophy, below.) This raises philosophical issues about the nature of the mind and the ethics of creating artificial beings, issues which have been addressed by myth, fiction and philosophy since antiquity.( Artificial intelligence has been the subject of optimism,(The optimism referred to includes the predictions of early AI researchers (see optimism in the history of AI) as well as the ideas of modern transhumanists such as Kurzweil.) but has also suffered setbacks(The setbacks referred to include the ALPAC report of 1966, the abandonment of perceptrons in 1970, the Lighthill Report of 1973 and the collapse of the lisp machine market in 1987.) and, today, has become an essential part of the technology industry, providing the heavy lifting for many of the most difficult problems in computer science.(AI research is highly technical and specialized, and deeply divided into subfields that often fail to communicate with each other.( Subfields have grown up around particular institutions, the work of individual researchers, the solution of specific problems, longstanding differences of opinion about how AI should be done and the application of widely differing tools. The central problems of AI include such traits as reasoning, knowledge, planning, learning, communication, perception and the ability to move and manipulate objects.( General intelligence (or AI) is still among the fields long term goals.( HistoryThinking machines and artificial beings appear in myths, such as Talos of Crete, the bronze robot of Hephaestus, and Pygmalions Galatea.( Human likenesses believed to have intelligence were built in every major civilization: animated images were worshipped in Egypt and Greece( and humanoid automatons were built by Yan Shi, of Alexandria and Al-Jazari.( It was also widely believed that artificial beings had been created by ibn Hayyn, Loew and Paracelsus.( By the 19th and 20th centuries, artificial beings had become a common feature in fiction, as in Shelleys Frankenstein or apeks (Rossums Universal Robots).( McCorduck argues that all of these are examples of an ancient urge, as she describes it, to forge the gods.( Stories of these creatures and their fates discuss many of the same hopes, fears and ethical concerns that are presented by artificial intelligence.Mechanical or formal reasoning has been developed by philosophers and mathematicians since antiquity. The study of logic led directly to the invention of the programmable digital electronic computer, based on the work of mathematician Turing and others. Turings of computation suggested that a machine, by shuffling symbols as simple as 0 and 1, could simulate any conceivable act of mathematical deduction.(This insight, that digital computers can simulate any process of formal reasoning, is known as the thesis.)( This, along with concurrent discoveries in neurology, theory and cybernetics, inspired a small group of researchers to begin to seriously consider the possibility of building an electronic brain.(The field of AI research was founded at a conference on the campus of College in the summer of 1956.( The attendees, including John McCarthy, Minsky, Newell and Simon, became the leaders of AI research for many decades.( They and their students wrote programs that were, to most people, simply astonishing:(Russell and Norvig write it was astonishing whenever a computer did anything kind of smartish. ) computers were solving word problems in algebra, proving logical theorems and speaking English.( By the middle of the 1960s, research in the U.S. was heavily funded by the Department of Defense( and laboratories had been established around the world.( AIs founders were profoundly optimistic about the future of the new field: Simon predicted that machines will be capable, within twenty years, of doing any work a man can do and Minsky agreed, writing that within a generation ... the problem of creating artificial intelligence will substantially be solved.(They had failed to recognize the difficulty of some of the problems they faced.(See ) In 1974, in response to the criticism of James Lighthill and ongoing pressure from the US Congress to fund more productive projects, both the U.S. and British governments cut off all undirected exploratory research in AI. The next few years, when funding for projects was hard to find, would later be called the winter.(In the early 1980s, AI research was revived by the commercial success of systems,( a form of AI program that simulated the knowledge and analytical skills of one or more human experts. By 1985 the market for AI had reached over a billion dollars. At the same time, Japans generation computer project inspired the U.S and British governments to restore funding for academic research in the field.( However, beginning with the collapse of the Machine market in 1987, AI once again fell into disrepute, and a second, longer lasting winter began.(In the 1990s and early 21st century, AI achieved its greatest successes, albeit somewhat behind the scenes. Artificial intelligence is used for logistics, mining, diagnosis and many other areas throughout the technology industry.(The success was due to several factors: the increasing computational power of computers (see law), a greater emphasis on solving specific subproblems, the creation of new ties between AI and other fields working on similar problems, and a new commitment by researchers to solid mathematical methods and rigorous scientific standards.(On 11 May 1997, Deep Blue became the first computer chess-playing system to beat a reigning world chess champion, Kasparov.() In 2005, a Stanford robot won the Grand Challenge by driving autonomously for 131 miles along an unrehearsed desert trail.(DARPA Grand Challenge  home page)In February 2011, in a Jeopardy! show exhibition match, IBMs answering system, Watson, defeated the two greatest Jeopardy! champions, Rutter and Jennings, by a significant margin.()The leading-edge definition of artificial intelligence research is changing over time. One pragmatic definition is: AI research is that which computing scientists do not know how to do cost-effectively today. For example, in 1956 character recognition (OCR) was considered AI, but today, sophisticated OCR software with a context-sensitive checker and checker software comes for free with most scanners. No one would any longer consider already-solved computing science problems like OCR artificial intelligence today.Low-cost entertaining chess-playing software is commonly available for tablet computers. DARPA no longer provides significant funding for chess-playing computing system development. The Kinect which provides a 3D bodymotion interface for the 360 uses algorithms that emerged from lengthy AI research,(Kinects AI breakthrough explained) but few consumers realize the technology source.AI applications are no longer the exclusive domain of of defense R&D, but are now common place consumer items and inexpensive intelligent toys.In common usage, the term AI no longer seems to apply to off-the-shelf solved computing-science problems, which may have originally emerged out of years of AI research. Problems Can a machine act intelligently? is still an problem. Taking A machine can act intelligently as a hypothesis, many researchers have attempted to build such a machine.The general problem of simulating (or creating) intelligence has been broken down into a number of specific sub-problems. These consist of particular traits or capabilities that researchers would like an intelligent system to display. The traits described below have received the most attention.(Deduction, reasoning, problem solving Early AI researchers developed algorithms that imitated the step-by-step reasoning that humans use when they solve puzzles or make logical deductions.( By the late 1980s and 90s, AI research had also developed highly successful methods for dealing with uncertain or incomplete information, employing concepts from probability and economics.(For difficult problems, most of these algorithms can require enormous computational resources  most experience a explosion: the amount of memory or computer time required becomes astronomical when the problem goes beyond a certain size. The search for more efficient problem solving algorithms is a high priority for AI research.(Human beings solve most of their problems using fast, intuitive judgments rather than the conscious, step-by-step deduction that early AI research was able to model.( AI has made some progress at imitating this kind of sub-symbolic problem solving: agent approaches emphasize the importance of sensorimotor skills to higher reasoning; net research attempts to simulate the structures inside human and animal brains that give rise to this skill.Knowledge representationright|thumb|An ontology represents knowledge as a set of concepts within a domain and the relationships between those concepts.representation( and engineering( are central to AI research. Many of the problems machines are expected to solve will require extensive knowledge about the world. Among the things that AI needs to represent are: objects, properties, categories and relations between objects;( situations, events, states and time;( causes and effects;( knowledge about knowledge (what we know about what other people know);( and many other, less well researched domains. A representation of what exists is an ontology (borrowing a word from traditional philosophy), of which the most general are called upper ontologies.(Among the most difficult problems in knowledge representation are:;reasoning and the problem: Many of the things people know take the form of working assumptions. For example, if a bird comes up in conversation, people typically picture an animal that is fist sized, sings, and flies. None of these things are true about all birds. John McCarthy identified this problem in 1969( as the qualification problem: for any commonsense rule that AI researchers care to represent, there tend to be a huge number of exceptions. Almost nothing is simply true or false in the way that abstract logic requires. AI research has explored a number of solutions to this problem.(;The breadth of knowledge: The number of atomic facts that the average person knows is astronomical. Research projects that attempt to build a complete knowledge base of knowledge (e.g., Cyc) require enormous amounts of laborious ontological engineering  they must be built, by hand, one complicated concept at a time.( A major goal is to have the computer understand enough concepts to be able to learn by reading from sources like the internet, and thus be able to add to its own ontology.;The subsymbolic form of some knowledge: Much of what people know is not represented as facts or statements that they could express verbally. For example, a chess master will avoid a particular chess position because it feels too exposed() or an art critic can take one look at a statue and instantly realize that it is a fake.() These are intuitions or tendencies that are represented in the brain non-consciously and sub-symbolically.( Knowledge like this informs, supports and provides a context for symbolic, conscious knowledge. As with the related problem of sub-symbolic reasoning, it is hoped that situated AI or intelligence will provide ways to represent this kind of knowledge.(PlanningImage:Hierarchical-control-system.svg|thumb| A control system is a form of system in which a set of devices and governing software is arranged in a hierarchy.Intelligent agents must be able to set goals and achieve them.( They need a way to visualize the future (they must have a representation of the state of the world and be able to make predictions about how their actions will change it) and be able to make choices that maximize the utility (or value) of the available choices.(In classical planning problems, the agent can assume that it is the only thing acting on the world and it can be certain what the consequences of its actions may be.( However, if this is not true, it must periodically check if the world matches its predictions and it must change its plan as this becomes necessary, requiring the agent to reason under uncertainty.(planning uses the cooperation and competition of many agents to achieve a given goal. behavior such as this is used by algorithms and intelligence.(Learninglearning( has been central to AI research from the beginning.(Turing discussed the centrality of learning as early as 1950, in his classic paper Machinery and Intelligence. ) In 1956, at the original Dartmouth AI summer conference, Solomonoff wrote a report on unsupervised probabilistic machine learning: An Inductive Inference Machine.((pdf scanned copy of the original) (version published in 1957, An Inductive Inference Machine, IRE Convention Record, Section on Information Theory, Part 2, pp. 56-62))learning is the ability to find patterns in a stream of input. learning includes both classification and numerical regression. Classification is used to determine what category something belongs in, after seeing a number of examples of things from several categories. Regression takes a set of numerical input/output examples and attempts to discover a continuous function that would generate the outputs from the inputs. In learning( the agent is rewarded for good responses and punished for bad ones. These can be analyzed in terms of theory, using concepts like utility. The mathematical analysis of machine learning algorithms and their performance is a branch of computer science known as learning theory.(Natural language processingFile:ParseTree.svg|thumb| A tree represents the syntactic structure of a sentence according to some grammar.language processing( gives machines the ability to read and understand the languages that humans speak. Many researchers hope that a sufficiently powerful natural language processing system would be able to acquire knowledge on its own, by reading the existing text available over the internet. Some straightforward applications of natural language processing include retrieval (or mining) and translation.(Motion and manipulationThe field of robotics( is closely related to AI. Intelligence is required for robots to be able to handle such tasks as object manipulation( and navigation, with sub-problems of localization (knowing where you are), mapping (learning what is around you) and planning (figuring out how to get there).(Perceptionperception( is the ability to use input from sensors (such as cameras, microphones, sonar and others more exotic) to deduce aspects of the world. vision( is the ability to analyze visual input. A few selected subproblems are recognition,( facial recognition and recognition.(Social intelligencerobot at MIT Museum.jpg|thumb|Kismet, a robot with rudimentary social skillsEmotion and social skills( play two roles for an intelligent agent. First, it must be able to predict the actions of others, by understanding their motives and emotional states. (This involves elements of theory, theory, as well as the ability to model human emotions and the perceptual skills to detect emotions.) Also, for good interaction, an intelligent machine also needs to display emotions. At the very least it must appear polite and sensitive to the humans it interacts with. At best, it should have normal emotions itself.CreativityA sub-field of AI addresses creativity both theoretically (from a philosophical and psychological perspective) and practically (via specific implementations of systems that generate outputs that can be considered creative, or systems that identify and assess creativity). A related area of computational research is Intuition and Imagination.General intelligenceMost researchers hope that their work will eventually be incorporated into a machine with general intelligence (known as AI), combining all the skills above and exceeding human abilities at most or all of them.( A few believe that anthropomorphic features like consciousness or an brain may be required for such a project.((Many of the problems above are considered AI-complete: to solve one problem, you must solve them all. For example, even a straightforward, specific task like translation requires that the machine follow the authors argument (reason), know what is being talked about (knowledge), and faithfully reproduce the authors intention (social intelligence). translation, therefore, is believed to be AI-complete: it may require AI to be done as well as humans can do it.( Approaches There is no established unifying theory or paradigm that guides AI research. Researchers disagree about many issues.(Nils Nilsson writes: Simply put, there is wide disagreement in the field about what AI is all about .) A few of the most long standing questions that have remained unanswered are these: should artificial intelligence simulate natural intelligence by studying psychology or neurology? Or is human biology as irrelevant to AI research as bird biology is to engineering?(Can intelligent behavior be described using simple, elegant principles (such as logic or optimization)? Or does it necessarily require solving a large number of completely unrelated problems?(Can intelligence be reproduced using high-level symbols, similar to words and ideas? Or does it require sub-symbolic processing?(John Haugeland, who coined the term GOFAI (Good Old-Fashioned Artificial Intelligence), also proposed that AI should more properly be referred to as intelligence, a term which has since been adopted by some non-GOFAI researchers.http://citeseerx.ist.psu.edu/viewdoc/download?doi10.1.1.38.8384&reprep1&typepdfhttp://books.google.com/books?hlen&lr&ida_ZR81Z25z0C&oifnd&pgPA63&dqrelated:iCpuTpmGk6gJ:scholar.google.com/&otsn1-TsvqXGJ&sig1xthOJ2WQmKtdSt7ISFH2yu2l3Q#vonepage&q&ffalsehttp://www.imagination-engines.com/ Cybernetics and brain simulation is currently no consensus on how closely the brain should be simulated.In the 1940s and 1950s, a number of researchers explored the connection between neurology, theory, and cybernetics. Some of them built machines that used electronic networks to exhibit rudimentary intelligence, such as Grey Walters turtles and the Hopkins Beast. Many of these researchers gathered for meetings of the Teleological Society at University and the Club in England.( By 1960, this approach was largely abandoned, although elements of it would be revived in the 1980s. Symbolic When access to digital computers became possible in the middle 1950s, AI research began to explore the possibility that human intelligence could be reduced to symbol manipulation. The research was centered in three institutions: CMU, Stanford and MIT, and each one developed its own style of research. Haugeland named these approaches to AI good old fashioned AI or GOFAI.(; Cognitive simulation: Economist Simon and Newell studied human problem solving skills and attempted to formalize them, and their work laid the foundations of the field of artificial intelligence, as well as science, research and science. Their research team used the results of  psychological experiments to develop programs that simulated the techniques that people used to solve problems. This tradition, centered at Mellon University would eventually culminate in the development of the Soar architecture in the middle 80s.((; Logic-based: Unlike Newell and Simon, John McCarthy felt that machines did not need to simulate human thought, but should instead try to find the essence of abstract reasoning and problem solving, regardless of whether people used the same algorithms.( His laboratory at Stanford (SAIL) focused on using formal logic to solve a wide variety of problems, including representation, planning and learning.( Logic was also focus of the work at the of Edinburgh and elsewhere in Europe which led to the development of the programming language Prolog and the science of programming.(; Anti-logic or scruffy: Researchers at MIT (such as Minsky and Papert)( found that solving difficult problems in vision and language processing required ad-hoc solutions  they argued that there was no simple and general principle (like logic) that would capture all the aspects of intelligent behavior. Schank described their anti-logic approaches as scruffy (as opposed to the neat paradigms at CMU and Stanford).( knowledge bases (such as Lenats Cyc) are an example of scruffy AI, since they must be built by hand, one complicated concept at a time.(; Knowledge-based: When computers with large memories became available around 1970, researchers from all three traditions began to build knowledge into AI applications.( This knowledge revolution led to the development and deployment of systems (introduced by Feigenbaum), the first truly successful form of AI software.( The knowledge revolution was also driven by the realization that enormous amounts of knowledge would be required by many simple AI applications. Sub-symbolic During the 1960s, symbolic approaches had achieved great success at simulating high-level thinking in small demonstration programs. Approaches based on cybernetics or networks were abandoned or pushed into the background.(The most dramatic case of sub-symbolic AI being pushed into the background was the devastating critique of perceptrons by Minsky and Papert in 1969. See of AI, winter, or Rosenblatt.) By the 1980s, however, progress in symbolic AI seemed to stall and many believed that symbolic systems would never be able to imitate all the processes of human cognition, especially perception, robotics, learning and recognition. A number of researchers began to look into sub-symbolic approaches to specific AI problems.(; Bottom-up, embodied, situated, behavior-based or AI: Researchers from the related field of robotics, such as Brooks, rejected symbolic AI and focused on the basic engineering problems that would allow robots to move and survive.( Their work revived the non-symbolic viewpoint of the early cybernetics researchers of the 50s and reintroduced the use of theory in AI. This coincided with the development of the mind thesis in the related field of science: the idea that aspects of the body (such as  movement, perception and visualization) are required for higher intelligence.; Computational Intelligence: Interest in networks and connectionism was revived by Rumelhart and others in the middle 1980s.( These and other sub-symbolic approaches, such as systems and computation, are now studied collectively by the emerging discipline of intelligence.(StatisticalIn the 1990s, AI researchers developed sophisticated mathematical tools to solve specific subproblems. These tools are truly scientific, in the sense that their results are both measurable and verifiable, and they have been responsible for many of AIs recent successes. The shared mathematical language has also permitted a high level of collaboration with more established fields (like mathematics, economics or research). Stuart Russell and Norvig describe this movement as nothing less than a revolution and the victory of the neats.( Critiques argue that these techniques are too focussed on particular problems and have failed to address the long term goal of general intelligence. Integrating the approaches ;Intelligent agent paradigm: An agent is a system that perceives its environment and takes actions which maximize its chances of success. The simplest intelligent agents are programs that solve specific problems. More complicated agents include human beings and organizations of human beings (such as firms). The paradigm gives researchers license to study isolated problems and find solutions that are both verifiable and useful, without agreeing on one single approach. An agent that solves a specific problem can use any approach that works  some agents are symbolic and logical, some are sub-symbolic networks and others may use new approaches. The paradigm also gives researchers a common language to communicate with other fieldssuch as theory and economicsthat also use concepts of abstract agents. The intelligent agent paradigm became widely accepted during the 1990s.(;architectures and architectures: Researchers have designed systems to build intelligent systems out of interacting agents in a system.( A system with both symbolic and sub-symbolic components is a intelligent system, and the study of such systems is intelligence systems integration. A control system provides a bridge between sub-symbolic AI at its lowest, reactive levels and traditional symbolic AI at its highest levels, where relaxed time constraints permit planning and world modelling.( Brooks architecture was an early proposal for such a hierarchical system.( Tools In the course of 50 years of research, AI has developed a large number of tools to solve the most difficult problems in science. A few of the most general of these methods are discussed below. Search and optimization Many problems in AI can be solved in theory by intelligently searching through many possible solutions:( Reasoning can be reduced to performing a search. For example, logical proof can be viewed as searching for a path that leads from premises to conclusions, where each step is the application of an rule.( Planning algorithms search through trees of goals and subgoals, attempting to find a path to a target goal, a process called analysis.( Robotics algorithms for moving limbs and grasping objects use local searches in space.( Many learning algorithms use search algorithms based on optimization.Simple exhaustive searches( are rarely sufficient for most real world problems: the search space (the number of places to search) quickly grows to astronomical numbers. The result is a search that is too slow or never completes. The solution, for many problems, is to use heuristics or rules of thumb that eliminate choices that are unlikely to lead to the goal (called pruning the tree). Heuristics supply the program with a best guess for the path on which the solution lies.(A very different kind of search came to prominence in the 1990s, based on the mathematical theory of optimization. For many problems, it is possible to begin the search with some form of a guess and then refine the guess incrementally until no more refinements can be made. These algorithms can be visualized as blind climbing: we begin the search at a random point on the landscape, and then, by jumps or steps, we keep moving our guess uphill, until we reach the top. Other optimization algorithms are annealing, search and optimization.(computation uses a form of optimization search. For example, they may begin with a population of organisms (the guesses) and then allow them to mutate and recombine, selecting only the fittest to survive each generation (refining the guesses). Forms of computation include intelligence algorithms (such as ant colony or swarm optimization)( and algorithms (such as algorithms and programming).( Logic Logic( is used for knowledge representation and problem solving, but it can be applied to other problems as well. For example, the satplan algorithm uses logic for planning( and logic programming is a method for learning.(Several different forms of logic are used in AI research. Propositional or logic( is the logic of statements which can be true or false. logic( also allows the use of quantifiers and predicates, and can express facts about objects, their properties, and their relations with each other. logic,( is a version of first-order logic which allows the truth of a statement to be represented as a value between 0 and 1, rather than simply True (1) or False (0). systems can be used for uncertain reasoning and have been widely used in modern industrial and consumer product control systems. logic( models uncertainty in a different and more explicit manner than fuzzy-logic: a given binomial opinion satisfies belief + disbelief + uncertainty  1 within a distribution. By this method, ignorance can be distinguished from probabilistic statements that an agent makes with high confidence.logics, logics and circumscription( are forms of logic designed to help with default reasoning and the problem. Several extensions of logic have been designed to handle specific domains of knowledge, such as: logics;( calculus, calculus and calculus (for representing events and time);( causal calculus;( belief calculus; and logics.(Probabilistic methods for uncertain reasoningMany problems in AI (in reasoning, planning, learning, perception and robotics) require the agent to operate with incomplete or uncertain information. AI researchers have devised a number of powerful tools to solve these problems using methods from probability theory and economics.(networks( are a very general tool that can be used for a large number of problems: reasoning (using the inference algorithm),( learning (using the algorithm),( planning (using networks)( and perception (using Bayesian networks).( Probabilistic algorithms can also be used for filtering, prediction, smoothing and finding explanations for streams of data, helping perception systems to analyze processes that occur over time (e.g., Markov models or filters).(A key concept from the science of economics is utility: a measure of how valuable something is to an intelligent agent. Precise mathematical tools have been developed that analyze how an agent can make choices and plan, using theory, analysis,( information value theory.( These tools include models such as decision processes,( dynamic networks,( theory and design.( Classifiers and statistical learning methods The simplest AI applications can be divided into two types: classifiers (if shiny then diamond) and controllers (if shiny then pick up). Controllers do however also classify conditions before inferring actions, and therefore classification forms a central part of many AI systems. Classifiers are functions that use matching to determine a closest match. They can be tuned according to examples, making them very attractive for use in AI. These examples are known as observations or patterns. In supervised learning, each pattern belongs to a certain predefined class. A class can be seen as a decision that has to be made. All the observations combined with their class labels are known as a data set. When a new observation is received, that observation is classified based on previous experience.(A classifier can be trained in various ways; there are many statistical and learning approaches. The most widely used classifiers are the neural network,(methods such as the vector machine,(neighbor algorithm,(mixture model,(Bayes classifier,(and decision tree.(The performance of these classifiers have been compared over a wide range of tasks. Classifier performance depends greatly on the characteristics of the data to be classified. There is no single classifier that works best on all given problems; this is also referred to as the no free lunch theorem. Determining a suitable classifier for a given problem is still more an art than science.( Neural networks File:Artificial neural network.svg|thumb|A neural network is an interconnected group of nodes, akin to the vast network of neurons in the brain.The study of neural networks( began in the decade before the field AI research was founded, in the work of Pitts and McCullough. Other important early researchers were Rosenblatt, who invented the perceptron and Werbos who developed the backpropagation algorithm.(The main categories of networks are acyclic or neural networks (where the signal passes in only one direction) and neural networks (which allow feedback). Among the most popular feedforward networks are perceptrons, perceptrons and basis networks.( Among recurrent networks, the most famous is the net, a form of attractor network, which was first described by Hopfield in 1982.( Neural networks can be applied to the problem of control (for robotics) or learning, using such techniques as learning and learning.(temporal memory is an approach that models some of the structural and algorithmic properties of the neocortex.( Control theory theory, the grandchild of cybernetics, has many important applications, especially in robotics.( Languages AI researchers have developed several specialized languages for AI research, including Lisp( and Prolog.(Evaluating progress In 1950, Alan Turing proposed a general procedure to test the intelligence of an agent now known as the test. This procedure allows almost all the major problems of artificial intelligence to be tested. However, it is a very difficult challenge and at present all agents fail.(Artificial intelligence can also be evaluated on specific problems such as small problems in chemistry, hand-writing recognition and game-playing. Such tests have been termed matter expert Turing tests. Smaller problems provide more achievable goals and there are an ever-increasing number of positive results.(The broad classes of outcome for an AI test are: (1) Optimal: it is not possible to perform better. (2) Strong super-human: performs better than all humans. (3) Super-human: performs better than most humans. (4) Sub-human: performs worse than most humans. For example, performance at draughts is optimal,( performance at chess is super-human and nearing strong super-human (see chess#Computers versus humans) and performance at many everyday tasks (such as recognizing a face or crossing a room without bumping into something) is sub-human.A quite different approach measures machine intelligence through tests which are developed from mathematical definitions of intelligence. Examples of these kinds of tests start in the late nineties devising intelligence tests using notions from complexity and compression.( Two major advantages of mathematical definitions are their applicability to nonhuman intelligences and their absence of a requirement for human testers. Applications File:Automated online assistant.png|thumb|An online assistant providing customer service on a web page - one of many applications of artificial intelligence.Artificial intelligence techniques are pervasive and are too numerous to list.  Frequently, when a technique reaches mainstream use, it is no longer considered artificial intelligence; this phenomenon is described as the effect.() Competitions and prizes There are a number of competitions and prizes to promote research in artificial intelligence. The main areas promoted are: general machine intelligence, conversational behavior, data-mining, driverless cars, robot soccer and games. Platforms A platform (or platform) is defined as some sort of hardware architecture or software framework (including application frameworks), that allows software to run. As Rodney Brooks(Brooks, R.A., How to build complete creatures rather than isolated cognitive simulators, in K. VanLehn (ed.), Architectures for Intelligence, pp. 225239, Lawrence Erlbaum Associates, Hillsdale, NJ, 1991.) pointed out many years ago, it is not just the artificial intelligence software that defines the AI features of the platform, but rather the actual platform itself that affects the AI that results, i.e., we need to be working out AI problems on real-world platforms rather than in isolation.A wide variety of platforms has allowed different aspects of AI to develop, ranging from systems, albeit PC-based but still an entire real-world system, to various robot platforms such as the widely available Roomba with open interface.(Hacking Roomba  Search Results  atmel) Philosophy Artificial intelligence, by claiming to be able to recreate the capabilities of the human mind, is both a challenge and an inspiration for philosophy. Are there limits to how intelligent machines can be? Is there an essential difference between human intelligence and artificial intelligence? Can a machine have a mind and consciousness? A few of the most influential answers to these questions are given below.(;Turings polite convention: If a machine acts as intelligently as a human being, then it is as intelligent as a human being. Turing theorized that, ultimately, we can only judge the intelligence of a machine based on its behavior. This theory forms the basis of the test.(;The Dartmouth proposal: Every aspect of learning or any other feature of intelligence can be so precisely described that a machine can be made to simulate it. This conjecture was printed in the proposal for the Dartmouth Conference of 1956, and represents the position of most working AI researchers.(; Newell and Simons physical symbol system hypothesis: A physical symbol system has the necessary and sufficient means of general intelligent action. Newell and Simon argue that intelligences consists of formal operations on symbols.( Dreyfus argued that, on the contrary, human expertise depends on unconscious instinct rather than conscious symbol manipulation and on having a feel for the situation rather than explicit symbolic knowledge. (See critique of AI.)(Dreyfus criticized the necessary condition of the symbol system hypothesis, which he called the psychological assumption: The mind can be viewed as a device operating on bits of information according to formal rules. )(; incompleteness theorem: A system (such as a computer program) can not prove all true statements.(This is a paraphrase of the relevant implication of Gdels theorems.) Penrose is among those who claim that Gdels theorem limits what machines can do. (See Emperors New Mind.)(; Searles strong AI hypothesis: The appropriately programmed computer with the right inputs and outputs would thereby have a mind in exactly the same sense human beings have minds.( John Searle counters this assertion with his room argument, which asks us to look inside the computer and try to find where the mind might be.(; The brain argument: The brain can be simulated. Moravec, Kurzweil and others have argued that it is technologically feasible to copy the brain directly into hardware and software, and that such a simulation will be essentially identical to the original.( Predictions Artificial Intelligence is a common topic in both fiction and projections about the future of technology and society. The existence of an artificial intelligence that rivals human intelligence raises difficult ethical issues, and the potential power of the technology inspires both hopes and fears.In fiction, Artificial Intelligence has appeared fulfilling many roles, includinga servant (R2D2 in Wars),a law enforcer (K.I.T.T. Knight Rider),a comrade (Lt. Commander Data in Trek: The Next Generation),a conqueror/overlord (Matrix),a dictator (Folded Hands),a benevolent provider/de facto ruler (Culture),an assassin (Terminator),a sentient race (Battlestar Galactica/Transformers),an extension to human abilities (in the Shell)and the savior of the human race (Daneel Olivaw in the Robot Series).Shelleys Frankenstein considers a key issue in the of artificial intelligence: if a machine can be created that has intelligence, could it also feel? If it can feel, does it have the same rights as a human? The idea also appears in modern fiction, including the films I Robot, Runner and Artificial Intelligence, in which humanoid machines have the ability to feel human emotions. This issue, now known as rights, is currently being considered by, for example, Californias for the Future, although many critics believe that the discussion is premature.( The subject is profoundly discussed in the 2010 documentary film & Pray.(http://www.plugandpray-film.de/en/content.html Independent documentary Plug & Pray, featuring Joseph Weizenbaum and Raymond Kurzweil)Martin Ford, author of The Lights in the Tunnel: Automation, Accelerating Technology and the Economy of the Future,() and others argue that specialized artificial intelligence applications, robotics and other forms of automation will ultimately result in significant unemployment as machines begin to match and exceed the capability of workers to perform most routine and repetitive jobs. Ford predicts that many knowledge-based occupationsand in particular entry level jobswill be increasingly susceptible to automation via expert systems, machine learning(Machine Learning: A Job Killer?) and other AI-enhanced applications. AI-based applications may also be used to amplify the capabilities of low-wage offshore workers, making it more feasible to outsource knowledge work.(Weizenbaum wrote that AI applications can not, by definition, successfully simulate genuine human empathy and that the use of AI technology in fields such as service or psychotherapy(In the early 70s, Colby presented a version of Weizenbaums ELIZA known as DOCTOR which he promoted as a serious therapeutic tool. ) was deeply misguided. Weizenbaum was also bothered that AI researchers (and some philosophers) were willing to view the human mind as nothing more than a computer program (a position now known as computationalism). To Weizenbaum these points suggest that AI research devalues human life.(Many futurists believe that artificial intelligence will ultimately transcend the limits of progress. Kurzweil has used law (which describes the relentless exponential improvement in digital technology) to calculate that computers will have the same processing power as human brains by the year 2029. He also predicts that by 2045 artificial intelligence will reach a point where it is able to improve itself at a rate that far exceeds anything conceivable in the past, a scenario that fiction writer Vinge named the singularity.(Robot designer Moravec, cyberneticist Warwick and inventor Kurzweil have predicted that humans and machines will merge in the future into cyborgs that are more capable and powerful than either.( This idea, called transhumanism, which has roots in Huxley and Ettinger, has been illustrated in fiction as well, for example in the manga in the Shell and the science-fiction series Dune.Fredkin argues that artificial intelligence is the next stage in evolution, an idea first proposed by Samuel Butlers among the Machines (1863), and expanded upon by George Dyson in his book of the same name in 1998.(McCorduck writes that all these scenarios are expressions of the ancient human desire to, as she calls it, forge the gods.(See also* intelligence in fiction* Intelligence (journal)* intelligence (video games)* intelligence* sciences* artificial intelligence* of basic artificial intelligence topics* Artificial intelligence researchers* List of important AI publications* List of AI projects* of emerging technologies* of scientific journals* of mind* singularity* Language Learning* Description of Machine Learning field References  Notes ((TOPIO:* * ))(Definition of AI as the study of agents:* , which provides the version that is used in this article. Note that they use the term computational intelligence as a synonym for artificial intelligence.*  (who prefer the term rational agent) and write The whole-agent view is now widely accepted in the field .* )(Although there is some controversy on this point (see ), McCarthy states unequivocally I came up with the term in a c|net interview. )(McCarthys definition of AI:* )(This is a central idea of McCorducks Machines That Think. She writes: I like to think of artificial intelligence as the scientific apotheosis of a venerable cultural tradition.  Artificial intelligence in one form or another is an idea that has pervaded Western intellectual history, a dream in urgent need of being realized.  Our history is full of attemptsnutty, eerie, comical, earnest, legendary and realto make artificial intelligences, to reproduce what is the essential usbypassing the ordinary means. Back and forth between myth and reality, our imaginations supplying what our workshops couldnt, we have engaged for a long time in this odd form of self-reproduction.  She traces the desire back to its Hellenistic roots and calls it the urge to forge the Gods. )(AI applications widely used behind the scenes:* * * )(Pamela  writes of the rough shattering of AI in subfieldsvision, natural language, decision theory, genetic algorithms, robotics ... and these with own sub-subfieldthat would hardly have anything to say to each other.)(This list of intelligent traits is based on the topics covered by the major AI textbooks, including:* * * * )(General intelligence (AI) is discussed in popular introductions to AI:*  and )(AI in myth:* * )(images as artificial intelligence:*  (statue of Amun)* These were the first machines to be believed to have true intelligence and consciousness. Trismegistus expressed the common belief that with these statues, craftsman had reproduced the true nature of the gods, their sensus and spiritus. McCorduck makes the connection between sacred automatons and Mosaic law (developed around the same time), which expressly forbids the worship of robots )(Humanoid automata:Yan Shi:* of Alexandria:* Al-Jazari:* von Kempelen:* )(Artificial beings:ibn Hayyns Takwin:* Loews Golem:* * Paracelsus Homunculus:* )(AI in early science fiction.* )(Formal reasoning:* )(AIs immediate precursors:* * * * See also . Among the researchers who laid the foundations of AI were Turing, Von Neumann, Wiener, Shannon, McCullough, Pitts and Hebb.)(conference:* * , who writes the conference is generally recognized as the official birthdate of the new science.* , who call the conference the birth of artificial intelligence.* )(Hegemony of the Dartmouth conference attendees:* , who write for the next 20 years the field would be dominated by these people and their students.* )(Golden years of AI (successful symbolic reasoning programs 1956-1973):* * * * The programs described are Bobrows STUDENT, Newell and Simons Theorist and Winograds SHRDLU.)(DARPA pours money into undirected pure research into AI during the 1960s:* * * )(AI in England:* )(Optimism of early AI:* Simon quote:  quoted in .* Minsky quote:  quoted in .)(First Winter, Amendment, report* * * * )(Expert systems:* ,* * ,* * * )(Boom of the 1980s: rise of systems, Fifth Generation Project, Alvey, MCC, SCI:* * * * )(Second winter:* * * )(Formal methods are now preferred (Victory of the neats):* * )(Problem solving, puzzle solving, game playing and deduction:* ,* ,* ,* )(Uncertain reasoning:* ,* ,* ,* )(Intractability and efficiency and the explosion:* )(Psychological evidence of sub-symbolic reasoning:*  showed that people do poorly on completely abstract problems, but if the problem is restated to allow the use of intuitive intelligence, performance dramatically improves. (See selection task)*  have shown that people are terrible at elementary problems that involve uncertain reasoning. (See of cognitive biases for several examples).*  have controversially argued that even our skills at mathematics depend on knowledge and skills that come from the body, i.e. sensorimotor and perceptual skills. (See Mathematics Comes From))(representation:* ,* ,* ,* ,* )(engineering:* ,* ,* )(Representing categories and relations: networks, logics, inheritance (including frames and scripts):* ,* ,* ,* )(Representing events and time:calculus, calculus, calculus (including solving the problem):* ,* ,* )(Causal calculus:* )(Representing knowledge about knowledge: calculus, logics:* ,* )(Ontology:* )(problem:* * While McCarthy was primarily concerned with issues in the logical representation of actions,  apply the term to the more general issue of default reasoning in the vast network of assumptions underlying all our commonsense knowledge.)(Default reasoning and logic, logics, circumscription, world assumption, abduction (Poole et al. places abduction under default reasoning. Luger et al. places this under uncertain reasoning):* ,* ,* ,* )(Breadth of commonsense knowledge:* ,* ,* ,*  (Introduction))(Expert knowledge as embodied intuition:*  (Dreyfus is a philosopher and critic of AI who was among the first to argue that most useful human knowledge was encoded sub-symbolically. See critique of AI)*  (Gladwells Blink is a popular introduction to sub-symbolic reasoning and knowledge.)*  (Hawkins argues that sub-symbolic knowledge should be the primary focus of AI research.))(Planning:* ,* ,* ,* ,* )(Information value theory:* )(Classical planning:* ,* ,* ,* )(Planning and acting in non-deterministic domains: conditional planning, execution monitoring, replanning and continuous planning:* )(Multi-agent planning and emergent behavior:* )(Learning:* ,* ,* ,* ,* )(learning:** )(learning theory:* CITATION IN PROGRESS.)(language processing:* * * * )(Applications of natural language processing, including retrieval (i.e. mining) and translation:* ,* )(Robotics:* ,* ,* )(Moving and space:* )(mapping (localization, etc):*)(perception:* * )(vision:* * * )(recognition:* *)facial recognition and recognition.(recognition:*)(Emotion and computing:* * )(Edelman, Aleksander and others have both argued that consciousness is required for strong AI. (; ))(brain arguments: AI requires a simulation of the operation of the human brain* * A few of the people who make some form of the argument:* * * The most extreme form of this argument (the brain replacement scenario) was put forward by Glymour in the mid-70s and was touched on by Pylyshyn and Searle in 1980.)(complete: )(Biological intelligence vs. intelligence in general:* , who make the analogy with engineering.* , who writes that there are two major branches of artificial intelligence: one aimed at producing intelligent behavior regardless of how it was accomplioshed, and the other aimed at modeling intelligent processes found in nature, particularly human ones.* , a paper in Science, which describes McCathys indifference to biological models. Kolata quotes McCarthy as writing: This is AI, so we dont care if its psychologically real. McCarthy recently reiterated his position at the AI@50 conference where he said Artificial intelligence is not, by definition, simulation of human intelligence .)(vs. scruffies:* * * )(Symbolic vs. sub-symbolic AI:* , who uses the term sub-symbolic.)()(Cognitive simulation, Newell and Simon, AI at CMU (then called Tech):* * )(Soar (history):* * )(McCarthy and AI research at SAIL and SRI:* * )(AI research at Edinburgh and in France, birth of Prolog:* * )(AI at MIT under Minsky in the 1960s :* * * )(Cyc:* , who calls it a determinedly scruffy enterprise* * * )(Knowledge revolution:* * )(Embodied approaches to AI:* * * )(Revival of connectionism:* * )(intelligence* IEEE Computational Intelligence Society)(The agent paradigm:* * * The definition used in this article, in terms of goals, actions, perception and environment, is due to . Other definitions also include knowledge and learning as additional criteria.)(architectures, intelligent systems:* * )(control system:* Albus, J. S. 4-D/RCS reference model architecture for unmanned ground vehicles. In G Gerhart, R Gunderson, and C Shoemaker, editors, Proceedings of the SPIE AeroSense Session on Unmanned Ground Vehicle Technology, volume 3693, pages 1120)(architecture:* CITATION IN PROGRESS.)(algorithms:* * * * )(chaining, chaining, clauses, and logical deduction as search:* * * * )(space search and planning:* * * )(Uninformed searches (first search, first search and general space search):* * * * )(Heuristic or informed searches (e.g., greedy best first and A*):* ,* ,* ,* )(Optimization searches:* * * )(life and society based learning:* )).(programming and algorithms:* ,* .* * * )(Logic:* ,* ,* ,* )(Satplan:* ,* ,* )(based learning, based learning, logic programming, based reasoning:* ,* ,* ,* )(logic:* ,* * )(logic and features such as equality:* ,* ,* ,* ,* )(logic:* )(logic:* CITATION IN PROGRESS.)(Stochastic methods for uncertain reasoning:* ,* ,* ,* ,* )(networks:* ,* ,* ,* )(inference algorithm:* ,* ,* ,* )(learning and the algorithm:* ,* ,* )(decision theory snd Bayesian networks:* )(Stochastic temporal models:* Bayesian networks:* Markov model:* filters:* )(theory and analysis:* ,* )(decision processes and dynamic networks:* )(theory and design:* )(Statistical learning methods and classifiers:* ,* )(methods such as the vector machine,(methods:* )(neighbor algorithm:* )(mixture model:* )(Bayes classifier:* )(Decision tree:* ,* ,* )(Classifier performance:* )(Neural networks and connectionism:* ,* ,* ,* )(Backpropagation:* ,* ,* )(neural networks, perceptrons and basis networks:* * )(neural networks, nets:* * )(learning, Hebbian coincidence learning, networks and attractor networks:* )(temporal memory:* )(theory:* ,* )(Lisp:* * ,* )(Prolog:* ,* )(The test:Turings original publication:* Historical influence and philosophical implications:* * * * )(matter expert Turing test:* CITATION IN PROGRESS.)(Mathematical definitions of intelligence:* * * )(AI:* CITATION IN PROGRESS.)(of AI. All of these positions in this section are mentioned in standard discussions of the subject, such as:* * )(Dartmouth proposal:*  (the original proposal)*  (historical significance))(The symbol systems hypothesis:* * * )(critique of artificial intelligence:* , * * * ,)(The Mathematical Objection:* * Making the Mathematical Objection:* * Refuting Mathematical Objection:*  under (2) The Mathematical Objection* Background:* , , , )(This version is from , and is also quoted in . Searles original formulation was The appropriately programmed computer really is a mind, in the sense that computers given the right programs can be literally said to understand and have other cognitive states.  . Strong AI is defined similarly by : The assertion that machines could possibly act intelligently (or, perhaps better, act as if they were intelligent) is called the weak AI hypothesis by philosophers, and the assertion that machines that do so are actually thinking (as opposed to simulating thinking) is called the strong AI hypothesis.)(Searles Room argument:* . Searles original presentation of the thought experiment.* .Discussion:* * * )(rights:* * Prematurity of:* In fiction:*  discusses Frankenstein and identifies the key ethical issues as scientific hubris and the suffering of the monster, i.e. rights.)(AI could decrease the demand for human labor:* * )(Weizenbaums critique of AI:* * * * Weizenbaum (the AI researcher who developed the first chatterbot program, ELIZA) argued in 1976 that the misuse of artificial intelligence has the potential to devalue human life.)(singularity:* * * )(Transhumanism:* * * )(AI as evolution:* Fredkin is quoted in .* postscript, Letter to the Editor.* )AI textbooks * * * * *  History of AI * *  Other sources *  accessdate2007-08-30*  BibTex Internet Archive* .* * * * * * * * * * * * * * .* * * * * * .* * * * * .* * * * * * * * * * .* , Presidential Address to the for the Advancement of Artificial Intelligence.* * * * * * * * .* * *  Further reading *TechCast Article Series, John Sagi, Framing Consciousness* Margaret, Mind As Machine, University Press, 2006* Johnston, John (2008) The Allure of Machinic Life: Cybernetics, Artificial Life, and the New AI, MIT Press* Myers, Courtney Boyd ed. (2009). The AI Report. Forbes June 2009* * Sun, R. & Bookman, L. (eds.), Computational Architectures: Integrating Neural and Symbolic Processes. Kluwer Academic Publishers, Needham, MA. 1994. External links * What Is AI?  An introduction to artificial intelligence by AI founder John McCarthy.* * * AITopics  A large directory of links and other resources maintained by the for the Advancement of Artificial Intelligence, the leading organization of academic AI researchers.* Artificial Intelligence Discussion groupartificialintellektt-lnginteligencijaartificialinteligenceintelligensIntelligenzet:Tehisintellektartificialinteligentecoartifizialartificielleartificilartificialgan:ko:inteligencijainteligentesobuatanartificialis:Gervigreindartificialeartificialisintelektsintelektasmenliintelligenciaml:buatan my:intelligentieja:intelligensintelligensartificiala inteligencjaartificialIntelligenceartificialartificialeintelligenceinteligenciainteligencainteligencijafi:TekolyintelligensArtipisyalth:zekakylartificialtu nhn tofiu-vro:Kunstmistusnga intelihensyazh-yue:intelektszh:
1187
Alloy
File:Steel wire rope.png|thumb|Steel is a metal alloy whose major component is iron, with carbon content between 0.02% and 2.14% by mass.An alloy is a homogeneous mixture or metallic solution composed of two or more elements.(http://www.thefreedictionary.com/alloy) Complete solid solution alloys give single solid phase microstructure, while partial solutions give two or more phases that may or may not be homogeneous in distribution, depending on thermal (heat treatment) history. Alloys usually have different properties from those of the component elements.Alloy constituents are usually measured by mass.TheoryAlloying a metal is done by combining it with one or more other metals or non-metals that often enhance its properties. For example, steel is stronger than iron, its primary element. The physical properties, such as density, reactivity, modulus, and electrical and conductivity, of an alloy may not differ greatly from those of its elements, but engineering properties such as strength(Adelbert Phillo Mills, (1922) Materials of Construction: Their Manufacture and Properties, John Wiley & sons, inc, originally published by the University of Wisconsin, Madison) and strength may be substantially different from those of the constituent materials. This is sometimes a result of the sizes of the atoms in the alloy, because larger atoms exert a compressive force on neighboring atoms, and smaller atoms exert a tensile force on their neighbors, helping the alloy resist deformation. Sometimes alloys may exhibit marked differences in behavior even when small amounts of one element occur. For example, impurities in semi-conducting ferromagnetic alloys lead to different properties, as first predicted by White, Hogan, Suhl, Tian Abrie and Nakamura.()()Some alloys are made by melting and mixing two or more metals. Bronze, an alloy of copper and tin, was the first alloy discovered, during the prehistoric period now known as the age; it was harder than pure copper and originally used to make tools and weapons, but was later superseded by metals and alloys with better properties. In later times bronze has been used for ornaments, bells, statues, and bearings. Brass is an alloy made from copper and zinc. Unlike pure metals, most alloys do not have a single point, but a melting range in which the material is a mixture of solid and liquid phases. The temperature at which melting begins is called the solidus, and the temperature when melting is just complete is called the liquidus. However, for most alloys there is a particular proportion of constituents (in rare cases two)the eutectic mixturewhich gives the alloy a unique melting point.TerminologyThe term alloy is used to describe a mixture of atoms in which the primary constituent is a metal. The primary metal is called the base or the matrix. If there is a mixture of only two types of atoms, not counting impurities, such as a copper-nickel alloy, then it is called a binary alloy. If there are three types of atoms forming the mixture, such as iron, nickel and chromium, then it is called a ternary alloy. An alloy with four constituents is a quaternary alloy, while a five-part alloy is termed a quinary alloy. Because the percentage of each constituent can be varied, with any mixture the entire range of possible variations is called a system. In this respect, all of the various forms of an alloy containing only two constituents, like iron and carbon, is called a binary system, while all of the alloy combinations possible with a ternary alloy, such as alloys of iron, carbon and chromium, is called a ternary system.(Michael Bauccio (2005) ASM metals reference book, ASM International 2005)When a molten metal is mixed with another substance, there are two mechanisms that can cause an alloy to form, called atom exchange and the interstitial mechanism. The relative size of each atom in the mix plays a primary role in determining which mechanism will occur. When the atoms are relatively similar in size, the atom exchange method usually happens, where some of the atoms composing the metallic crystals are replaced with atoms of the other constituent. With the interstitial mechanism, one atom is usually much smaller than the other, and so cannot successfully replace an atom in the crystals of the base metal. The smaller atoms become trapped in the spaces between the atoms in the crystal matrix, called the interstices.(Jon L. Dossett, Howard E. Boyer (2006) Practical heat treating, ASM International, pp. 1-14)Alloys are often made to alter the mechanical properties of the base metal, to induce hardness, toughness, ductility, or other desired properties. While most metals and alloys can be work hardened by inducing defects in their crystal structure, caused by deformation, some alloys can also have their properties altered by treatment. Nearly all metals can be softened by annealing, which repairs the crystal defects, but not as many can be hardened by controlled heating and cooling. Many alloys of aluminum, copper, magnesium, titanium, and nickel can be strengthened to some degree by some method of heat treatment, but few respond to this to the same degree that steel does.( At a certain temperature, the base metal of steel, iron, undergoes a change in the arrangement of the atoms in its crystal matrix, called allotropy. This allows the small carbon atoms to enter the interstices of the crystal. When this happens, the carbon atoms are said to be in solution, or mixed with the iron. If the iron is cooled slowly, the carbon atoms will be forced out of solution, into the spaces between the crystals. If the steel is cooled quickly, the carbon atoms become trapped in solution, causing the iron crystals to deform when the crystal structure tries to change to its low temperature state, inducing great hardness.( In practice, some alloys are used so predominantly with respect to their base metals that the name of the primary constituent is also used as the name of the alloy. For example, 14 karat gold is an alloy of gold with other elements. Similarly, the silver used in jewelry and the aluminium used as a structural building material are also alloys.The term alloy is sometimes used in everyday speech as a synonym for a particular alloy. For example, automobile wheels made of an alloy are commonly referred to as simply alloy wheels, although in point of fact steels and most other metals in practical use are also alloys.HistoryThe use of alloys by humans started with the use of meteoric iron, a naturally occurring alloy of nickel and iron. As no metallurgic processes were used to separate iron from nickel, the alloy was used as it was.() Meteoric iron could be forged from a red heat to make objects such as tools, weapons, and nails. In many cultures it was shaped by cold hammering into knives and arrowheads. They were often used as anvils. Meteoric iron was very rare and valuable, and difficult for ancient people to work.(Vagn Fabritius Buchwald Iron and steel in ancient times, Det Kongelige Danske Videnskabernes Selskab 2005 pp. 1322)Iron is usually found as ore on Earth, except for one deposit of iron in Greenland, which was used by the Inuit people.(Vagn Fabritius Buchwald Iron and steel in ancient times, Det Kongelige Danske Videnskabernes Selskab 2005 pp. 35-37) Native copper, however, was found worldwide, along with silver, gold and platinum, which were also used to make tools, jewelry, and other objects since Neolithic times. Copper was the hardest of these metals, and the most widely distributed. It became one of the most important metals to the ancients. Eventually, humans learned to smelt metals such as copper and tin from ore, and, around 2500 BC, began alloying the two metals to form bronze, which is much harder than its ingredients. Tin was rare, however, being found mostly in Great Britain. In the Middle East, people began alloying copper with zinc to form brass.(Vagn Fabritius Buchwald Iron and steel in ancient times, Det Kongelige Danske Videnskabernes Selskab 2005 pp. 3941) Ancient civilizations took into account the mixture and the various properties it produced, such as hardness, toughness and point, under various conditions of temperature and hardening, developing much of the information contained in modern alloy constitution diagrams.(The first known smelting of iron began in Anatolia, around 1800 BC. Called the bloomery process, it produced very soft but ductile iron and, by 800 BC, the technology had spread to Europe. iron, a very hard but brittle alloy of iron and carbon, was being produced in China as early as 1200 BC, but did not arrive in Europe until the Middle Ages. These metals found little practical use until the introduction of steel around 300 BC. These steels were of poor quality, and the introduction of welding, around the 1st century AD, sought to balance the extreme properties of the alloys by laminating them, to create a tougher metal.(Cyril Smith  (1960) History of metallography, MIT Press, ISBN 0262691205 pp. 24)Mercury had been smelted from cinnabar for thousands of years. Mercury dissolves many metals, such as gold, silver, and tin, to form amalgams (an alloy in a soft paste, or liquid form at ambient temperature). Amalgams have been used since 200 BC in China for plating objects with precious metals, called gilding, such as armor and mirrors. The ancient Romans often used mercury-tin amalgams for gilding their armor. The amalgam was applied as a paste and then heated until the mercury vaporized, leaving the gold, silver, or tin behind.(George Rapp (2009) Archaeomineralogy, Springer, p. 180 ISBN 3540785930) Mercury was often used in mining, to extract precious metals like gold and silver from their ores.(Harry A. Miskimin (1977) The economy of later Renaissance Europe, 14601600, Cambridge University Press, ISBN 0521292085, p. 31)Many ancient civilizations alloyed metals for purely aesthetic purposes. In ancient Egypt and Mycenae, gold was often alloyed with copper to produce red-gold, or iron to produce a bright burgundy-gold. Silver was often found alloyed with gold. These metals were also used to strengthen each other, for more practical purposes. Quite often, precious metals were alloyed with less valuable substances as a means to deceive buyers.(Paul T. Nicholson, Ian Shaw (2000) Ancient Egyptian materials and technology, Cambridge University Press, ISBN 0521452570 pp. 164167) Around 250 BC, Archimedes was commissioned by the king to find a way to check the purity of the gold in a crown, leading to the famous bath-house shouting of Eureka! upon the discovery of principle.(Melvyn Kay (2008) Practical Hydraulics, Taylor and Francis, ISBN 0415351154 p. 45)While the use of iron started to become more widespread around 1200 BC, mainly because of interruptions in the trade routes for tin, the metal is much softer than bronze. However, very small amounts of steel, (an alloy of iron and around 1% carbon), was always a byproduct of the bloomery process. The ability to modify the hardness of steel by treatment had been known since 1100 BC, and the rare material was valued for use in tool and weapon making. Because the ancients could not produce temperatures high enough to melt iron fully, the production of steel in decent quantities did not occur until the introduction of steel during the Middle Ages. This method introduced carbon by heating wrought iron in charcoal for long periods of time, but the penetration of carbon was not very deep, so the alloy was not homogeneous. In 1740, Huntsman began melting blister steel in a crucible to even out the carbon content, creating the first process for the mass production of steel. Huntsmans process was used for manufacturing tool steel until the early 1900s.(George Adam Roberts, George Krauss, Richard Kennedy, Richard L. Kennedy (1998) Tool steels, ASM International, ISBN 0871705990 pp. 23) With the introduction of the blast furnace to Europe in the Middle Ages, iron was able to be produced in much higher volumes than wrought iron. Because pig iron could be melted, people began to develop processes of reducing the carbon in the liquid pig iron to create steel. Puddling was introduced during the 1700s, where molten pig iron was stirred while exposed to the air, to remove the carbon by oxidation. In 1858, Henry Bessemer developed a process of steel making by blowing hot air through liquid pig iron to reduce the carbon content. The process was able to produce the first large scale manufacture of steel.( Once the Bessemer process began to gain widespread use, other alloys of steel began to follow, such as mangalloy, an alloy of steel and manganese, which exhibits extreme hardness and toughness.(Cast steel: Austenitic Manganese Steels)See also* of alloys* Intermetallics* treatment* (method)ReferencesExternal links*Surface Alloys*af:Legeringar:be:be-x-old:bs:Legurabg:ca:Aliatgecs:Slitinada:Legeringde:Legierunget:Sulamel:es:Aleacineo:Alojoeu:Aleaziofa:hif:Alloyfr:Alliagegd:Coimheatailtgl:Aliaxeko:hr:Leguraio:Aloyoid:Aloiia:Alligatois:Mlmblanda(metallurgia)he:kk:sw:Aloiht:Alyajmetallicalv:Sakausjumslt:Lydinyslmo:Ligahu:tvzetmk:ml:ms:Pancalogammn:nl:Legeringja:no:Legeringnn:Legeringnrm:Alouaiuz:Qotishmametalimetlicaro:Aliajru:mitllicasimple:Alloysk:Zliatinasl:Zlitinasr:sh:Legurafi:Metalliseossv:Legeringtl:Balahakta:th:tr:Alamuk:ur:kimfiu-vro:Sullamyi:zh-yue:zh:
1273
Augustus
Augustus (;( entry Augustus);(In Latin, Augustus name would be inscribed as IMPERATOR GAIVS IVLIVS CAESAR AVGVSTVS.)23 September 63 BC  19 August AD 14) is considered the first emperor of the Empire, which he ruled alone from 27 BC until his death in 14 AD.(The dates of his rule are contemporary dates; Augustus lived under two calendars, the Roman Republican until 45 BC, and the Julian after 45 BC. Due to departures from Julius Caesars intentions, Augustus restored the Julian calendar in 8 BC, and the correspondence between the Julian calendar and the actual calendar observed in Rome is uncertain before 8 BC.(Blackburn & Holford-Strevens 2003: 6701)) Born Gaius Octavius Thurinus, he was adopted posthumously by his great-uncle Gaius Julius Caesar in 44 BC via his last will and testament, and between then and 27 BC was officially named Gaius Julius Caesar. In 27 BC the Senate awarded him the honorific Augustus (the revered one), and thus consequently he was Gaius Julius Caesar Augustus.(Formally Imperator Caesar, Divi filius, Augustus which means Imperator Caesar, Son of the Divus (Divus Julius), Augustus.) Because of the various names he bore, it is common to call him Octavius when referring to events between 63 and 44 BC, Octavian (or Octavianus) when referring to events between 44 and 27 BC, and Augustus when referring to events after 27 BC. In Greek sources, Augustus is known as  (Octavius/Oktabios),  (Caesar/Kaisar),  (Augustus/Augustos), or  (Sebastos), depending on context.The young Octavius came into his inheritance after Caesars assassination in 44 BC. In 43 BC, Octavian joined forces with Antony and Marcus Aemilius Lepidus in a dictatorship known as the Triumvirate. As a triumvir, Octavian ruled Rome and many of its provinces.(Some provinces were governed by the Senate.) The triumvirate was eventually torn apart under the competing ambitions of its rulers: Lepidus was driven into exile, and Antony committed suicide following his defeat at the of Actium by the fleet of Octavian commanded by Agrippa in 31 BC.After the demise of the Second Triumvirate, Octavian restored the outward facade of the Republic, with governmental power vested in the Senate, but in practice retained his autocratic power. It took several years to determine the exact framework by which a formally republican state could be led by a sole ruler; the result became known as the Empire. The emperorship was never an office like the dictatorship which Caesar and Sulla had held before him; indeed, he declined it when the Roman populace entreated him to take on the dictatorship.(Gruen (2005), 35.) By law, Augustus held a collection of powers granted to him for life by the Senate, including those of tribune of the plebs and censor. He was consul until 23 BC.(Dio (1987), 153.) His substantive power stemmed from financial success and resources gained in conquest, the building of patronage relationships throughout the Empire, the loyalty of many military soldiers and veterans, the authority of the many honors granted by the Senate,( and the respect of the people. Augustus control over the majority of Romes legions established an armed threat that could be used against the Senate, allowing him to coerce the Senates decisions. With his ability to eliminate senatorial opposition by means of arms, the Senate became docile towards him. His rule through patronage, military power, and accumulation of the offices of the defunct Republic became the model for all later imperial governments.The reign of Augustus initiated an era of relative peace known as the Romana, or Roman peace. Despite continuous wars on the frontiers, and one year-long civil war over the imperial succession, the Mediterranean world remained at peace for more than two centuries. Augustus enlarged the empire dramatically, annexing Egypt, Dalmatia, Pannonia, and Raetia, expanded possessions in Africa, and completed the conquest of Hispania. Beyond the frontiers, he secured the empire with states, and made peace with Parthia through diplomacy. He reformed the Roman system of taxation, developed networks of roads with an official courier system, established a standing army, established the Guard, and created official police and fire-fighting services for Rome. Much of the city was rebuilt under Augustus; and he wrote a record of his own accomplishments, known as the Gestae Divi Augusti, which has survived. Upon his death in AD 14, Augustus was declared a god by the Senateto be worshipped by the Romans.( His names Augustus and Caesar were adopted by every subsequent emperor; and the sixth month of the Roman calendar, previously named Sextilis, was renamed Augustus (August in English) in his honour. He was succeeded by his adopted son (also stepson and former son-in-law), Tiberius.Early lifeWhile his paternal family was from the town of Velletri, about 25 miles from Rome, Augustus was born in the city of Rome on 23 September 63 BC. He was born at Ox Head, a small property on the Hill, very close to the Forum. He was given the name Gaius Octavius Thurinus, his cognomen possibly commemorating his fathers victory at Thurii over a rebellious band of slaves.(Suetonius, Augustus 7)(56 on-line text.) Due to the crowded nature of Rome at the time, Octavius was taken to his fathers home village at Velletri to be raised. Octavius only mentions his fathers equestrian family briefly in his memoirs. His paternal great-grandfather was a military tribune in Sicily during the Punic War. His grandfather had served in several local political offices. His father, also named Gaius Octavius, had been governor of Macedonia.(Suetonius, Augustus The Marcus Octavius vetoing the law suggested by Gracchus in 133 BC was possibly his ancestor. 14.)(Rowell (1962), 14.) His mother Atia was the niece of Caesar.In 59 BC, when he was four years old, his father died.(Chisholm (1981), 23.) His mother married a former governor of Syria, Marcius Philippus.(Suetonius, Augustus 48; of Damascus, Augustus 3. ) Philippus claimed descent from the Great, and was elected consul in 56 BC. Philippus never had much of an interest in young Octavius. Because of this, Octavius was raised by his grandmother (and Julius Caesars sister), Julia Caesaris.In 52 or 51 BC, Julia Caesaris died. Octavius delivered the funeral oration for his grandmother.(Suetonius, Augustus 8.1; Quintilian, 12.6.1.) From this point, his mother and stepfather took a more active role in raising him. He donned the virilis four years later,(Suetonius, Augustus 8.1) and was elected to the of Pontiffs in 47 BC.(Nicolaus of Damascus, Augustus 4. )(Rowell (1962), 16.) The following year he was put in charge of the Greek games that were staged in honor of the of Venus Genetrix, built by Julius Caesar.( According to of Damascus, Octavius wished to join Caesars staff for his campaign in Africa but gave way when his mother protested.(Nicolaus of Damascus, Augustus 6. ) In 46 BC, she consented for him to join Caesar in Hispania, where he planned to fight the forces of Pompey, Caesars late enemy, but Octavius fell ill and was unable to travel.When he had recovered, he sailed to the front, but was shipwrecked; after coming ashore with a handful of companions, he crossed hostile territory to Caesars camp, which impressed his great-uncle considerably.( Velleius Paterculus reports that Caesar afterwards allowed the young man to share his carriage.(Velleius Paterculus 2.59.3.) When back in Rome, Caesar deposited a new will with the Virgins, naming Octavius as the prime beneficiary.(Suetonius, Julius 83.)Rise to powerHeir to CaesarFile:Gerome Death of Caesar.jpg|thumb|300px|The Death of Caesar, by Grme (1867). On 15 March 44 BC, Octaviuss adoptive father Julius Caesar was assassinated by a conspiracy led by Junius Brutus and Cassius Longinus.At the time Caesar was killed on the of March (the 15th) 44 BC, Octavius was studying and undergoing military training in Illyria. Rejecting the advice of some army officers to take refuge with the troops in Macedonia, he sailed to Italia to ascertain if he had any potential political fortunes or security.(Eck (2003), 9.) After landing at Lupiae near Brundisium, he learned the contents of Caesars will, and only then did he decide to become Caesars political heir as well as heir to two-thirds of his estate.(((Appian, Civil Wars 3.911.) Having no living legitimate children,(His daughter Julia had died in 54 BC.) Caesar had adopted his great-nephew Octavius as his son and main heir.(Rowell (1962), 15.) Upon his adoption, Octavius assumed his great-uncles name, Gaius Julius Caesar. Although Romans who had been adopted into a new family usually retained their old nomen in cognomen form (e.g. Octavianus for one who had been an Octavius, Aemilianus for one who had been an Aemilius, etc.) there is no evidence that he ever bore the name Octavianus, as it would have made his modest origins too obvious.(Mackay (2004), 160.)((Southern, Augustus pp.2021) However, despite the fact that he never officially bore the name Octavianus, to save confusing the dead dictator with his heir, historians often refer to the new Caesarbetween his adoption and his assumption, in 27 BC, of the name Augustusas Octavian.(Southern, Augustus pp.21) Antony later charged that Octavian had earned his adoption by Caesar through sexual favours, though Suetonius, in his work of the Twelve Caesars, describes Antonys accusation as political slander.(Suetonius, Augustus 68, 71.)To make a successful entry into the upper echelons of the Roman political hierarchy, Octavian could not rely on his limited funds.(Eck (2003), 910.) After a warm welcome by Caesars soldiers at Brundisium,( Octavian demanded a portion of the funds that were allotted by Caesar for the intended war against Parthia in the Middle East.( This amounted to 700 million sesterces stored at Brundisium, the staging ground in Italy for military operations in the east.(Rowell (1962), 18.) A later senatorial investigation into the disappearance of the public funds made no action against Octavian, since he subsequently used that money to raise troops against the Senates arch enemy, Mark Antony.(Rowell (1962), 19.) Octavian made another bold move in 44 BC when without official permission he appropriated the annual tribute that had been sent from Romes Eastern province to Italy.(Eck (2003), 10.)(Eder (2005), 18.) Octavian began to bolster his personal forces with Caesars veteran legionaries and with troops designated for the Parthian war, gathering support by emphasizing his status as heir to Caesar.((Appian, Civil Wars 3.1112.) On his march to Rome through Italy, Octavians presence and newly acquired funds attracted many, winning over Caesars former veterans stationed in Campania.( By June he had gathered an army of 3,000 loyal veterans, paying each a salary of 500 denarii.(Chisholm (1981), 24.)(Chisholm (1981), 27.)(Rowell (1962), 20.)Arriving in Rome on 6 May 44 BC,( Octavian found the consul Antony, Caesars former colleague, in an uneasy truce with the dictators assassins; they had been granted a general amnesty on 17 March, yet Antony succeeded in driving most of them out of Rome.( This was due to his inflammatory eulogy given at Caesars funeral, mounting public opinion against the assassins.( Although Mark Antony was amassing political support, Octavian still had opportunity to rival him as the leading member of the faction supporting Caesar. Mark Antony had lost the support of many Romans and supporters of Caesar when he at first opposed the motion to elevate Caesar to divine status.(Eck (2003), 11.) Octavian failed to persuade Antony to relinquish Caesars money to him. However, during the summer he managed to win support from Caesarian sympathizers, who saw the younger heir as the lesser evil and hoped to manipulate him, or to bear with him during their efforts to get rid of Antonius.(Syme (1939), 114120.) In September, the Optimate orator Marcus Tullius Cicero began to attack Antony in a series of speeches portraying Antony as the greatest threat to the order of the Senate.(Chisholm (1981), 26.)(Rowell (1962), 30.) With opinion in Rome turning against him and his year of consular power nearing its end, Antony attempted to pass laws which would lend him control over Gaul, which had been assigned as part of his province, from Junius Brutus Albinus, one of Caesars assassins.(Eck (2003), 1112.)(Rowell (1962), 21.) Octavian meanwhile built up a private army in Italy by recruiting Caesarian veterans, and on 28 November won over two of Antonys legions with the enticing offer of monetary gain.(Syme (1939), 123126.)(Eck (2003), 12.)(Rowell (1962), 23.) In the face of Octavians large and capable force, Antony saw the danger of staying in Rome, and to the relief of the Senate he fled to Cisalpine Gaul, which was to be handed to him on 1 January.(First conflict with AntonyFile:Bust of augustus.jpg|thumb|upright|Bust of Augustus in Capitolini, RomeAfter Decimus Brutus refused to give up Gaul, Antony besieged him at Mutina.(Rowell (1962), 24.) The resolutions passed by the Senate to stop the violence were rejected by Antony, as the Senate had no army of its own to challenge him; this provided an opportunity for Octavian, who was already known to have armed forces.( Cicero also defended Octavian against Antonys taunts about Octavians lack of noble lineage; he stated we have no more brilliant example of traditional piety among our youth.(Chisholm (1981), 29.)  This was in part a rebuttal to Antonys opinion of Octavian, as Cicero quoted Antony saying to Octavian, You, boy, owe everything to your name.(Chisholm (1981), 30.)(Rowell (1962), 1920.) In this unlikely alliance orchestrated by the arch anti-Caesarian senator Cicero, the Senate inducted Octavian as senator on  1 January 43 BC, yet he was also given the power to vote alongside the former consuls.(( In addition, Octavian was granted imperium (commanding power), which made his command of troops legal, sending him to relieve the siege along with Hirtius and Pansa (the consuls for 43 BC).((Syme (1939), 167.) In April of 43 BC, Antonys forces were defeated at the battles of Forum Gallorum and Mutina, forcing Antony to retreat to Gaul. However, both consuls were killed, leaving Octavian in sole command of their armies.(Syme (1939), 173174)(Scullard (1982), 157.)After heaping many more rewards on Decimus Brutus than  Octavian for defeating Antony, the Senate attempted to give command of the consular legions to Decimus Brutus, yet Octavian decided not to cooperate.(Rowell (1962), 2627.) Instead, Octavian stayed in the Valley and refused to aid any further offensive against Antony.(Rowell (1962), 27.) In July, an embassy of centurions sent by Octavian entered Rome and demanded that he receive the consulship left vacant by Hirtius and Pansa.(Chisholm (1981), 3233.) Octavian also demanded that the decree declaring Antony a public enemy should be rescinded.( When this was refused, he marched on the city with eight legions.( He encountered no military opposition in Rome, and on  19 August 43 BC was elected consul with his relative Pedius as co-consul.(Eck (2003), 14.)(Rowell (1962), 28.) Meanwhile, Antony formed an alliance with Marcus Aemilius Lepidus, another leading Caesarian.(Syme (1939), 176186.)Second TriumvirateProscriptionsFile:Antony with Octavian aureus.jpg|thumb|Roman aurei bearing the portraits of Antony (left) and Octavian (right), issued in 41 BC to celebrate the  establishment of the Triumvirate by Octavian, Antony and Marcus Lepidus in 43 BC. Both sides bear the inscription III VIR R P C, meaning One of Three Men for the Regulation of the Republic.()In a meeting near Bologna in October of 43 BC, Octavian, Antony, and Lepidus formed a junta called the Triumvirate.( This explicit arrogation of special powers lasting five years was then supported by law passed by the plebs, unlike the unofficial Triumvirate formed by Pompey Magnus, Caesar and Licinius Crassus.(Eck (2003), 15.)(Scullard (1982), 163.) The triumvirs then set in motion proscriptions in which allegedly 300 senators and 2,000 equites were branded as outlaws and deprived of their property and, for those who failed to escape, their lives.( The estimation that 300 senators were proscribed was presented by Appian, although his earlier contemporary Livy asserted that only 130 senators had been proscribed.(Southern (1998), 5253.) This decree issued by the triumvirate was motivated in part by a need to raise money to pay their troops salaries for the upcoming conflict against Caesars assassins, Junius Brutus and Cassius Longinus.(Scullard (1982), 164.) Rewards for their arrest gave incentive for Romans to capture those proscribed, while the assets and properties of those arrested were seized by the triumvirs.(Eck (2003), 16.)Contemporary Roman historians provide conflicting reports as to which triumvir was more responsible for the proscriptions and killing. However, the sources agree that enacting the proscriptions was a means by all three factions to eliminate political enemies.(Scott (1933), 1920.) Velleius Paterculus asserted that Octavian tried to avoid proscribing officials whereas Lepidus and Antony were to blame for initiating them.( Dio defended Augustus as trying to spare as many as possible, whereas Antony and Lepidus, being older and involved in politics longer, had many more enemies to deal with.( This claim was rejected by Appian, who maintained that Octavian shared an equal interest with Lepidus and Antony in eradicating his enemies.(Scott (1933), 20.) Suetonius presents the case that Octavian, although reluctant at first to proscribe officials, nonetheless pursued his enemies with more rigor than the other triumvirs.( Plutarch describes the proscriptions as a ruthless and cutthroat swapping of friends and family between Antony, Lepidus, and Octavian. For example, Octavian allowed the proscription of his ally Cicero, Antony the proscription of his maternal uncle Julius Caesar IV, and Lepidus his brother Paulus.(Scott (1933), 19.)File:S0484.4.jpg|thumb|left|A denarius minted c. 18 BC. Obverse: CAESAR AVGVSTVS; reverse: DIVVSIVLIVS (DIVINE JULIUS)Battle of Philippi and division of territoryOn 1 January 42 BC, the Senate posthumously recognized Julius Caesar as a divinity of the Roman state, Iulius. Octavian was able to further his cause by emphasizing the fact that he was filius, Son of God.(Syme (1939), 202.) Antony and Octavian then sent 28 legions by sea to face the armies of Brutus and Cassius, who had built their base of power in Greece.(Eck (2003), 17.) After two battles at Philippi in Macedonia in October of 42, the Caesarian army was victorious and Brutus and Cassius committed suicide. Mark Antony would later use the examples of these battles as a means to belittle Octavian, as both battles were decisively won with the use of Antonys forces.(Eck (2003), 1718.) In addition to claiming responsibility for both victories, Antony also branded Octavian as a coward for handing over his direct military control to Vipsanius Agrippa instead.(After Philippi, a new territorial arrangement was made among the members of the Second Triumvirate. While Antony placed Gaul, the provinces of Hispania, and Italia in the hands of Octavian, Antony traveled east to Egypt where he allied himself with Queen Cleopatra VII, the former lover of Julius Caesar and mother of Caesars infant son, Caesarion. Lepidus was left with the province of Africa, stymied by Antony who conceded Hispania to Octavian instead.(Eck (2003), 18.)  Octavian was left to decide where in Italy to settle the tens of thousands of veterans of the Macedonian campaign whom the triumvirs had promised to discharge. The tens of thousands who had fought on the republican side with Brutus and Cassius, who could easily ally with a political opponent of Octavian if not appeased, also required land.( There was no more government-controlled land to allot as settlements for their soldiers, so Octavian had to choose one of two options: alienating many Roman citizens by confiscating their land, or alienating many Roman soldiers who could mount a considerable opposition against him in the Roman heartland; Octavian chose the former.(Eck (2003), 1819.)  There were as many as eighteen Roman towns affected by the new settlements, with entire populations driven out or at least given partial evictions.(Eck (2003), 19.)Rebellion and marriage alliancesWidespread dissatisfaction with Octavian over his soldiers settlements encouraged many to rally at the side of Lucius Antonius, who was brother of Mark Antony and supported by a majority in the Senate.(  Meanwhile, Octavian asked for a divorce from Pulchra, the daughter of Fulvia and her first husband Clodius Pulcher. Claiming that his marriage with Clodia had never been consummated, he returned her to her mother, Mark Antonys wife. Fulvia decided to take action. Together with Lucius Antonius she raised an army in Italy to fight for Antonys rights against Octavian. However, Lucius and Fulvia took a political and martial gamble in opposing Octavian, since the Roman army still depended on the triumvirs for their salaries.( Lucius and his allies ended up in a defensive siege at Perusia (modern Perugia), where Octavian forced them into surrender in early 40 BC.( Lucius and his army were spared due to his kinship with Antony, the strongman of the East, while Fulvia was exiled to Sicyon.(Rowell (1962), 32.) However, Octavian showed no mercy for the mass of allies loyal to Lucius; on 15 March, the anniversary of Julius Caesars assassination, he had 300 Roman senators and equestrians executed for allying with Lucius.(Eck (2003), 20.) Perusia was also pillaged and burned as a warning for others.( This bloody event sullied Octavians reputation and was criticized by many, such as the Augustan poet Propertius.(Pompeius, son of the First Triumvir Pompey and still a renegade general following Julius Caesars victory over his father, was established in Sicily and Sardinia as part of an agreement reached with the Second Triumvirate in 39 BC.(Scullard (1982), 162) Both Antony and Octavian were vying for an alliance with Pompeius, who was ironically a member of the republican party, not the Caesarian faction.( Octavian succeeded in a temporary alliance when in 40 BC he married Scribonia, a daughter of Scribonius Libo who was a follower of Pompeius as well as his father-in-law.( Scribonia conceived Octavians only natural child, Julia, who was born the same day that he divorced Scribonia to marry Livia Drusilla, little more than a year after his marriage.(While in Egypt, Antony had been engaged in an affair with Cleopatra and had fathered three children with her.(Helios, Selene II and Ptolemy Philadelphus) Aware of his deteriorating relationship with Octavian, Antony left Cleopatra; he sailed to Italy in 40 BC with a large force to oppose Octavian, laying siege to Brundisium. However, this new conflict proved untenable for both Octavian and Antony. Their centurions, who had become important figures politically, refused to fight due to their Caesarian cause, while the legions under their command followed suit.(Eck (2003) 21.)(Eder (2005), 19.) Meanwhile in Sicyon, Antonys wife Fulvia died of a sudden illness while Antony was en route to meet her. Fulvias death and the mutiny of their centurions allowed the two remaining triumvirs to effect a reconciliation.(( In the autumn of 40, Octavian and Antony approved the Treaty of Brundisium, by which Lepidus would remain in Africa, Antony in the East, Octavian in the West. The Italian peninsula was left open to all for the recruitment of soldiers, but in reality, this provision was useless for Antony in the East.( To further cement relations of alliance with Mark Antony, Octavian gave his sister, Minor, in marriage to Antony in late 40 BC.( During their marriage, Octavia gave birth to two daughters (known as Major and Minor).War with PompeiusFile:Denarius Sextus Pompeius-Scilla.jpg|thumb|A denarius of Pompeius, minted for his victory over Octavians fleet. On the obverse the Pharus of Messina, who defeated Octavian. On the reverse, the monster ScyllaSextus Pompeius threatened Octavian in Italy by denying to the peninsula shipments of grain through the Mediterranean; Pompeius own son was put in charge as naval commander in the effort to cause widespread famine in Italy.( Pompeius control over the sea prompted him to take on the name Neptuni filius, son of Neptune.(Eck (2003), 22.) A temporary peace agreement was reached in 39 BC with the treaty of Misenum; the blockade on Italy was lifted once Octavian granted Pompeius Sardinia, Corsica, Sicily, and the Peloponnese, and ensured him a future position as consul for  35 BC.(( The territorial agreement amongst the triumvirs and Sextus Pompeius began to crumble once Octavian divorced Scribonia and married Livia on  17 January 38 BC.(Eck (2003), 23.) One of Pompeius naval commanders betrayed him and handed over Corsica and Sardinia to Octavian. However Octavian needed Antonys additional support to attack Pompeius, so an agreement was reached with the Second Triumvirates extension for another five-year period beginning in 37 BC.(Scullard (1982), 163)(Eck (2003), 24.) In supporting Octavian, Antony expected to gain support for his own campaign against Parthia, desiring to avenge Romes defeat at Carrhae in 53 BC.( In an agreement reached at Tarentum, Antony provided 120 ships for Octavian to use against Pompeius, while Octavian was to send 20,000 legionaries to Antony for use against Parthia.(Eck (2003), 25.) However, Octavian sent only a tenth the number of those promised, which was viewed by Antony as an intentional provocation.(Octavian and Lepidus launched a joint operation against Sextus in Sicily in 36 BC.(Eck (2003), 2526.) Despite setbacks for Octavian, the naval fleet of Sextus Pompeius was almost entirely destroyed on 3 September by general Agrippa at the naval of Naulochus.( Sextus fled with his remaining forces to the east, where he was captured and executed in Miletus by one of Antonys generals the following year.(Eck (2003), 26.)  Both Lepidus and Octavian gathered the surrendered troops of Pompeius, yet Lepidus felt empowered enough to claim Sicily for himself, ordering Octavian to leave.(  However, Lepidus troops deserted him and defected to Octavian since they were weary of fighting and found Octavians promises of money to be enticing.( Lepidus surrendered to Octavian and was permitted to retain the office of maximus (head of the college of priests), but was ejected from the Triumvirate, his public career at an end, and was effectively exiled to a villa at Cape Circei in Italy.((Scullard (1982), 164) The Roman dominions were now divided between Octavian in the West and Antony in the East. To maintain peace and stability in his portion of the Empire, Octavian ensured Romes citizens of their rights to property. This time he settled his discharged soldiers outside of Italy while returning 30,000 slaves to former Roman owners that had previously fled to Pompeius to join his army and navy.(Eck (2003), 2627.)  To ensure his own safety and that of Livia and Octavia once he returned to Rome, Octavian had the Senate grant him, his wife, and his sister tribunal immunity, or sacrosanctitas.(Eck (2003), 2728.)War with AntonyFile:Lawrence Alma-Tadema- Anthony and Cleopatra.JPG|thumb|Anthony and Cleopatra, by Alma-TademaMeanwhile, Antonys campaign against Parthia turned disastrous, tarnishing his image as a leader, and the mere 2,000 legionaries sent by Octavian to Antony were hardly enough to replenish his forces.(Eck (2003), 29.) On the other hand, Cleopatra could restore his army to full strength, and since he was already engaged in a romantic affair with her, he decided to send Octavia back to Rome.(Eck (2003), 2930.) Octavian used this to spread propaganda implying that Antony was becoming less than Roman because he rejected a legitimate Roman spouse for an Oriental paramour.(Eck (2003), 30.) In 36 BC, Octavian used a political ploy to make himself look less autocratic and Antony more the villain by proclaiming that the civil wars were coming to an end, and that he would step down as triumvir if only Antony would do the same; Antony refused.(Eder (2005), 20.)After Roman troops captured the Kingdom of Armenia in 34 BC, Antony made his son Alexander Helios the ruler of Armenia; he also awarded the title Queen of Kings to Cleopatra, acts which Octavian used to convince the Roman Senate that Antony had ambitions to diminish the preeminence of Rome.( When Octavian became consul once again on  1 January 33 BC, he opened the following session in the Senate with a vehement attack on Antonys grants of titles and territories to his relatives and to his queen.(Eck (2003), 31.)  Defecting consuls and senators rushed over to the side of Antony in disbelief of the propaganda (which turned out to be true), yet so did able ministers desert Antony for Octavian in the autumn of 32 BC.(Eck (2003), 3234.) These defectors, Munatius Plancus and Marcus Titius, gave Octavian the information he needed to confirm with the Senate all the accusations he made against Antony.(Eck (2003), 34.) By storming the sanctuary of the Vestal Virgins, Octavian forced their chief priestess to hand over Antonys secret will, which would have given away Roman-conquered territories as kingdoms for his sons to rule, alongside plans to build a tomb in Alexandria for him and his queen to reside upon their deaths.(Eck (2003), 3435)(Eder (2005), 2122.) In late 32 BC, the Senate officially revoked Antonys powers as consul and declared war on Cleopatras regime in Egypt.(Eck (2003), 35.)(Eder (2005), 22.)File:Castro Battle of Actium.jpg|thumb|left|The of Actium, by Lorenzo Castro, painted 1672, National Maritime Museum, LondonIn early 31 BC, while Antony and Cleopatra were temporarily stationed in Greece, Octavian gained a preliminary victory when the navy under the command of Agrippa successfully ferried troops across the Sea.(Eck (2003), 37.) While Agrippa cut off Antony and Cleopatras main force from their supply routes at sea, Octavian landed on the mainland opposite the island of Corcyra (modern Corfu) and marched south.( Trapped on land and sea, deserters of Antonys army fled to Octavians side daily while Octavians forces were comfortable enough to make preparations.( In a desperate attempt to break free of the naval blockade, Antonys fleet sailed through the bay of Actium on the western coast of Greece. It was there that Antonys fleet faced the much larger fleet of smaller, more maneuverable ships under commanders Agrippa and Sosius in the of Actium on  2 September 31 BC.(Eck (2003), 38.) Antony and his remaining forces were only spared due to a last-ditch effort by Cleopatras fleet that had been waiting nearby.(Eck (2003), 3839.) Octavian pursued them, and after another defeat in Alexandria on  1 August 30 BC, Antony and Cleopatra committed suicide; Antony fell on his own sword and into Cleopatras arms, while she let a venomous snake bite her.(Eck (2003), 39.) Having exploited his position as Caesars heir to further his own political career, Octavian was only too well aware of the dangers in allowing another to do so and, reportedly commenting that two Caesars are one too many, he ordered CaesarionJulius Caesars son by Cleopatrato be killed, whilst sparing Cleopatras children by Antony, with the exception of Antonys older son.(Green (1990), 697.)(Scullard (1982), 171.)Octavian had previously shown little mercy to military combatants and acted in ways that had proven unpopular with the Roman people, yet he was given credit for pardoning many of his opponents after the Battle of Actium.(Octavian becomes AugustusFile:Octavian aureus circa 30 BCE.jpg|thumb|Aureus of Octavian, circa 30 BC, MuseumAfter Actium and the defeat of Antony and Cleopatra, Octavian was in a position to rule the entire Republic under an unofficial principate,(Gruen (2005), 3435.) but would have to achieve this through incremental power gains, courting the Senate and the people, while upholding the republican traditions of Rome, to appear that he was not aspiring to dictatorship or monarchy.((  Marching into Rome, Octavian and Marcus Agrippa were elected as dual consuls by the Senate.(  Years of civil war had left Rome in a state of near lawlessness, but the Republic was not prepared to accept the control of Octavian as a despot.  At the same time, Octavian could not simply give up his authority without risking further civil wars amongst the Roman generals, and even if he desired no position of authority whatsoever, his position demanded that he look to the well-being of the city of Rome and the provinces.  Octavians aims from this point forward were to return Rome to a state of stability, traditional legality and civility by lifting the overt political pressure imposed on the courts of law and ensuring free elections in name at least.(Eck (2003), 4445.)First settlementFile:Caesar augustus.jpg|thumb|upright|Augustus as a magistrate. The statues marble head was made c. 3020 BC, the body sculpted in the 2nd century AD (Louvre, Paris).In BC, Octavian made a show of returning full power to the Senate and relinquishing his control of the Roman provinces and their armies.(  Under his consulship, however, the Senate had little power in initiating legislation by introducing bills for senatorial debate.(Eck (2003), 45.)  Although Octavian was no longer in direct control of the provinces and their armies, he retained the loyalty of active duty soldiers and veterans alike.(  The careers of many clients and adherents depended on his patronage, as his financial power in the Roman Republic was unrivaled.(  The historian Eck states:The sum of his power derived first of all from various powers of office delegated to him by the Senate and people, secondly from his immense private fortune, and thirdly from numerous patron-client relationships he established with individuals and groups throughout the Empire.  All of them taken together formed the basis of his auctoritas, which he himself emphasized as the foundation of his political actions.(Eck (2003), 113.)To a large extent the public was aware of the vast financial resources Augustus commanded.  When he failed to encourage enough senators to finance the building and maintenance of networks of roads in Italy, he undertook direct responsibility for them in BC.(Eck (2003), 80.)  This was publicized on the Roman currency issued in BC, after he donated vast amounts of money to the aerarium Saturni, the public treasury.(According to H.H. Scullard, however, Augustuss power was based on the exercise of a predominant military power and ... the ultimate sanction of his authority was force, however much the fact was disguised.(Scullard (1982), 211.)The Senate proposed to Octavian, the victor of Romes civil wars, that he once again assume command of the provinces. The senates proposal was a ratification of Octavians extra-constitutional power. Through the senate Octavian was able to continue the appearance of a still-functional constitution. Feigning reluctance, he accepted a ten-year responsibility of overseeing provinces that were considered chaotic.(Eck (2003), 46.)(Scullard (1982), 210.)  The provinces ceded to him, that he might pacify them within the promised ten-year period, comprised much of the conquered Roman world, including all of Hispania and Gaul, Syria, Cilicia, Cyprus, and Egypt.((Gruen (2005), 34.) Moreover, command of these provinces provided Octavian with control over the majority of Romes legions.((Eck (2003), 47.)While Octavian acted as consul in Rome, he dispatched senators to the provinces under his command as his representatives to manage provincial affairs and ensure his orders were carried out.( On the other hand, the provinces not under Octavians control were overseen by governors chosen by the Roman Senate.( Octavian became the most powerful political figure in the city of Rome and in most of its provinces, but did not have sole monopoly on political and martial power.( The Senate still controlled North Africa, an important regional producer of grain, as well as Illyria and Macedonia, two martially strategic regions with several legions.( However, with control of only five or six legions distributed amongst three senatorial proconsuls, compared to the twenty legions under the control of Augustus, the Senates control of these regions did not amount to any political or martial challenge to Octavian.(CCAA, 2425.)( The Senates control over some of the Roman provinces helped maintain a republican faade for the autocratic Principate.( Also, Octavians control of entire provinces for the objective of securing peace and creating stability followed Republican-era precedents, in which such prominent Romans as Pompey had been granted similar military powers in times of crisis and instability.(File:Augustus Bevilacqua Glyptothek Munich 317.jpg|thumb|upright|Bust of Augustus, wearing the Crown. Glyptothek, MunichIn January of 27 BC, the Senate gave Octavian the new titles of Augustus and Princeps.(Eck (2003), 50.) Augustus, from the Latin word Augere (meaning to increase), can be translated as the illustrious one.(Eck (2003), 49.) It was a title of religious rather than political authority.( According to Roman religious beliefs, the title symbolized a stamp of authority over humanityand in fact naturethat went beyond any constitutional definition of his status. After the harsh methods employed in consolidating his control, the change in name would also serve to demarcate his benign reign as Augustus from his reign of terror as Octavian. His new title of Augustus was also more favorable than Romulus, the previous one he styled for himself in reference to the story of and Remus (founders of Rome), which would symbolize a second founding of Rome.( However, the title of Romulus was associated too strongly with notions of monarchy and kingship, an image Octavian tried to avoid.(Eck (2003), 149) Princeps, comes from the Latin phrase primum caput, the first head, originally meaning the oldest or most distinguished senator whose name would appear first on the senatorial roster; in the case of Augustus it became an almost regnal title for a leader who was first in charge.(Eck (2003), 3, 149.) Princeps had also been a title under the Republic for those who had served the state well; for example, Pompey had held the title.  Augustus also styled himself as Imperator Caesar divi filius, Commander Caesar son of the deified one.( With this title he not only boasted his familial link to deified Julius Caesar, but the use of Imperator signified a permanent link to the Roman tradition of victory.( The word Caesar was merely a cognomen for one branch of the Julian family, yet Augustus transformed Caesar into a new family line that began with him.(Augustus was granted the right to hang the civica, the civic crown made from oak, above his door and have laurels drape his doorposts.(Eder (2005), 24.) This crown was usually held above the head of a Roman general during a triumph, with the individual holding the crown charged to continually repeat mori, or, Remember, you are mortal, to the triumphant general. Additionally, laurel wreaths were important in several state ceremonies, and crowns of laurel were rewarded to champions of athletic, racing, and dramatic contests. Thus, both the laurel and the oak were integral symbols of Roman religion and statecraft; placing them on Augustus doorposts was tantamount to declaring his home the capital. However, Augustus renounced flaunting insignia of power such as holding a scepter, wearing a diadem, or wearing the golden crown and purple toga of his predecessor Julius Caesar.(Eder (2005), 13.) If he refused to symbolize his power by donning and bearing these items on his person, the Senate nonetheless awarded him with a golden shield displayed in the meeting hall of the Curia, bearing the inscription virtus, pietas, clementia, iustitiavalor, piety, clemency, and justice.(Eck (2003), 3.)(Second settlementBy 23 BC, some of the implications of the settlement of 27 BC were becoming apparent. Augustus holding of an annual consulate made his dominance over the Roman political system too obvious, whilst at the same time halving the opportunities for others to achieve what was still purported to be the head of the Roman state.(Wells, pg. 51)  Further, his desire to have his nephew Marcus Claudius Marcellus follow in his footsteps and eventually assume the Principate in his turn was causing political problems(If the testimony of Primus can be believed, where during his trial for illegally launching a war in Thrace, he asserted that he acted on the orders of Marcellus and Augustus  see Southern, pg. 108 and Eck (2003), pg. 55) and alienating his three biggest supporters  Agrippa, Maecenas and Livia.(Holland, pg. 294)  Feeling pressure from his own core group of adherents, Augustus turned to the Senate in an attempt to bolster his support there, especially with the Republicans; after his choice for co-consul in 23 BC, Terentius Varro Murena died before taking office(Ando, pg. 140; Raaflaub, pg. 426; Wells, pg. 53) he appointed the noted Republican Calpurnius Piso, who had fought against Julius Caesar and supported Cassius and Brutus.(Davies, pg. 259)In the late spring Augustus suffered a severe illness, and on his supposed deathbed made arrangements that would ensure the continuation of the Principate in some form,(Southern, pg. 108; Holland, pg. 295) whilst at the same time put in doubt the senators suspicions of his anti-republicanism.(Eder (2005), 25.)(Eck (2003), 56.)  Augustus prepared to hand down his signet ring to his favored general Agrippa.((  However, Augustus handed over to his co-consul Piso all of his official documents, an account of public finances, and authority over listed troops in the provinces while Augustus supposedly favored nephew Marcellus came away empty-handed.(( This was a surprise to many who believed Augustus would have named an heir to his position as an unofficial emperor.(Gruen (2005), 38.) Augustus bestowed only properties and possessions to his designated heirs, as an obvious system of institutionalized imperial inheritance would have provoked resistance and hostility amongst the republican-minded Romans fearful of monarchy.(Gruen (2005), 3839.)  With regards to the Principate, it was obvious to Augustus that Marcellus was not ready to take on his position;(Stern, Gaius, Women, children, and senators on the Ara Pacis Augustae: A study of Augustus vision of a new world order in 13 BC, pg. 23) nonetheless, by giving his signet ring to Agrippa, it was Augustus intent to signal to the legions that Agrippa was to be his successor, and that no matter what the constitutional rules were, they would continue to obey Agrippa.(Holland, pgs. 294-295; Southern, pg. 108)File:Cameo August BM Gem3577.jpg|thumb|upright|Portrait of Augustus wearing a gorgoneion on a three layered sardonyx cameo, AD 14/20Soon after his bout of illness subsided, Augustus gave up his permanent consulship.( The only other times Augustus would serve as consul would be in the years 5 and 2 BC,((Eder (2005), 26.) both times to introduce his grandsons into public life.(Davies, pg. 259)  Although he had resigned as consul, Augustus retained his consular imperium, leading to a second compromise between him and the Senate known as the Second Settlement.(Eck (2003), 57.) This was a clever ploy by Augustus; by stepping down as one of two consuls, this allowed aspiring senators a better chance to fill that position, while at the same time Augustus could exercise wider patronage within the senatorial class.( Augustus was no longer in an official position to rule the state, yet his dominant position over the Roman provinces remained unchanged as he became a proconsul.((Gruen (2005), 37.) Earlier as a consul he had the power to intervene, when he deemed necessary, with the affairs of provincial proconsuls appointed by the Senate.(Eck (2003), 5657.) As a proconsul Augustus did not want this authority of overriding provincial governors to be stripped from him, so imperium proconsulare maius, or power over all the proconsuls was granted to Augustus by the Senate.( The existence of imperium maius is debated by scholars, and it is also argued that he was only granted imperium aequum, or power equal to that of the governors, but his supreme influence allowed him to control the affairs of the provinces.Augustus was also granted the power of a tribune (tribunicia potestas) for life, though not the official title of tribune.( Legally it was closed to patricians, a status that Augustus had acquired years ago when adopted by Julius Caesar.(Gruen (2005), 36.) This allowed him to convene the Senate and people at will and lay business before it, veto the actions of either the Assembly or the Senate, preside over elections, and the right to speak first at any meeting.((Eck (2003), 5758.) Also included in Augustus tribunician authority were powers usually reserved for the censor; these included the right to supervise public morals and scrutinize laws to ensure they were in the public interest, as well as the ability to hold a census and determine the membership of the Senate.(Eck (2003), 59.) With the powers of a censor, Augustus appealed to virtues of Roman patriotism by banning all other attire besides the classic toga while entering the Forum.(Eder (2005), 30.) There was no precedent within the Roman system for combining the powers of the tribune and the censor into a single position, nor was Augustus ever elected to the office of censor.(Bunson (1994), 80.) Caesar had been granted similar powers, wherein he was charged with supervising the morals of the state, however this position did not extend to the censors ability to hold a census and determine the Senates roster. The office of the tribune plebis began to lose its prestige due to Augustus amassing of tribunal powers, so he revived its importance by making it a mandatory appointment for any plebeian desiring the praetorship.(Bunson (1994), 427.)File:CaesarAugustusPontiusMaximusCloseup.jpg|thumb|left|upright|The Labicana AugustusAugustus as MaximusIn addition to tribunician authority, Augustus was granted sole imperium within the city of Rome itself: all armed forces in the city, formerly under the control of the prefects and consuls, were now under the sole authority of Augustus.(Eck (2003), 60.)  With maius imperium proconsulare, Augustus was the only individual able to receive a triumph as he was ostensibly the head of every Roman army.(Eck (2003), 61.) In 19 BC, Lucius Cornelius Balbus, governor of Africa and conqueror of the Garamantes, was the first man of provincial origin to receive this award, as well as the last.( For every following Roman victory the credit was given to Augustus, because Romes armies were commanded by the legatus, who were deputies of the princeps in the provinces.( Augustus eldest son by marriage to Livia, Tiberius, was the only exception to this rule when he received a triumph for victories in Germania in 7 BC.(Eck (2003), 117.) Ensuring that his status of maius imperium proconsulare was renewed in 13 BC, Augustus stayed in Rome during the renewal process and provided veterans with lavish donations to gain their support.(Many of the political subtleties of the Second Settlement seem to have evaded the comprehension of the Plebeian class. When Augustus failed to stand for election as consul in 22 BC, fears arose once again that Augustus was being forced from power by the aristocratic Senate. In 22, 21, and 19 BC, the people rioted in response, and only allowed a single consul to be elected for each of those years, ostensibly to leave the other position open for Augustus.(Dio 54.1, 6, 10.) In 22 BC there was a food shortage in Rome which sparked panic, while many urban plebs called for Augustus to take on dictatorial powers to personally oversee the crisis.( After a theatrical display of refusal before the Senate, Augustus finally accepted authority over Romes grain supply by virtue of his proconsular imperium, and ended the crisis almost immediately.( It was not until AD 8 that a food crisis of this sort prompted Augustus to establish a praefectus annonae, a permanent prefect who was in charge of procuring food supplies for Rome.(Eck (2003), 78.)Nevertheless, the were some who were concerned by the expansion of powers granted to Augustus by the Second Settlement, and this came to a head with the apparent conspiracy of Fannius Caepio and Lucinius Varro Murena.(Southern, pg. 109; Holland, pg. 299)  In early 22 BC, charges were brought against Primus, the former proconsul (governor) of Macedonia, of waging a war on the Odrysian kingdom of Thrace, whose king was a Roman ally, without prior approval of the Senate.(Wells, pg. 53)  He was defended by Murena, who told the trial that his client had received specific instructions from Augustus, ordering him to attack the client state.(Southern, pg. 108)  Later, Primus testified that the orders came from the recently deceased Marcellus.(Holland, pg. 300)  Under the Constitutional settlement of 27 BC such orders, had they been given, would have been considered a breach of the Senates prerogative, as Macedonia was under the Senates jurisdiction, not the Princeps. Such an action would have ripped away the veneer of Republican restoration as promoted by Augustus, and exposed his fraud of merely being the first citizen, a first among equals.(Southern, pg. 108)  Even worse, the involvement of Marcellus provided some measure of proof that Augustuss policy was to have the youth take his place as Princeps, instituting a form of monarchy  accusations that had already played out during the crisis of 23 BC.(Stern, Gaius, Women, children, and senators on the Ara Pacis Augustae: A study of Augustus vision of a new world order in 13 BC, pg. 23)The situation was so serious, that Augustus himself appeared at the trial, even though he had not been called as a witness. Under oath, Augustus declared that he gave no such order.(Syme, pg. 333)  Murena, disbelieving Augustuss testimony and resentful of his attempt to subvert the trial by using his auctoritas, rudely demanded to know why Augustus had turned up to a trial to which he had not been called; Augustus replied that he came in the public interest.(Syme, pg. 333; Holland, pg. 300; Southern, pg, 108)  Although Primus was found guilty, some jurors voted to acquit, meaning that not everybody believed Augustuss testimony.(Wells, pg. 53; Raaflaub, pg. 426)  Then, sometime prior to September 1, 22 BC a certain Castricius provided Augustus with information about a conspiracy led by Fannius Caepio against the Princeps.(Swan, pg. 241; Syme, pg. 483)  Murena was named among the conspirators. Tried in absentia, with Tiberius acting as prosecutor, the jury found the conspirators guilty, but it was not a unanimous verdict.(Wells, pg. 53; Holland, pg. 301)  Sentenced to death for treason, all the accused were executed as soon as they were captured without ever giving testimony in their defence.(Davies, pg. 260; Holland, pg. 301)  Augustus ensured that the facade of Republican government continued with an effective cover-up of the events.(Holland, pg. 301)In 19 BC, the Senate voted to allow Augustus to wear the consuls insignia in public and before the Senate,( as well as sit in the symbolic chair between the two consuls and hold the fasces, an emblem of consular authority.(Gruen (2005), 43.)  Like his tribune authority, the granting of consular powers to him was another instance of holding power of offices he did not actually hold.( This seems to have assuaged the populace; regardless of whether or not Augustus was actually a consul, the importance was that he appeared as one before the people. On 6 March 12 BC, after the death of Lepidus, he additionally took up the position of maximus, the high priest of the collegium of the Pontifices, the most important position in Roman religion.(Bowersock (1990), p. 380. The date is provided by inscribed calendars; see also Augustus, Res Gestae 10.2. Dio 27.2 reports this under 13 BC, probably as the year in which Lepidus died (Bowersock (1990), p. 383).)(Eder (2005), 28.)  On  5 February 2 BC, Augustus was also given the title patriae, or father of the country.(Mackay (2004), 186.)(Eck (2003), 129.)Later Roman Emperors would generally be limited to the powers and titles originally granted to Augustus, though often, to display humility, newly appointed Emperors would decline one or more of the honorifics given to Augustus. Just as often, as their reign progressed, Emperors would appropriate all of the titles, regardless of whether they had actually been granted them by the Senate. The civic crown, which later Emperors took to actually wearing, consular insignia, and later the purple robes of a Triumphant general (picta) became the imperial insignia well into the Byzantine era.War and expansionFile:Augusto 30aC - 6dC 55%CS jpg.JPG|thumb|300px|Extent of the Roman Empire under Augustus. The yellow legend represents the extent of the Republic in 31 BC, the shades of green represent gradually conquered territories under the reign of Augustus, and pink areas on the map represent states; however, areas under Roman control shown here were subject to change even during Augustus reign, especially in Germania.Imperator Caesar Divi Filius Augustus chose Imperator, victorious commander to be his first name, since he wanted to make the notion of victory associated with him emphatically clear.(Eck (2003), 93.) By the year 13, Augustus boasted 21 occasions where his troops proclaimed imperator as his title after a successful battle.( Almost the entire fourth chapter in his publicly released memoirs of achievements known as the Res Gestae was devoted to his military victories and honors.( Augustus also promoted the ideal of a superior Roman civilization with a task of ruling the world (the extent to which the Romans knew it), a sentiment embodied in words that the contemporary poet Virgil attributes to a legendary ancestor of Augustus: tu regere imperio populos, Romane, mementoRoman, remember by your strength to rule the Earths peoples!( The impulse for expansionism, apparently prominent among all classes at Rome, is accorded divine sanction by Virgils Jupiter, who in Book 1 of the Aeneid promises Rome imperium sine fine, sovereignty without limit.(Eck (2003), 95.)File:Tiberius NyCarlsberg01.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Bust of Tiberius, a successful military commander under Augustus before he was designated as his heir and successorBy the end of his reign, the armies of Augustus had conquered northern Hispania (modern Spain and Portugal),(Eck (2003), 94.) the Alpine regions of Raetia and Noricum (modern Switzerland, Bavaria, Austria, Slovenia),( Illyricum and Pannonia (modern Albania, Croatia, Hungary, Serbia, etc.),( and extended the borders of the Province to the east and south.( After the reign of the client king the Great (734 BC), Judea was added to the province of Syria when Augustus deposed his successor Archelaus.( Like Egypt which had been conquered after the defeat of Antony in 30 BC, Syria was governed not by a proconsul or legate of Augustus, but a high prefect of the equestrian class.( Again, no military effort was needed in 25 BC when Galatia (modern Turkey) was converted to a Roman province shortly after of Galatia was killed by an avenging widow of a slain prince from Homonada.( When the rebellious tribes of Cantabria in modern-day Spain were finally quelled in 19 BC, the territory fell under the provinces of Hispania and Lusitania.(Eck (2003), 97.) This region proved to be a major asset in funding Augustus future military campaigns, as it was rich in mineral deposits that could be fostered in Roman mining projects, especially the very rich gold deposits at Medulas for example.(Conquering the peoples of the Alps in 16 BC was another important victory for Rome since it provided a large territorial buffer between the Roman citizens of Italy and Romes enemies in Germania to the north.(Eck (2003), 98.) The poet Horace dedicated an ode to the victory, while the monument of Augustus near Monaco was built to honor the occasion.(Eck (2003), 9899.) The capture of the Alpine region also served the next offensive in 12 BC, when Tiberius began the offensive against the Pannonian tribes of Illyricum and his brother Claudius Drusus against the Germanic tribes of the eastern Rhineland.(Eck (2003), 99.) Both campaigns were successful, as Drusus forces reached the Elbe River by 9 BC, yet he died shortly after by falling off his horse.( It was recorded that the pious Tiberius walked in front of his brothers body all the way back to Rome.(File:Panormica de Las Mdulas.jpg|thumb|mine of Mdulas.File:TabulaPeutingerianaMuziris.jpg|thumb|right|Muziris in the Kingdom of India, as shown in the Peutingeriana, with depiction of a Temple of Augustus (Templum Augusti), an illustration of relations in the period.To protect Romes eastern territories from the Empire, Augustus relied on the states of the east to act as territorial buffers and areas which could raise their own troops for defense.(Eck (2003), 96.) To ensure security of the Empires eastern flank, Augustus stationed a Roman army in Syria, while his skilled stepson Tiberius negotiated with the Parthians as Romes diplomat to the East.( Tiberius was responsible for restoring Tigranes V to the throne of the Kingdom of Armenia.( Yet arguably his greatest diplomatic achievement was negotiating with IV of Parthia (372 BC) in 20 BC for the return of the battle standards lost by Crassus in the of Carrhae, a symbolic victory and great boost of morale for Rome.(Bunson (1994), 416.)((Brosius (2006), 9697, 136138.) Werner Eck claims that this was a great disappointment for Romans seeking to avenge Crassus defeat by military means.(Eck (2003), 9596.) However, Maria Brosius explains that Augustus used the return of the standards as propaganda symbolizing the submission of Parthia to Rome. The event was celebrated in art such as the breastplate design on the statue of Prima Porta and in monuments such as the Temple of Mars Ultor (Mars the Avenger) built to house the standards.(Brosius (2006), 97; see also Bivar (1983), 6667.)Although Parthia always posed a threat to Rome in the east, the real battlefront was along the  Rhine and Danube rivers.( Before the final fight with Antony, Octavians campaigns against the tribes in Dalmatia was the first step in expanding Roman dominions to the Danube.(Rowell (1962), 13.) Victory in battle was not always a permanent success, as newly conquered territories were constantly retaken by Romes enemies in Germania.( A prime example of Roman loss in battle was the of Teutoburg Forest in AD 9, where three entire legions led by Quinctilius Varus were destroyed with few survivors by Arminius, leader of the Cherusci, an apparent Roman ally.(Eck (2003), 101102.) Augustus retaliated by dispatching Tiberius and Drusus to the Rhineland to pacify it, which had some success although the battle of AD 9 brought the end to Roman expansion into Germany.(Bunson (1994), 417.) The Roman general Germanicus took advantage of a Cherusci civil war between Arminius and Segestes; they defeated  Arminius, who fled that battle but was killed later in 21 due to treachery.(Bunson (1994), 31.)Death and successionFile:Augustus Tiberius aureus.png|left|thumb|A Roman aureus struck under Augustus, c. AD 1314; the reverse shows Tiberius riding on a quadriga, celebrating the fifteenth renewal of his tribunal power. At least six potential heirs, including Agrippa and his sons, had expired or proven incapable of succeeding Augustus, before he finally settled on Tiberius in AD 9.The illness of Augustus in 23 BC brought the problem of succession to the forefront of political issues and the public. To ensure stability, he needed to designate an heir to his unique position in Roman society and government. This was to be achieved in small, undramatic, and incremental ways that did not stir senatorial fears of monarchy.( If someone was to succeed his unofficial position of power, they were going to have to earn it through their own publicly proven merits.(Gruen (2005), 50.) Some Augustan historians argue that indications pointed toward his sisters son Marcellus, who had been quickly married to Augustus daughter the Elder.(Eck (2003), 114115.) Other historians dispute this due to Augustus will read aloud to the Senate while he was seriously ill in 23 BC,(Eck (2003), 115.) instead indicating a preference for Marcus Agrippa, who was Augustus second in charge and arguably the only one of his associates who could have controlled the legions and held the Empire together.( After the death of Marcellus in 23 BC, Augustus married his daughter to Agrippa. This union produced five children, three sons and two daughters: Caesar, Caesar, Julia, the Elder, and Postumus Agrippa, so named because he was born after Marcus Agrippa died. Shortly after the Second Settlement, Agrippa was granted a five-year term of administering the eastern half of the Empire with the imperium of a proconsul and the same tribunicia potestas granted to Augustus (although not trumping Augustus authority), his seat of governance stationed at Samos in the eastern Aegean.(Gruen (2005), 44.)(Eck (2003), 58.)  Although this granting of power would have shown Augustus favor for Agrippa, it was also a measure to please members of his Caesarian party by allowing one of their members to share a considerable amount of power with him.(Augustus intent to make Gaius and Lucius Caesar his heirs was apparent when he adopted them as his own children.(Syme (1939), 416417.) He took the consulship in 5 and 2 BC so he could personally usher them into their political careers,(Scullard (1982), 217.) and they were nominated for the consulships of AD 1 and 4.(Syme (1939), 417.) Augustus also showed favor to his stepsons, Livias children from her first marriage, Claudius Drusus Germanicus and Tiberius Claudius, granting them military commands and public office, and seeming to favor Drusus. However, Drusus marriage to Antonia, Augustus niece, was a relationship far too embedded within the family to disturb over succession issues.( After Agrippa died in 12 BC, Livias son Tiberius was ordered to divorce his own wife Vipsania and marry Agrippas widow, Augustus daughter Juliaas soon as a period of mourning for Agrippa had ended.(Eck (2003), 116.) While Drusus marriage to Antonia was considered an unbreakable affair, Vipsania was only the daughter of the late Agrippa from his first marriage.(File:Augustuksen mauseleomi.JPG|thumb|of AugustusTiberius shared in Augustus tribune powers as of 6 BC, but shortly thereafter went into retirement, reportedly wanting no further role in politics while he exiled himself to Rhodes.((Gruen (2005), 46.) Although no specific reason is known for his departure, it could have been a combination of reasons, including a failing marriage with Julia.(( It could very well have been from feelings of jealousy and being left out since Augustus young grandchildren-turned-sons, Gaius and Lucius, joined the college of priests at an early age, were presented to spectators in a more favorable light, and were introduced to the army in Gaul.(Eck (2003), 117118.)(Gruen (2005), 4647.) After the early deaths of both Lucius and Gaius in AD 2 and 4 respectively, and the earlier death of his brother Drusus (9 BC), Tiberius was recalled to Rome in June AD 4, where he was adopted by Augustus on the condition that he, in turn, adopt his nephew Germanicus.(Eck (2003), 119.) This continued the tradition of presenting at least two generations of heirs.( In that year, Tiberius was also granted the powers of a tribune and proconsul, emissaries from foreign kings had to pay their respects to him, and by 13 was awarded with his second triumph and equal level of imperium with that of Augustus.(Eck (2003), 119120.) The only other possible claimant as heir was Postumus Agrippa, who had been exiled by Augustus in AD 7, his banishment made permanent by senatorial decree, and Augustus officially disowned him.( He certainly fell out of Augustus favor as an heir; the historian Erich S. Gruen notes various contemporary sources that state Postumus Agrippa was a vulgar young man, brutal and brutish, and of depraved character.(Gruen (2005), 49.) Postumus Agrippa was murdered at his place of exile either shortly before or after the death of Augustus.On 19 August AD 14, Augustus died while visiting the place of his fathers death at Nola, and Tiberiuswho was present alongside Livia at Augustus deathbedwas named his heir.(Eck (2003), 123.) Augustus famous last words were, Have I played the part well? Then applaud as I exitreferring to the play-acting and regal authority that he had put on as emperor. Publicly, though, his last words were, Behold, I found Rome of clay, and leave her to you of marble. An enormous funerary procession of mourners traveled with Augustus body from Nola to Rome, and on the day of his burial all public and private businesses closed for the day.( Tiberius and his son Drusus delivered the eulogy while standing atop two rostra.(Eck (2003), 124.) Coffin-bound, Augustus body was cremated on a pyre close to his mausoleum. It was proclaimed that Augustus joined the company of the gods as a member of the Roman pantheon.( In 410, during the Sack of Rome, the mausoleum was despoiled by the Goths and his ashes scattered.The historian D.C.A. Shotter states that Augustus policy of favoring the Julian family line over the Claudian might have afforded Tiberius sufficient cause to show open disdain for Augustus after the latters death; instead, Tiberius was always quick to rebuke those who criticized Augustus.(Shotter (1966), 210212.) Shotter suggests that Augustus deification, coupled with Tiberius extremely conservative attitude towards religion, obliged Tiberius to suppress any open resentment he might have harbored.(Shotter (1966), 211.) Also, the historian R. Shaw-Smith points to letters of Augustus to Tiberius which display affection towards Tiberius and high regard for his military merits.( Shotter states that Tiberius focused his anger and criticism on Asinius Gallus (for marrying Vipsania after Augustus forced Tiberius to divorce her) as well as the two young Caesars Gaius and Lucius, instead of Augustus, the real architect of his divorce and imperial demotion.(LegacyAugustus reign laid the foundations of a regime that lasted for nearly fifteen hundred years through the ultimate decline of the Western Roman Empire and until the of Constantinople in 1453. Both his adoptive surname, Caesar, and his title Augustus became the permanent titles of the rulers of Empire for fourteen centuries after his death, in use both at Old Rome and at New Rome. In many languages, caesar became the word for emperor, as in the German Kaiser and in the Bulgarian and subsequently Russian Tsar. The cult of Divus Augustus continued until the state religion of the Empire was changed to Christianity in 391 by I. Consequently, there are many excellent statues and busts of the first emperor. He had composed an account of his achievements, the Gestae Divi Augusti, to be inscribed in bronze in front of his mausoleum.(Suetonius, Augustus 101.4.) Copies of the text were inscribed throughout the Empire upon his death.(Eck (2003), 12) The inscriptions in Latin featured translations in Greek beside it, and were inscribed on many public edifices, such as the temple in Ankara dubbed the Monumentum Ancyranum, called the queen of inscriptions by historian Mommsen.(Eck (2003), 2.) There are a few known written works by Augustus that have survived. This includes his poems Sicily, Epiphanus, and Ajax, an autobiography of 13 books, a philosophical treatise, and his written rebuttal to Brutus Eulogy of Cato.(Bunson (1994), 47.) However, historians are able to analyze existing letters penned by Augustus to others for additional facts or clues about his personal life.(Shaw-Smith (1971), 213.)(Bourne (1918), 5366.)Many consider Augustus to be Romes greatest emperor; his policies certainly extended the Empires life span and initiated the celebrated Pax Romana or Pax Augusta. He was intelligent, decisive, and a shrewd politician, but he was not perhaps as charismatic as Caesar, and was influenced on occasion by his third wife, Livia (sometimes for the worse). Nevertheless, his legacy proved more enduring. The city of Rome was utterly transformed under Augustus, with Romes first institutionalized police force, fighting force, and the establishment of the municipal prefect as a permanent office.( The police force was divided into cohorts of 500 men each, while the units of firemen ranged from 500 to 1,000 men each, with 7 units assigned to 14 divided city sectors.( A praefectus vigilum, or Prefect of the Watch was put in charge of the vigiles, Romes fire brigade and police.(Bunson (1994), 345.) With Romes civil wars at an end, Augustus was also able to create a army for the Roman Empire, fixed at a size of 28 legions of about 170,000 soldiers.(Eck (2003), 8587.) This was supported by numerous auxiliary units of 500 soldiers each, often recruited from recently conquered areas.(Eck (2003), 86.) With his finances securing the maintenance of roads throughout Italy, Augustus also installed an official courier system of relay stations overseen by a military officer known as the praefectus vehiculorum.( Besides the advent of swifter communication amongst Italian polities, his extensive building of roads throughout Italy also allowed Romes armies to march swiftly and at an unprecedented pace across the country.(Chisholm (1981), 122.) In the year 6 Augustus established the aerarium militare, donating 170 million sesterces to the new military treasury that provided for both active and retired soldiers.(Bunson (1994), 6.) One of the most lasting institutions of Augustus was the establishment of the Guard in 27 BC, originally a personal bodyguard unit on the battlefield that evolved into an imperial guard as well as an important political force in Rome.(Bunson (1994), 341.) They had the power to intimidate the Senate, install new emperors, and depose ones they disliked; the last emperor they served was Maxentius, as it was I who disbanded them in the early 4th century and destroyed their barracks, the Praetoria.(Bunson (1994), 341342.)File:Augustus-in-Kalabsha.jpg|thumb|upright|left|Augustus in an Egyptian-style depiction, a stone carving of the Kalabsha Temple in NubiaAlthough the most powerful individual in the Roman Empire, Augustus wished to embody the spirit of Republican virtue and norms. He also wanted to relate to and connect with the concerns of the plebs and lay people. He achieved this through various means of generosity and a cutting back of lavish excess. In the year 29 BC, Augustus paid 400 sesterces each to 250,000 citizens, 1,000 sesterces each to 120,000 veterans in the colonies, and spent 700 million sesterces in purchasing land for his soldiers to settle upon.( He also restored 82 different temples to display his care for the Roman pantheon of deities.(Eder (2005), 23.) In 28 BC, he melted down 80 silver statues erected in his likeness and in honor of him, an attempt of his to appear frugal and modest.(The longevity of Augustus reign and its legacy to the Roman world should not be overlooked as a key factor in its success. As Tacitus wrote, the younger generations alive in AD 14 had never known any form of government other than the Principate.(Tacitus, Annals I.3) Had Augustus died earlier (in 23 BC, for instance), matters might have turned out differently. The attrition of the civil wars on the old Republican oligarchy and the longevity of Augustus, therefore, must be seen as major contributing factors in the transformation of the Roman state into a facto monarchy in these years. Augustus own experience, his patience, his tact, and his political acumen also played their parts. He directed the future of the Empire down many lasting paths, from the existence of a standing professional army stationed at or near the frontiers, to the dynastic principle so often employed in the imperial succession, to the embellishment of the capital at the emperors expense. Augustus ultimate legacy was the peace and prosperity the Empire enjoyed for the next two centuries under the system he initiated. His memory was enshrined in the political ethos of the Imperial age as a paradigm of the good emperor. Every emperor of Rome adopted his name, Caesar Augustus, which gradually lost its character as a name and eventually became a title.( The Augustan era poets Virgil and Horace praised Augustus as a defender of Rome, an upholder of moral justice, and an individual who bore the brunt of responsibility in maintaining the empire.(Kelsall (1976), 120.) However, for his rule of Rome and establishing the principate, Augustus has also been subjected to criticism throughout the ages. The contemporary Roman jurist Antistius Labeo (d. AD 10/11), fond of the days of pre-Augustan republican liberty in which he had been born, openly criticized the Augustan regime.(Starr (1952), 5.) In the beginning of his Annals, the Roman historian Tacitus (c. 56c.117) wrote that Augustus had cunningly subverted Republican Rome into a position of slavery.( He continued to say that, with Augustus death and swearing of loyalty to Tiberius, the people of Rome simply traded one slaveholder for another.( Tacitus, however, records two contradictory but common views of Augustus:According to the second opposing opinion:In a recent biography on Augustus, Anthony Everitt asserts that through the centuries, judgments on Augustus reign have oscillated between these two extremes but stresses that:Tacitus was of the belief that Nerva (r. 9698) successfully mingled two formerly alien ideas, principate and liberty.(Starr (1952), 6.) The 3rd century historian Cassius Dio acknowledged Augustus as a benign, moderate ruler, yet like most other historians after the death of Augustus, Dio viewed Augustus as an autocrat.( The poet Annaeus Lucanus (AD 3965) was of the opinion that Caesars victory over Pompey and the fall of the Younger (95 BC46 BC) marked the end of traditional liberty in Rome; historian Chester G. Starr, Jr. writes of his avoidance of criticizing Augustus, perhaps Augustus was too sacred a figure to accuse directly.(The Anglo-Irish writer Swift (16671745), in his Discourse on the Contests and Dissentions in Athens and Rome, criticized Augustus for installing tyranny over Rome, and likened what he believed Britains virtuous monarchy to Romes moral Republic of the 2nd century BC.(Kelsall (1976), 118.) In his criticism of Augustus, the admiral and historian Thomas Gordon (16581741) compared Augustus to the puritanical tyrant Cromwell (15991658).( Thomas Gordon and the French political philosopher Montesquieu (16891755) both remarked that Augustus was a coward in battle.(Kelsall (1976), 119.) In his Memoirs of the Court of Augustus, the Scottish scholar Thomas Blackwell (17011757) deemed Augustus a Machiavellian ruler, a bloodthirsty vindicative usurper, wicked and worthless, a mean spirit, and a tyrant.(Revenue reformsFile:AugustusCoinPudukottaiHoardIndia.jpg|thumb|Coin of Augustus found at the Pudukottai hoard, from an Tamil country, Kingdom of present day Nadu in India. MuseumAugustus public revenue reforms had a great impact on the subsequent success of the Empire. Augustus brought a far greater portion of the Empires expanded land base under consistent, direct taxation from Rome, instead of exacting varying, intermittent, and somewhat arbitrary tributes from each local province as Augustus predecessors had done.( This reform greatly increased Romes net revenue from its territorial acquisitions, stabilized its flow, and regularized the financial relationship between Rome and the provinces, rather than provoking fresh resentments with each new arbitrary exaction of tribute.(Eck (2003), 8384.) The measures of taxation in the reign of Augustus were determined by population census, with fixed quotas for each province.(Bunson (1994), 404.) Citizens of Rome and Italy paid indirect taxes, while direct taxes were exacted from the provinces.( Indirect taxes included a 4% tax on the price of slaves, a 1% tax on goods sold at auction, and a 5% tax on the inheritance of estates valued at over 100,000 sesterces by persons other than the of kin.(File:AugustusIndianImitation1stCenturyCE.jpg|thumb|left|Indian imitation of a coin of Augustus. 1st century. MuseumAn equally important reform was the abolition of private farming, which was replaced by salaried civil service tax collectors. Private contractors that raised taxes had been the norm in the Republican era, and some had grown powerful enough to influence the amount of votes for politicians in Rome.( The tax farmers had gained great infamy for their depredations, as well as great private wealth, by winning the right to tax local areas.( Romes revenue was the amount of the successful bids, and the tax farmers profits consisted of any additional amounts they could forcibly wring from the populace with Romes blessing. Lack of effective supervision, combined with tax farmers desire to maximize their profits, had produced a system of arbitrary exactions that was often barbarously cruel to taxpayers, widely (and accurately) perceived as unfair, and very harmful to investment and the economy.File:HymiariteKingdomAugustusImitation1stCenturyCE.jpg|thumb|Coin of the Himyarite Kingdom, southern coast of the peninsula. This is also an imitation of a coin of Augustus. 1st centuryThe use of Egypts immense land rents to finance the Empires operations resulted from Augustus conquest of Egypt and the shift to a Roman form of government.(Bunson (1994), 144.) As it was effectively considered Augustus private property rather than a province of the Empire, it became part of each succeeding emperors patrimonium.(Bunson (1994), 144145.) Instead of a legate or proconsul, Augustus installed a prefect from the equestrian class to administer Egypt and maintain its lucrative seaports; this position became the highest political achievement for any equestrian besides becoming Prefect of the Praetorian Guard.(Bunson (1994), 145.) The highly productive agricultural land of Egypt yielded enormous revenues that were available to Augustus and his successors to pay for public works and military expeditions,( as well as bread and circuses for the population of Rome.Month of AugustThe month of August (Latin: Augustus) is named after Augustus; until his time it was called Sextilis (named so because it had been the sixth month of the original calendar and the Latin word for six is sex). Commonly repeated lore has it that August has 31 days because Augustus wanted his month to match the length of Caesars July, but this is an invention of the 13th century scholar de Sacrobosco. Sextilis in fact had 31 days before it was renamed, and it was not chosen for its length (see calendar). According to a senatus consultum quoted by Macrobius, Sextilis was renamed to honor Augustus because several of the most significant events in his rise to power, culminating in the fall of Alexandria, fell in that month.(Macrobius, Saturnalia 1.12.35.)Building projectsFile:RomaAraPacisDecorazioneVegetale.jpg|thumb|Close up on the sculpted detail of the Pacis (Altar of Peace), 13 BC to 9 BCOn his deathbed, Augustus boasted I found a Rome of bricks; I leave to you one of marble. Although there is some truth in the literal meaning of this, Dio asserts that it was a metaphor for the Empires strength.(Dio 56.30.3) Marble could be found in buildings of Rome before Augustus, but it was not extensively used as a building material until the reign of Augustus.(  Although this did not apply to the Subura slums, which were still as rickety and fire-prone as ever, he did leave a mark on the monumental topography of the centre and of the Martius, with the Pacis (Altar of Peace) and monumental sundial, whose central gnomon was an obelisk taken from Egypt.(Eck (2003), 122.) The relief sculptures decorating the Ara Pacis visually augmented the written record of Augustus triumphs in the Res Gestae.(Bunson (1994), 32.) Its reliefs depicted the imperial pageants of the praetorians, the Vestals, and the citizenry of Rome.(  He also built the of Caesar, the of Agrippa, and the of Augustus with its of Mars Ultor. Other projects were either encouraged by him, such as the Theatre of Balbus, and Agrippas construction of the Pantheon, or funded by him in the name of others, often relations (e.g. Portico of Octavia, of Marcellus). Even his of Augustus was built before his death to house members of his family.(Eck (2003), 118121) To celebrate his victory at the Battle of Actium, the Arch of Augustus was built in 29 BC near the entrance of the of Castor and Pollux, and widened in 19 BC to include a triple-arch design.( There are also many buildings outside of the city of Rome that bear Augustus name and legacy, such as the Theatre of Merida in modern Spain, the Carre built at Nmes in todays southern France, as well as the of Augustus at Turbie, located near Monaco.Temple of Augustus and Livia in Vienne, late 1st century BCAfter the death of Agrippa in 12 BC, a solution had to be found in maintaining Romes water supply system. This came about because it was overseen by Agrippa when he served as aedile, and was even funded by him afterwards when he was a private citizen paying at his own expense.(Eck (2003), 79.) In that year, Augustus arranged a system where the Senate designated three of its members as prime commissioners in charge of the water supply and to ensure that Romes aqueducts did not fall into disrepair.( In the late Augustan era, the commission of five senators called the curatores locorum publicorum iudicandorum (translated as Supervisors of Public Property) was put in charge of maintaining public buildings and temples of the state cult.(  Augustus created the senatorial group of the curatores viarum (translated as Supervisors for Roads) for the upkeep of roads; this senatorial commission worked with local officials and contractors to organize regular repairs.(Eck (2003), 81.)The order of architectural style originating from ancient Greece was the dominant architectural style in the age of Augustus and the imperial phase of Rome.(Bunson (1994), 34.) Suetonius once commented that Rome was unworthy of its status as an imperial capital, yet Augustus and Agrippa set out to dismantle this sentiment by transforming the appearance of Rome upon the classical Greek model.(Physical appearanceThe biographer Suetonius describes Augustus outward appearance as follows: He was unusually handsome ... He had clear, bright eyes ... His teeth were wide apart, small, and ill-kept; his hair was slightly curly and inclining to golden; his eyebrows met. His ears were of moderate size, and his nose projected a little at the top and then bent ever so slightly inward. His complexion was between dark and fair. He was short of stature ...(Suetonius, Augustus 79, translated by J. C. Rolfe.)AncestryAncestors of Augustus DescendantsAugustus only child was his daughter.:1. Julia Caesaris, 39 BC  AD 14, had five children;::A. Gaius Julius Caesar, 20 BC  AD 4, died without issue::B. Vipsania Julia (Julia the Younger), 19 BC  AD 28, had two children;:::I. Lepida (fiancee of Claudius), 4 BC  AD 53, had five children;::::a. Junius Silanus Torquatus, 14  54, had one child;:::::i. Junius Silanus Torquatus the younger, 5066, died young::::b. Calvina, 1579, died without issue::::c. Junius Silanus Torquatus, d. 64 without issue::::d. Junius Silanus Torquatus the elder, d. 49 without issue::::e. Lepida, ca 1865, issue unknown:::II. Unnamed illegitimate son (by Decimus Junius Silanus), d. AD 8 (ordered to be exposed by Augustus)::C. Lucius Julius Caesar, 17 BC  AD 2, died without issue::D. Vipsania Agrippina II (Agrippina the Elder), 14 BC  AD 33, had six children;:::I. Nero Julius Caesar, 630, died without issue:::II. Drusus Julius Caesar, 733, died without issue:::III. Gaius Julius Caesar, bef. AD 12 - bef. AD 12 (CIL 06, 00889):::IV. Gaius Julius Caesar (Caligula), 1241, had one child;::::a. Drusilla, 3941, died young:::V. Julia Agrippina, 1559, had one child;::::a. Nero Claudius Caesar (Lucius Domitius Ahenobarbus), 3768, had one child;:::::i. Augusta, Jan. 63  April 63; died young:::VI. Julia Drusilla, 1638, died without issue:::VII. Livilla, 1842, died without issue:::VIII. Tiberius Julius Caesar, ? - ? (either born before Caesar, between Caesar and Gaius Caesar (Caligula) or between Gaius Caesar (Caligula) and Agrippina)(CIL 06, 00888):::?IX. Son (name unknown), ? - ? (CIL 06, 00890)::E. Postumus, 12 BC  AD 14, died without issue Bibliography * Ando, Clifford, Imperial ideology and provincial loyalty in the Roman Empire, University of California Press, 2000.* Bivar, A.D.H. (1983). The Political History of Iran Under the Arsacids, in The Cambridge History of Iran (Vol 3:1), 2199. Edited by Ehsan Yarshater. London, New York, New Rochelle, Melbourne, and Sydney: Cambridge University Press. ISBN 978-0-521-20092-9.* Blackburn, Bonnie & Holford-Strevens, Leofranc. (1999). The Oxford Companion to the Year. Oxford University Press. Reprinted with corrections 2003.* Bourne, Ella. Augustus as a Letter-Writer, Transactions and Proceedings of the American Philological Association (Volume 49, 1918): 5366.* * Brosius, Maria. (2006). The Persians: An Introduction. London & New York: Routledge. ISBN 978-0-415-32089-4 (hbk).* Bunson, Matthew. (1994). of the Roman Empire. New York: Facts on File Inc. ISBN 978-0-8160-3182-5* Chisholm, Kitty and John Ferguson. (1981). Rome: The Augustan Age; A Source Book. Oxford: Oxford University Press, in association with the Open University Press. ISBN 978-0-19-872108-6* Dio, Cassius. (1987) The Roman History: The Reign of Augustus. Translated by Ian Scott-Kilvert. London: Penguin Books. ISBN 978-0-14-044448-3.* Davies, Mark; Swain, Hilary; Davies, Mark Everson, Aspects of Roman history, 82 BC-AD 14: a source-based approach, Taylor & Francis e-Library, 2010.* Eck, Werner; translated by Deborah Lucas Schneider; new material by Sarolta A. Takcs. (2003) The Age of Augustus. Oxford: Blackwell Publishing (hardcover, ISBN 978-0-631-22957-5; paperback, ISBN 978-0-631-22958-2).* Eder, Walter. (2005). Augustus and the Power of Tradition, in The Cambridge Companion to the Age of Augustus (Cambridge Companions to the Ancient World), ed. Karl Galinsky, 1332. Cambridge, MA; New York: Cambridge University Press (hardcover, ISBN 978-0-521-80796-8; paperback, ISBN 978-0-521-00393-3).* Everitt, Anthony (2006) Augustus: The Life of Romes First Emperor. Random House Books. ISBN 1-4000-6128-8.* * Gruen, Erich S. (2005). Augustus and the Making of the Principate, in The Cambridge Companion to the Age of Augustus (Cambridge Companions to the Ancient World), ed. Karl Galinsky, 3351. Cambridge, MA; New York: Cambridge University Press (hardcover, ISBN 978-0-521-80796-8; paperback, ISBN 978-0-521-00393-3).* Holland, Richard, Augustus, Godfather of Europe, Sutton Publishing, 2005.* Kelsall, Malcolm. Augustus and Pope, The Huntington Library Quarterly (Volume 39, Number 2, 1976): 117131.* * Raaflaub, Kurt A.; Toher, Mark, Between republic and empire: interpretations of Augustus and his principate, University of California Press, 1993.* Scott, Kenneth. The Political Propaganda of 4430 B.C. Memoirs of the American Academy in Rome, Vol. 11, (1933), pp. 749.* ** Rowell, Henry Thompson. (1962). The Centers of Civilization Series: Volume 5; Rome in the Augustan Age. Norman: University of Oklahoma Press. ISBN 978-0-8061-0956-5* Shaw-Smith, R. A Letter from Augustus to Tiberius, Greece & Rome (Volume 18, Number 2, 1971): 213214.* Shotter, D.C.A. Tiberius and the Spirit of Augustus, Greece & Rome (Volume 13, Number 2, 1966): 207212.* Southern, Pat. (1998). Augustus. London: Routledge. ISBN 978-0-415-16631-7.* Starr, Chester G., Jr. The Perfect Democracy of the Roman Empire, The American Historical Review (Volume 58, Number 1, 1952): 116.* * Wells, Colin Michael, The Roman Empire, Harvard University Press, 2004.See also* literature (ancient Rome)* poetry* Edict* Comet* Maecenas* Octavian (Rome character)* trade and relations* family tree* (gens)* of AugustusReferencesFootnotesCitationsFurther reading* Bleicken, Jochen. (1998). Augustus. Eine Biographie. Berlin.** Galinsky, Karl. Augustan Culture. Princeton, NJ: Princeton University Press, 1998 (paperback, ISBN 978-0-691-05890-0).** Lewis, P. R. and G. D. B. Jones, Roman gold-mining in north-west Spain, Journal of Roman Studies 60 (1970): 16985* Jones, R. F. J. and Bird, D. G., Roman gold-mining in north-west Spain, II: Workings on the Rio Duerna, Journal of Roman Studies 62 (1972): 5974.* Jones, A.H.M. The Imperium of Augustus, The Journal of Roman Studies, Vol. 41, Parts 1 and 2. (1951), pp. 112119.* Jones, A.H.M. Augustus. London: Chatto & Windus, 1970 (paperback, ISBN 978-0-7011-1626-2).** Osgood, Josiah. Caesars Legacy: Civil War and the Emergence of the Roman Empire. New York: Cambridge University Press (USA), 2006 (hardback, ISBN 978-0-521-85582-2; paperback, ISBN 978-0-521-67177-4).* Raaflaub, Kurt A. & Toher, Mark (eds.). Between Republic and Empire: Interpretations of Augustus and His Principate. Berkeley; Los Angeles: University of California Press, 1993 (paperback, ISBN 978-0-520-08447-6).* Reinhold, Meyer. The Golden Age of Augustus (Aspects of Antiquity). Toronto, ON: Univ. of Toronto Press, 1978 (hardcover, ISBN 978-0-89522-007-3; paperback, ISBN 978-0-89522-008-0).* Roebuck, C. (1966). The World of Ancient Times. New York: Charles Scribners Sons.** Southern, Pat. Augustus (Roman Imperial Biographies). New York: Routledge, 1998 (hardcover, ISBN 978-0-415-16631-7); 2001 (paperback, ISBN 978-0-415-25855-5).* Zanker, Paul. The Power of Images in the Age of Augustus (Thomas Spencer Jerome Lectures). Ann Arbor, MI: University of Michigan Press, 1989 (hardcover, ISBN 978-0-472-10101-6); 1990 (paperback, ISBN 978-0-472-08124-0).External links;Primary sources* Cassius Dios Roman History: Books 4556, English translation* Gallery of the Ancient Art: August* Humor of Augustus* Life of Augustus by of Damascus, English translation* Suetonius biography of Augustus, Latin text with English translation* The Res Gestae Divi Augusti (The Deeds of Augustus, his own account: complete Latin and Greek texts with facing English translation)* The Via Iulia Augusta: road built by the Romans; constructed on the orders of Augustus between the 1312 B.C.;Secondary source material* Augustusshort biography at the BBC* Brown, F. The Achievements of Augustus Caesar, Clio History Journal, 2009.* Augustus Caesar and the Pax Romanaessay by Steven Kreis about Augustuss legacy* De Imperatoribus Romanisarticle about Augustus at Garrett G. Fagans online encyclopedia of Roman Emperors* Octavian / Augustuspages by Yong-Ling OwPLACE OF DEATHNolaOctavianusals:Augustus()Augustoas:AugustuAvqustzh-min-nan:AugustusAugustusbar:Augustusbo:Augustus(impalaer)ca:Augustceb:Augustocs:Augustuscy:Augustusda:Augustusde:Augustuset:AugustusAugustoCezaroAugustofa:hif:Augustusfo:Augustusfr:AugusteOktavianusga:gastasAugustogan:hak:O-k-s-tko:hr:Augustid:OctavianusAugustois:gstusit:Augustojv:Augustuskn:sw:Augustoku:AugustusIulius Caesar Octavianus Augustuslv:Oktavinslt:Augustas(imperador roman)Octavianus Caesar Augustusml:mr:()ms:Augustusmy:Caesar Augustusja:nap:Augustono:Augustusav Romarriketoc:Augustpnb:nds:AugustusAugustpt:AugustoAvgustAugustrm:AugustusKaisarasq:AugustusAugustusimple:AugustusAugustusAvgust Oktavijan(rimski car)su:Octavianusfi:Augustussv:AugustusAugustota:th:Divi Filius AugustusAwgustur:vi:Augustusfiu-vro:Augustusgussezh-classical:war:Augustusyi:yo:Augustuszh-yue:bat-smg:Augostszh:
1354
Andes
The Andes is the worlds longest continental range. It is a continual range of highlands along the western coast of America. This range is about  long, about  to  wide (widest between 18 degrees South and 20 degrees South latitude), and of an average height of about .Along its length, the Andes is split into several ranges, which are  separated by intermediate depressions. The Andes is the location of several high plateaux  some of which host major cities such as Quito, Bogot, Arequipa, Medelln, Sucre, and Paz.The so-called Altiplano plateau is the worlds second-highest plateau following the plateau. The Andes extend from north to south through seven South American countries; Argentina, Bolivia, Chile, Colombia, Ecuador, Peru and Venezuela.The Andes range is the worlds highest mountain range outside of the continent of Asia. The highest peak, Mt. Aconcagua, rises to an elevation of about  above level. The peak of Mt. Chimborazo in the Ecuadorean Andes is farther from the centre of the Earth than any other location on the Earths surface. This is because of the bulge that results from the Earths rotation. The worlds highest volcanoes are in the Andes, including del Salado on the Chile-Argentina frontier which rises to 6,893 m (22,615 ft), and over 50 other volcanoes that rise above 6,000 m.NameThe etymology of the word Andes has been debated. The major consensus is that it derives from the Quechua word anti, which means high crest. Others believe that Andes comes from Suyu, one of the four regions of the Inca empire. It is more likely however that the word Antisuyo derives from the use of Anti to designate mountain chains. Derivation from the Spanish andn (in the sense of cultivation terrace) has also been proposed, yet considered very unlikely.Geographythumb|Aerial view of Aconcagua.The Andes can be divided into three sections: I. The Southern Andes in Argentina and Chile;II. The Central Andes, including the Chilean and Peruvian cordilleras and parts of Bolivia;III. The Northern Andes in Venezuela, Colombia, and Ecuador that consists of two parallel ranges, the Cordillera Occidental and the Cordillera Oriental. In Colombia, north of its the border with Ecuador, the Andes split in three parallel ranges, the western, central, and eastern ranges. (The cordillera occidental, central, and oriental).In the northern part of the Andes, the isolated Nevada de Santa Marta range is often considered to be part of the Andes. The eastern range of Colombia is the only one that extends to Venezuela.(Andes travel map) The term cordillera comes from the Spanish word meaning cuerda, meaning rope. The Andes range is about  wide throughout its length, except in the Bolivian flexure where it is about  wide. The islands of the Dutch Caribbean Aruba, Bonaire, and Curaao, which lie in the Sea off the coast of Venezuela, were thought to represent the submerged peaks of the extreme northern edge of the Andes range, but ongoing geological studies indicate that such a simplification does not do justice to the complex tectonic boundary between the South-American and Caribbean plates.()GeologyThe Andes are a Mesozoic  Tertiary orogenic belt of mountains along the Ring of Fire, a zone of activity that encompasses the Pacific rim of the Americas as well as the Asia-Pacific region. The Andes are the result of tectonics processes, caused by the subduction of crust beneath the American plate. The main cause of the rise of the Andes is the compression of western rim of the American Plate due to the subduction of the Plate and the Plate. To the east, the Andes range is bounded by several basins such as Orinoco, Basin, Madre de Dios and Chaco which separates the Andes from the ancient cratons in eastern South America. In the south the Andes shares a long boundary with the former Patagonia Terrane. To the west, the Andes end at the Ocean, although the trench can be considered its ultimate western limit. From a geographical approach the Andes are considered to have their western boundaries marked by the appearance of coastal lowlands and a less rugged topography.OrogenyThe western rim of the American Plate has been the place of several pre-Andean orogenies since at least the  of the late Proterozoic and early Paleozoic when several terranes and microcontinents collided and amalgamated with the ancient cratons of eastern South America, by then the South American part of Gondwana.The formation of the modern Andes began with the events of the Triassic when Pangea began to break up and several rifts developed. It continued through the Jurassic Period. It was during the Cretaceous Period that the Andes began to take its present form, by the uplifting, faulting and folding of sedimentary and rocks of the ancient cratons to the east. The rise of the Andes has not been constant and different regions have had different degrees of tectonic stress, uplift, and erosion.Tectonic forces above the zone along the entire west coast of South America where the Plate and a part of the Plate are sliding beneath the American Plate continue to produce an ongoing orogenic event resulting in minor to major earthquakes and eruptions to this day. In the extreme south a major fault separates del Fuego from the small Plate. Across the  wide Passage lie the mountains of the Peninsula south of the Scotia Plate which appear to be a continuation of the Andes chain.VolcanismImage:Browncanyonquilotoa.jpg|thumb|valley near Quilotoa, Ecuador.thumb|Astronaut photograph with the high plains of the Andes Mountains in the foreground, with a line of young volcanoes facing the much lower Atacama Desert.The Andes range has many active volcanoes, which are distributed in four volcanic zones separated by areas of inactivity. The Andean volcanism is a result of subduction of the Plate and Plate underneath the American Plate. The belt is subdivided into four main volcanic zones that are separated from each other by volcanic gaps. The volcanoes of the belt are diverse in terms of activity style, products and morphology. While some differences can be explained by which volcanic zone a volcano belongs to, there are significant differences inside volcanic zones and even between neighboring volcanoes. Despite being a type location for calc-alkalic and subduction volcanism, the Andean Volcanic Belt has a large range of volcano-tectonic settings, such as rift systems and extrensional zones, transpressional faults, subduction of ridges and seamount chains apart from a large range on crustal thicknesses and magma ascent paths, and different amount of crustal assimilations.Ore deposits and evaporitesThe Andes mountains host large ore and salt deposits and some of its eastern and thrust belt acts as traps for commercially exploitable amounts of hydrocarbons. In the forelands of the desert some of the largest copper mineralizations occurs making Chile and Peru the 1st and 2nd largest exporters of copper in the world. Porphyry copper in the western slopes of the Andes has been generated by hydrothermal fluids (mostly water) during the cooling of plutons or volcanic systems.  The porphyry mineralization further benefited from the dry climate that let them largely out of the disturbing actions of water. The dry climate in the central western Andes have also led to the creation of extensive saltpeter deposits which were extensively mined until the invention of synthetic nitrates. Yet another result of the dry climate are the salars of Atacama and Uyuni, the first one being the largest source of lithium at present day and the second the worlds largest reserve of the element. Early Mesozoic and Neogene plutonism in Bolivias Cordillera Central created the Bolivian tin belt as well as the famous, now depleted, deposits of Rico de Potos.Climate and hydrologythumb|Central Andesthumb|Astronaut photograph of the Central AndesThe climate in the Andes varies greatly depending on location, altitude, and proximity to the sea. Temperature, atmospheric pressure and humidity decrease in higher elevations. The southern section is rainy and cool, the central Andes are dry. The northern Andes are typically rainy and warm, with an average temperature of  in Colombia. The climate is known to change drastically in rather short distances. Rainforests exist just miles away from the snow covered peak Cotopaxi. The mountains have a large effect on the temperatures of nearby areas. The line depends on the location. It is at between 4,500 and 4,800 m (14,800&ndash;15,800 ft) in the tropical Ecuadorian, Colombian, Venezuelan, and northern Peruvian Andes, rising to 4,800&ndash;5,200 m (15,800&ndash;17,060 ft) in the drier mountains of southern Peru south to northern Chile south to about 30S, then descending to  on Aconcagua at 32S,  at 40S,  at 50S, and only  in del Fuego at 55S; from 50S, several of the larger glaciers descend to sea level.()The Andes of Chile and Argentina can be divided in two climatic and glaciological zones; the Andes and the Andes. Since the Dry Andes extends from the latitudes of Desert to the area of River, precipitation is more sporadic and there are strong temperature oscillations. The line of equilibrium may shift drastically over short periods of time, leaving a whole glacier in the ablation area or in the accumulation area.In the high Andes of central Chile and Province glaciers are larger and more common than glaciers; this is due to the high exposure to radiation.(Jan-Christoph Otto, Joachim Gtz, Markus Keuschnig, Ingo Hartmeyer, Dario Trombotto, and Lothar Schrott (2010). Geomorphological and geophysical investigation of a complex rock glacier system - Morenas Coloradas valley (Cordon del Plata, Mendoza, Argentina))FloraThe Andean region cuts across several natural and floristc regions due to is large extension from Caribbean Venezuela to cold, windy and wet Horn passing trough hyperarid Desert. Rainforests used to encircle much of the northern Andes but are now greatly diminished, especially in the Choc and inter-Andean valleys of Colombia. As a direct opposite of the humid Andean slopes are the relatively dry Andean slopes in most of western Peru, Chile and Argentina. Along with several Valles, they are typically dominated by deciduous woodland, shrub and xeric vegetation, reaching the extreme in the slopes near the virtually lifeless Desert.About 30,000 species of plants live in the Andes with roughly half being endemic to the region, surpassing the diversity of any other hotspot.( The small tree pubescens, a source of quinine which is used to treat malaria, is found widely in the Andes as far south as Bolivia. Other important crops that originated from the Andes are tobacco and potatoes. The high-altitude Polylepis forests and woodlands are found in the Andean areas of Colombia, Ecuador, Peru, Bolivia and Chile. These trees, by locals referred to as Queua, Yagual and other names, can be found at altitudes of  above sea level. It remains unclear if the patchy distribution of these forests and woodlands is natural, or the result of clearing which began during the Incan period. Regardless, in modern times the clearance has accelerated, and the trees are now considered to be highly endangered, with some believing that as little as 10% of the original woodland remains.()FaunaImage:Tunki Tanpupata.jpg|thumb|A male Cock-of-the-rock, a species found in humid Andean forests.Image:Ausangate-hillside-MT.jpg|thumb|Herds of alpacas on the mountain Ausangate hillside.The Andes is rich in fauna: With almost 3,500 species, of which roughly 2/3 are endemic to the region, the Andes is the most important region in the world for amphibians.(Tropical Andes - biodiversityhotspots.org)The diversity of animals in the Andes is high, with almost 600 species of mammals (13% endemic), more than 1,700 species of birds (about 1/3 endemic), more than 600 species of reptile (about 45% endemic), and almost 400 species of fish (about 1/3 endemic).(The Vicua and Guanaco can be found living in the Altiplano, while the closely related domesticated Llama and Alpaca are widely kept by locals as animals and for their meat and wool. The nocturnal chinchillas, two threatened members of the rodent order, inhabit the Andes alpine regions. The Condor, the largest bird of its kind in the Hemisphere, occurs throughout much of the Andes but generally in very low densities. Other animals found in the relatively open habitats of the high Andes include the huemul, cougar, foxes in the genus Pseudalopex, and, for birds, certain species of tinamous (notably members of the genus Nothoprocta), Goose, Coot, flamingos (mainly associated with hypersaline lakes),  Rhea, Flicker, Sandpiper-plover, miners, sierra-finches and diuca-finches.Titicaca hosts several endemics, among them the highly endangered Flightless Grebe and Water Frog. A few species of hummingbirds, notably some hillstars, can be seen at altitudes above , but far higher diversities can be found at lower altitudes, especially in the humid Andean forests (forests) growing on slopes in Colombia, Ecuador, Peru, Bolivia and far northwestern Argentina. These forest-types, which includes the Yungas and parts of the Choc, are very rich in flora and fauna, although few large mammals exists, exceptions being the threatened Tapir, Bear and Woolly Monkey.Birds of humid Andean forests include mountain-toucans, quetzals and the Cock-of-the-rock, while species flocks dominated by tanagers and Furnariids commonly are seen - in contrast to several vocal but typically cryptic species of wrens, tapaculos and antpittas.A number of species such as the Cinclodes and Tit-spinetail  are associated with Polylepis, and consequently also threatened.Human activitythumb|Map showing cultural influence in the Andes.The Andes mountains form a north-south axis of cultural influences. A long series of cultural development culminated in the expansion of the civilization and Empire in the central Andes during the 15th century. The Incas formed this civilization through imperialistic militarism as well as careful and meticulous governmental management.(DAltroy, Terence N. The Incas. Blackwell Publishing, 2003) The government sponsored the construction of aqueducts and roads in addition to preexisting installations. Some of these constructions are still in existence today.Devastated by European diseases to which they had no immunity, and civil wars, in 1532 the Incas were defeated by an alliance composed of tens of thousands allies from nations they had subjugated (e.g. Huancas, Chachapoyas, Caaris) and a small army of 180 Spaniards led by Pizarro. One of the few Inca sites the Spanish never found in their conquest was Picchu, which lay hidden on a peak on the eastern edge of the Andes where they descend to the Amazon. The main surviving languages of the Andean peoples are those of the Quechua and language families. Parish and Barclay Pentland surveyed a large part of the Bolivian Andes from 1826 to 1827.In modern times, the largest Andean cities are Colombia, with a population of about eight million, Paz, Bolivia, and Ecuador.TransportationImage:Carretera transandina.jpg|thumb|Troncal 7 (Highway) in the Venezuelan Andes.Several major cities exist either in the Andes or in the foothills, among which are Bogot and Colombia; Ecuador; Venezuela; Paz, Bolivia; Chile, and Peru. These and most other cities and large towns are now connected with asphalt-paved roads, while smaller towns are often connected by dirt roads, which may require a four-wheel-drive vehicle.(The rough terrain has historically put the costs of building highways and railroads that cross the Andes out of reach of most neighboring countries, even with modern engineering practices. For example, the main cross over the Andes between Argentina and Chile is still accomplished through the Internacional Los Libertadores, and only recently the ends of some highways that came rather close to one another from the east and the west have been connected(). Much of the transportation of passengers is done via airline.For decades, Chile claimed ownership of land on the eastern side of the Andes. However, these claims were given up in about 1870 during the of the Pacific between Chile, and the allied Bolivia and Peru, in a diplomatic deal to keep Argentina out of the war. The Army and Navy defeated the combined forces of Bolivia and Peru, and Chile took over Bolivias only province on the Pacific Coast, and some land from Peru, also - that was returned to Peru later. Bolivia has been a landlocked country ever since then.However, if Chile had kept some land to  the east, the difficulties in transportation between east and west would have been enormous. There has also been bad blood between Bolivia and Chile ever since 1870, and these two countries have not had diplomatic relations since about 1974.Because of the tortuous terrain in places, villages and towns in which  vehicles are of little use are still present. Locally, the relatives of the camel, the llama and the alpaca continue to carry out important uses as pack animals, but this use has generally diminished in modern times.Agriculturethumb|Photograph of young Peruvian farmers sowing maize and beans.The ancient peoples of the Andes such as the Incas have practised irrigation techniques for over 6,000 years. Because of the mountain slopes, terracing has been a common practice. Terracing, however, was only extensively employed after Incan imperial expansions to fuel their expanding realm. The potato holds a very important role as an internally consumed staple crop. Maize was also an important crop for these people. However, they were mainly used for the production of the culturally important chicha. Currently, tobacco, cotton and coffee are the main export crops. Coca, despite eradication programmes in some countries, remains an important crop for legal local use in a mildly stimulating tea, and, both controversially and illegally, for the production of cocaine.MiningThe Andes rose to fame for its mineral wealth during the Spanish conquest of South America. Although Andean Amerindian peoples crafted ceremonial jewelry of gold and other metals the mineralizations of the Andes were first mined in large scale after the Spanish arrival. Potos in present-day Bolivia was one of the principal mines of the Spanish Empire in the New World. de la Plata and Argentina derive their names from the silver of Potos.Currently, mining in the Andes of Chile and Peru place these countries as the 1st and 3rd major producers of copper in the world. The Bolivian Andes produce principally tin although historically silver mining had a huge impact on the economy of 17th century Europe.There is a long history of mining in the Andes, from the Spanish silver mines in Potos in the 16th century to the vast current copper deposits of Chuquicamata and Escondida in Chile and Toquepala in Peru. Other metals including iron, gold and tin in addition to non-metallic resources are also important.PeaksThis list contains some of the major peaks in the Andes mountain range. The highest peak is Aconcagua of Argentina (see below).Argentina* Aconcagua, * Bonete, * Galn, * Mercedario, * Pissis, Image:Cerro tronador desde lago mascardi 01b.jpg|Tronador, Argentina/ChileBorder between Argentina and Chile* Cerro Bayo, * Chaltn,  or 3,405 m, Patagonia, also known as Cerro Fitz Roy* Escorial, * del Azufre, * Azufre, * Incahuasi, * Lastarria, * Llullaillaco, * Maipo, * Marmolejo, * del Salado, * Olca, * Nevada de Lagunas Bravas, * Socompa, * Tres Cruces, 6,749 m (south summit) (III Region)* Tronador, * Tupungato, * Nacimiento, Image:andes - punta arenas.jpg|del Paine, ChileImage:Llullaillaco.jpg|Llullaillaco, Argentina/ChileFile:Camino de Alta.jpg|Camino de Alta Montaa, Argentina/ChileBolivia* Ancohuma, * Cabaray, * Chacaltaya, * Potos, * Illampu, * Illimani, * de Larancagua, * de Pacuni, * Anallajsi, * Sajama, * Pata, * Sabaya, Image:Nevado Sajama.jpg|SajamaImage:Huayna Potos La Paz - Bolivia.jpg|PotosBorder between Bolivia and Chile* Acotango, * Minchincha, * Irruputuncu, * Licancabur, * Olca, * Parinacota, * Paruma, * Pomerape, Image:Laguna Verde Bolivia.jpg|Licancabur, Bolivia/ChileImage:Parinacota.jpg|ParinacotaChile* San Valentin, * Cerro Paine Grande, c.* Mac, c.* Darwin, c.* Hudson, c.* Castillo Dynevor, c.* Tarn, c.* Polleras, Image:Stgo Abril.jpg|Santiago de Chile on the western slopes of a snowcapped AndesImage:Cuernos del Paine from Lake Peho.jpg|View of Cuernos del Paine in del Paine National ParkColombia* Cristbal Coln, * del Huila, * del Ruiz, * del Tolima, * Pico Pan de Azucar, * Ritacuba Negra, * Nevado del Cumbal, * Negro de Mayasquer, * Blanco, * del Quindo, * Purace, * Santa Isabel, * Juana, * Galeras, * Azufral. Image:Ritacuba-blanco.jpg|Ritacuba blanco the highest peak of Cordillera Oriental, Colombia.Image:Nevado del Ruiz by Edgar.png|del Ruiz, ColombiaEcuador* Antisana, * Cayambe, * Chimborazo, * Corazn, * Cotopaxi, * Altar, * Illiniza, * Pichincha, * Quilotoa, * Reventador, * Sangay, * Tungurahua, * Titicacha, Image:Volcn Chimborazo, El Taita Chimborazo.jpg|Chimborazo near Riobamba, Ecuador.Image:Volcn Tungurahua.jpg|Tungurahua Ecuador.Image:EL CAYAMBE DESDE EL AVION.JPG|Cayambe, Ecuador.Image:Volcn El Altar - Riobamba Ecuador.jpg|Volcn Altar - Riobamba - EcuadorPeru* Alpamayo, * Artesonraju, * Carnicero, * Misti, * El Toro, * Huandoy, * Huascarn, * Jirishanca, * de Huaytapallana, * Pumasillo, * Rasac, * Rondoy, * Sarapo, * Norte, * Grande, * Yerupaja, * Chico, Image:Alpamayo.jpg|Alpamayo, PeruImage:El misti.jpg|Misti, PeruImage:Nevadohuandoy.jpg|Huandoy, PeruVenezuela* Bolvar, * Humboldt, * Bonpland, * La Concha, * Piedras Blancas, Image:Bolvar usgs.jpg|Bolvar, VenezuelaFile:Pico Humboldt.jpg|Humboldt, VenezuelaSee also*Geology - a journal*line*(god)*Cordillera Mountains in the Philippines*Mountain Passes of the AndesNotesReferences*John Biggar, The Andes: A Guide For Climbers, 3rd. edition, 2005, ISBN 0-9536087-2-7* Tui de Roy, The Andes: As the Condor Flies. 2005, ISBN 1-55407-070-8* Fjelds, J., & N. Krabbe (1990). The Birds of the High Andes. Zoological Museum, University of Copenhagen, Copenhagen. ISBN 87-88757-16-1* Fjelds, J. & M. Kessler. 1996. Conserving the biological diversity of Polylepis woodlands of the highlands on Peru and Bolivia, a contribution to sustainable natural resource management in the Andes. NORDECO, Copenhagen.External links*Andes geology (University of Arizona)*Climate and animal life of the Andes*Regions and Microclimates in the Andes*http://www.peaklist.org/WWlists/ultras/southamerica.html Complete list of mountains in South America with a prominence of at least af:Andesar:an:Andesast:AndesdalarSoa-mehbe:be-x-old:bar:Andnbs:Andibr:Andobg:ca:Andescs:Andycy:Andesda:Andesbjergenede:Andenet:Andidel:de los Andeseo:Andojeu:Andeak()hif:Andesfo:Andesfjlldes Andesfy:AndeshAindisna h-Andesgl:Andesgan: hr:Andeio:Andiid:Andesia:Andesos:is:Andesfjllit:Andejv:Andeskrc:ka:sw:Andesla:Andeslv:Andilb:Andenlt:Andailij:Andeslmo:Andehu:Andokmk:ml:mr:arz:Gunung Andesde ls Andesnl:Andesne:ja:no:Andesnn:Andesoc:Andespnb:pms:Andepl:Andydos AndesCordilieriqu:Antikunarue:ru:sq:Andetscn:Andisimple:Andessk:Andysl:Andisr:sh:Andefi:Anditsv:Andernatl:Andesth:Dalartk:Andlaruk: vi:Andesfiu-vro:Andiqwar:Andesyi:zh-yue:bat-smg:Andzh:
1372
Amber
Wood resin, the source of amberAmber is fossilized tree resin (not sap), which has been appreciated for its color and natural beauty since Neolithic times.( Amber is used as an ingredient in perfumes, as a healing agent in folk medicine, and as jewelry. There are five classes of amber, defined on the basis of their chemical constituents. Because it originates as a soft, sticky tree resin, amber sometimes contains animal and plant material as inclusions. Amber occurring in coal seams is also called resinite, and the term ambrite is applied to that found specifically within New Zealand coal seams. (Poinar GO, Poinar R. The quest for life in amber. Basic Books, 1995, ISBN 0201489287, p. 133)History and etymologyThe English word amber derives from the Arabic anbar, via Medieval Latin ambar and Old French ambre. The word originally referred to a precious oil derived from the whale (now called ambergris). The sense was extended to fossil resin circa 1400, and this became the main sense as the use of ambergris waned.() The two substances were confused because they both were found washed up on beaches. Ambergris is less dense than water and floats; whereas amber is less dense than stone, but too dense to float.(see: Abu Zaid al Hassan from Siraf & Sulaiman the Merchant (851), Silsilat-al-Tawarikh (travels in Asia).) The word ambar was brought to Europe by the Crusaders. In French ambre gris was then distinguished from ambre jaune: ambre gris (gray amber) was ambergris; ambre jaune (yellow amber) was the fossil resin we now call amber.Amber is discussed by Theophrastus, possibly the first historical mention of the material, in the 4th century BC. The Greek name for amber was    (electron) and was connected to the Sun God, one of whose titles was Elector or the Awakener.() The modern terms electricity and electron derive from the Greek word for amber and come from William Gilberts research showing that amber could attract other substances.() The word electron was coined in 1891 by the Irish physicist George Stoney whilst analyzing elementary charges for the first time.()()The presence of insects in amber was noticed by the Elder in his Historia, and led him to theorize correctly that, at some point, amber had to be in a liquid state to cover the bodies of insects. Hence he gave it the expressive name of succinum or gum-stone, a name that is still in use today to describe acid as well as succinite, a term given to a particular type of amber by Dwight Dana (see below under Baltic Amber).Heating amber will soften it and eventually it will burn, which is why in languages the word for amber is a literal translation of burn-Stone (nl. barnsteen, de. Bernstein, the latter of which the Polish word bursztyn derives from). Heated above 200C, amber suffers decomposition, yielding an oil of amber, and leaving a black residue which is known as amber colophony, or amber pitch; when dissolved in oil of turpentine or in oil this forms amber varnish or amber lac. Amber from the Sea has been extensively traded since antiquity and in the main land, from where amber was traded 2000 years ago, the natives called it glaes (referring to its see-through similarity to glass). The Baltic Lithuanian term for amber is Gintaras and Latvian Dzintars. They and the Slavic jantar are thought to originate from Phoenician jainitar (sea-resin). However, while most Slavic languages, such as Russian and Czech, retain the old Slavic word, in the Polish language, despite still being correct, jantar is used very rarely (even considered archaic) and was replaced by the word bursztyn deriving from the German analogue.Composition and formationAmber is heterogeneous in composition, but consists of several resinous bodies more or less soluble in alcohol, ether and chloroform, associated with an insoluble bituminous substance. Amber is a macromolecule by free polymerization of several precursors in the labdane family, e.g. communic acid, cummunol, and biformene.(Manuel Villanueva-Garca, Antonio Martnez-Richa, and Juvencio Robles Assignment of vibrational spectra of labdatriene derivatives and ambers: A combined experimental and density functional theoretical study Arkivoc (EJ-1567C) pp. 449458) These labdanes are diterpenes (C20H32) and trienes, equipping the organic skeleton with three alkene groups for polymerization. As amber matures over the years, more polymerization takes place as well as isomerization reactions, crosslinking and cyclization.The average composition of amber leads to the general formula C10H16O.FormationMolecular polymerization, resulting from high pressures and temperatures produced by overlying sediment, transforms the resin first into copal. Sustained heat and pressure drives off terpenes and results in the formation of amber.()Botanical originFossil resins from Europe fall into two categories, the famous Baltic ambers and another that resembles the Agathis group. Fossil resins from the Americas and Africa are closely related to the modern genus Hymenaea,()while Baltic ambers are thought to be fossil resins from Sciadopityaceae family plants that used to live in north Europe.()InclusionsThe abnormal development of resin has been called succinosis. Impurities are quite often present, especially when the resin dropped on to the ground, so that the material may be useless except for varnish-making, whence the impure amber is called firniss. Enclosures of pyrites may give a bluish color to amber. The so-called black amber is only a kind of jet. Bony amber owes its cloudy opacity to minute bubbles in the interior of the resin.In darkly clouded and even opaque amber, inclusions can be imaged using high-energy, high-contrast, high-resolution X-rays.()Extraction and processing Distribution and mining Amber is globally distributed, mainly in rocks of Cretaceous age or younger.Historically, the coast around Knigsberg in Prussia was the worlds leading source of amber. About 90% of the worlds extractable amber is still located in the Oblast of Russia on the Baltic Sea (which was previously Knigsberg in Prussia, before World War II).(Amber Trade and the Environment in the Kaliningrad Oblast)Pieces of amber torn from the seafloor are cast up by the waves, and collected by hand, dredging, or diving. Elsewhere, amber is mined, both in open works and underground galleries. Then nodules of blue earth have to be removed and an opaque crust must be cleaned off, which can be done in revolving barrels containing sand and water. Erosion removes this crust from sea-worn amber.Dominican amber, especially Dominican blue amber, is mined through pitting, which is dangerous due to the risk of tunnel collapse.(Wilfred Wichard und Wolfgang Weitschat: Im Bernsteinwald.  Gerstenberg Verlag, Hildesheim, 2004, ISBN 3-8067-2551-9)TreatmentThe Vienna amber factories, which use pale amber to manufacture pipes and other smoking tools, turn it on a lathe and polish it with whitening and water or with stone and oil. The final lustre is given by friction with flannel.When gradually heated in an oil-bath, amber becomes soft and flexible. Two pieces of amber may be united by smearing the surfaces with oil, heating them, and then pressing them together while hot. Cloudy amber may be clarified in an oil-bath, as the oil fills the numerous pores to which the turbidity is due. Small fragments, formerly thrown away or used only for varnish, are now used on a large scale in the formation of amberoid or pressed amber. The pieces are carefully heated with exclusion of air and then compressed into a uniform mass by intense hydraulic pressure; the softened amber being forced through holes in a metal plate. The product is extensively used for the production of cheap jewelry and articles for smoking. This pressed amber yields brilliant interference colors in polarized light. Amber has often been imitated by other resins like copal and kauri, as well as by celluloid and even glass. Baltic amber is sometimes colored artificially, but also called true amber.AppearanceAmber occurs in a range of different colors. As well as the usual yellow-orange-brown that is associated with the color amber, amber itself can range from a whitish color through a pale lemon yellow, to brown and almost black. Other more uncommon colors include red amber (sometimes known as cherry amber), green amber, and even amber, which is rare and highly sought after.Much of the most highly-prized amber is transparent, in contrast to the very common cloudy amber and opaque amber. Opaque amber contains numerous minute bubbles. This kind of amber is known as bony amber.Although all amber is fluorescent, the rarest Dominican amber is amber. It turns blue in natural sunlight and any other partially or wholly ultraviolet light source. In long-wave UV light it has a very strong reflection, almost white. Only about 100 kg is found per year, which makes it valuable and expensive.()Sometimes amber retains the form of drops and stalactites, just as it exuded from the ducts and receptacles of the injured trees. It is thought that, in addition to exuding onto the surface of the tree, amber resin also originally flowed into hollow cavities or cracks within trees, thereby leading to the development of large lumps of amber of irregular form.ClassificationAmber can be classified into several forms. Most fundamentally, there are two types of plant resin with the potential for fossilization. Terpenoids, produced by conifers and angiosperms, consist of ring structures formed of isoprene (C5H8) units.( Phenolic resins are today only produced by angiosperms, and tend to serve functional uses. The extinct medullosans produced a third type of resin, which is often found as amber within their veins.( The composition of resins is highly variable; each species produces a unique blend of chemicals which can be identified by the use of pyrolysisgas chromatographymass spectrometry.( The overall chemical and structural composition is used to divide ambers into five classes.()( There is also a separate classifications of amber gemstones, according to the way of production.Class IThis class is by far the most abundant. It comprises labdatriene carboxylic acids such as communic or ozic acids.( It is further split into three sub-classes. Classes Ia and Ib utilise regular labdanoid diterpenes (e.g. communic acid, communol, biformenes), whilst Ic uses enantio labdanoids (ozic acid, ozol, enantio biformenes).()IaIncludes Succinite ( normal Baltic amber) and Glessite.( Have a communic acid base. They also include much succinic acid.(amber yields on dry distillation succinic acid, the proportion varying from about 3% to 8%, and being greatest in the pale opaque or bony varieties. The aromatic and irritating fumes emitted by burning amber are mainly due to this acid. Baltic amber is distinguished by its yield of succinic acid, hence the name succinite. Succinite has a hardness between 2 and 3, which is rather greater than that of many other fossil resins. Its specific gravity varies from 1.05 to 1.10. It can be distinguished from other ambers via spectroscopy due to a specific carbonyl absorption peak. IR spectroscopy can detect the relative age of an amber sample. Succinic acid may not be an original component of amber, but rather a degradation product of abietic acid.()IbLike class Ia ambers, these are based on communic acid; however, they lack acid.(IcThis class is mainly based on enantio-labdatrienonic acids, such as ozic and zanzibaric acids.( Its most familiar representative is Dominican amber.(Dominican amber differentiates itself from amber by being mostly transparent and often containing a higher number of fossil inclusions. This has enabled the detailed reconstruction of the ecosystem of a long-vanished tropical forest.(George Poinar, Jr. and Roberta Poinar, 1999. The Amber Forest: A Reconstruction of a Vanished World, (Princeton University Press) ISBN 0-691-02888-5) Resin from the extinct species protera is the source of Dominican amber and probably of most amber found in the tropics. It is not succinite but retinite.(Grimaldi, D. A.: Amber  Window to the Past.  American Museum of Natural History, New York 1996)Class IIThese ambers are formed from resins with a sesquiterpenoid base, such as cadinene.(Class IIIThese ambers are polystyrenes.(Class IVThis class is something of a wastebasket; its ambers are not polymerized, but mainly consist of cedrane-based sesquiterpenoids.(Class VClass V resins are considered to be produced by a pine or pine relative. They comprise a mixture of diterpinoid resins and n-alkyl compounds. Their type mineral is highgate copalite.()Classification of Baltic amber (succinite) gemstones by the International Amber Association*Natural Baltic amber  gemstone which has undergone mechanical treatment only (for instance: grinding, cutting, turning or polishing) without any change to its natural properties*Modified Baltic amber  gemstone subjected only to thermal or high-pressure treatment, which changed its physical properties, including the degree of transparency and color, or shaped under similar conditions out of one nugget, previously cut to the required size.*Reconstructed (pressed) Baltic amber  gemstone made of Baltic amber pieces pressed in high temperature and under high pressure without additional components.*Bonded Baltic amber  gemstone consisting of two or more parts of natural, modified or reconstructed Baltic amber bonded together with the use of the smallest possible amount of a colorless binding agent necessary to join the pieces.Geological recordThe oldest amber recovered dates to the Upper Carboniferous period ().()() Its chemical composition makes it difficult to match the amber to its producers  it is most similar to the resins produced by plants.(There are no flowering plant fossils until the Cretaceous, and they were not common until the Cretaceous.) Amber becomes abundant long afterwards, in the Cretaceous, ,( when it is found in association with insects. The oldest amber with arthropod inclusions comes from the Middle East from Lebanon and Jordan (Kaddumi, 2007; Azar, 2000). This amber is roughly 133 million years old and is considered of high scientific value. Many remarkable insects and spiders were recently discovered in the amber of Jordan (Kaddumi, 2007) including the oldest zorapterans, clerid beetles, umenocoleid roaches, and achiliid planthoppers.Baltic amber or succinite (historically documented as Prussian amber) is found as irregular nodules in marine glauconitic sand, known as blue earth, occurring in the Lower Oligocene strata of Samland in Prussia (Latin: Sambia), in historical sources also referred to as Glaesaria. After 1945 this territory around Knigsberg was turned into Oblast, Russia, where it is now systematically mined.() It appears, however, to have been partly derived from yet earlier Tertiary deposits (Eocene); and it occurs also as a derivative phase in later formations, such as drift. Relics of an abundant flora occur as inclusions trapped within the amber while the resin was yet fresh, suggesting relations with the flora of Eastern Asia and the southern part of America. Gppert named the common amber-yielding pine of the Baltic forests Pinites succiniter, but as the wood does not seem to differ from that of the existing genus it has been also called Pinus succinifera. It is improbable, however, that the production of amber was limited to a single species; and indeed a large number of conifers belonging to different genera are represented in the amber-flora.Paleontological significanceAmber is a unique preservational mode, preserving otherwise unfossilizable parts of organisms; as such it is helpful in the reconstruction of ecosystems and organisms.(BBC  Radio 4  Amber. Db.bbc.co.uk. Retrieved on 2011-04-23.)The chemical composition of the resin is, unfortunately, of limited utility in reconstructing the phylogenetic affinity of the resin producer.(Amber sometimes contains animals or plant matter that became caught in the resin as it was secreted. Insects, spiders and their webs, annelids, frogs,() crustaceans, bacteria and amoebae,() marine microfossils,() wood, flowers and fruit, hair, feathers and other small organisms have been recovered in ambers dating to .(UseAmber has been used since antiquity in the manufacture of jewelry and ornaments, and also in medicine. Amber also forms the flavoring for akvavit liquor. Amber has been used as an ingredient in perfumes.JewelryAmber has been used since the stone age, from 13,000 years ago.( Amber ornaments have been found in Mycenaean tombs and elsewhere across Europe. To this day it is used in the manufacture of smoking and glassblowing mouthpieces.()() Ambers place in culture and tradition lends it a tourism value; Amber Museum is dedicated to the mineral.Historic medicinal usesAmber has long been used in medicine for its purported healing properties. Amber and extracts were used from the time of Hippocrates in ancient Greece for a wide variety of treatments through the Ages and up until the early twentieth century.Scent of amber and amber perfumeryIn ancient China it was customary to burn amber during large festivities. If amber is heated under the right conditions, of amber is produced, and in past times this was combined carefully with acid to create artificial musk  a resin with a peculiar musky odor.(Amber as an aphrodisiac) Although when burned, amber does give off a characteristic pinewood fragrance, modern products, such as perfume, do not normally use actual amber. This is due to the fact that fossilized amber produces very little scent. In perfumery, scents referred to as amber are often created and patented(Saturated indane derivatives and processes for producing same, Ernst T. Thermer, p. 1 , , issue date 1972)(Perfume compositions and perfume articles containing one isomer of an octahydrotetramethyl acetonaphthone, John B. Hall, Rumson; James Milton Sanders, Eatontown , Publication Date: 30 December 1975)to emulate the opulent golden warmth of the fossil.(Sorcery of Scent: Amber: A perfume myth. Sorceryofscent.blogspot.com (2008-07-30). Retrieved on 2011-04-23.) The modern name for amber is thought to come from the Arabic word, ambar, meaning ambergris.( Ambergris is the waxy aromatic substance created in the intestines of sperm whales and was used in making perfumes both in ancient times as well as modern. The scent of amber was originally derived from emulating the scent of ambergris and/or labdanum but due to the endangered status of the sperm whale the scent of amber is now largely derived from labdanum.() The term amber is loosely used to describe a scent that is warm, musky, rich and honey-like, and also somewhat oriental and earthy. It can be synthetically created or derived from natural resins. When derived from natural resins it is most often created out of labdanum. Benzoin is usually part of the recipe. Vanilla and cloves are sometimes used to enhance the aroma.Amber perfumes may be created using combinations of labdanum, resin, copal (itself a type of tree resin used in incense manufacture), vanilla, resin and/or synthetic materials.(See also* of types of amber* Ammolite* Copal* of amber* Road* Room* Pearl* coralReferences;Attribution*External links*Farlang many full text historical references on Amber Theophrastus, Frederick Kunz, and special on amber.* IPS Publications on amber inclusions International Paleoentomological Society: Scientific Articles on amber and its inclusions* Webmineral on Amber Physical properties and mineralogical information* Mindat Amber Image and locality information on amber* NY Times 40 million year old extinct bee in Dominican amberaf:Barnsteenar:an:Ambreast:mbaraz:Khrbabe:bs:ilibarbg:ca:Ambrecs:Jantarcy:Ambrda:Ravde:Bernsteinet:Merevaikel:es:mbareo:Sukcenoeu:Anbarfa:fr:Ambregl:mbar()hr:Jantario:Sucinoid:Ambaris:Raf(resina)he:csb:Jantrkk:ku:Karbanla:Sucinumlv:Dzintarslt:Gintarasli:Barnsjt(raza)(svny)my:nah:pozonallinl:Barnsteenja:no:Ravnn:Ravnds:Barnsteenpl:Bursztynpt:mbarro:Chihlimbarru:simple:Ambersk:Jantrsl:Jantarsr:sh:Jantarfi:Meripihkasv:Brnstentl:Amberta:th:tr:Kehribaruk:phchyi:zh:
1445
Acacia
Acacia ( or ) is a genus of shrubs and trees belonging to the subfamily Mimosoideae of the family Fabaceae, first described in Africa by the Swedish botanist Linnaeus in 1773. Many non-Australian species tend to be thorny, whereas the majority of Australian acacias are not. They are pod-bearing, with sap and leaves typically bearing large amounts of tannins and tannins that historically in many species found use as pharmaceuticals and preservatives.The generic name derives from  (akakia), the name given by early Greek botanist-physician Dioscorides (ca. 40-90) to the medicinal tree A. nilotica in his book Materia Medica.() This name derives from the Greek word for its characteristic thorns,  (akis, thorn).() The species name nilotica was given by Linnaeus from this trees best-known range along the Nile river.Acacias are also known as thorntrees, thorns or wattles, including the yellow-fever acacia and umbrella acacias.The genus Acacia previously contained roughly 1300 species, about 960 of them native to Australia, with the remainder spread around the tropical to warm-temperate regions of both hemispheres, including Europe, Africa, southern Asia, and the Americas. However, in 2005 the genus was divided into five separate genera. The name Acacia was retained for the majority of the Australian species and a few in tropical Asia, Madagascar and Islands. Most of the species outside Australia, and a small number of Australian species, were reclassified into Vachellia and Senegalia. The two final genera, Acaciella and Mariosousa, only contain about a dozen species from the Americas each. Classification File:Acacia pycnantha Golden Wattle.jpg|thumb|left|pycnanthaFile:Acacia-berlandieri-flowers4.jpg|thumb|right|berlandieriFile:Acacia smallii 2.jpg|thumb|right|smalliiThe traditional circumscription of the genus Acacia is not monophyletic. This discovery has led to the breaking up of Acacia into five genera as discussed in: of Acacia species. At the 17th Botanical Congress in Vienna, 2005, the much debated re-typification of the genus with an Australian species (which was validated by the 18th IBC in Melbourne, 2011) most of the traditional acacias of Africa are now treated in the genera Vachellia and Senegalia, while some of the American species are placed in Acaciella and Mariosousa. The majority of species still treated in the genus Acacia are confined to Australia.In common parlance, the term acacia is occasionally misapplied to species of the genus Robinia, which also belongs in the pea family. pseudoacacia, an American species locally known as Black Locust, is sometimes called false acacia in cultivation in the Kingdom. Geography The southernmost species in the genus are dealbata (Silver Wattle), longifolia (Coast Wattle or Sydney Golden Wattle), mearnsii (Black Wattle), and melanoxylon (Blackwood), reaching 4330 S in Tasmania, Australia, while caven (Espinillo Negro) reaches nearly as far south in northeastern Province of Argentina. Australian species are usually called wattles, while African and American species tend to be known as acacias.File:Acacia melanoxylon2.jpg|thumb|left|retinodesalbida, tortilis and Acacia iraqensis can be found growing wild in the Sinai desert and the Jordan valley. It is found in the savanna vegetation of the tropical continental climate. It grows wild in Montserrat West Indies; there it is locally referred to as cusha. Description The leaves of acacias are compound pinnate in general. In some species, however, more especially in the Australian and islands species, the leaflets are suppressed, and the leaf-stalks (petioles) become vertically flattened, and serve the purpose of leaves. These are known as phyllodes. The vertical orientation of the phyllodes protects them from intense sunlight, as with their edges towards the sky and earth they do not intercept light so fully as horizontally placed leaves. A few species (such as glaucoptera) lack leaves or phyllodes altogether, but possess instead cladodes, modified leaf-like photosynthetic stems functioning as leaves.File:Acacia dealbata.jpg||thumb|right|dealbataThe small flowers have five very small petals, almost hidden by the long stamens, and are arranged in dense globular or cylindrical clusters; they are yellow or cream-colored in most species, whitish in some, even purple (Acacia purpureapetala) or red (leprosa Scarlet Blaze). Acacia flowers can be distinguished from those of a large related genus, Albizia,  by their stamens which are not joined at the base. Also, unlike individual Mimosa flowers, those of Acacia have more than 10 stamens.()The plants often bear spines, especially those species growing in arid regions. These sometimes represent branches which have become short, hard and pungent, or sometimes leaf-stipules. armata is the Kangaroo-thorn of Australia and erioloba is the Camelthorn of Africa.Acacia seeds can be difficult to germinate. Research has found that immersing the seeds in various temperatures (usually around 80 C) and manual seed coat chipping can improve yields to approximately 80 percent.()SymbiosisFile:Acacia collinsii3.jpg|thumb|right|collinsii stipulesIn the American sphaerocephala, cornigera, and collinsii (collectively known as the bullthorn acacias), the large thorn-like stipules are hollow and afford shelter for several species of Pseudomyrmex ants, which feed on a secretion of sap on the leaf-stalk and small, lipid-rich food-bodies at the tips of the leaflets called Beltian bodies. In return, the ants add protection to the plant against herbivores.()  Some species of ants will also fight off competing plants around the acacia, cutting off the offending plants leaves with their jaws and ultimately killing it. Other associated ant species appear to do nothing to benefit their hosts.Similar mutualisms with ants occur on Acacia trees in Africa, such as the Thorn acacia. The acacias provide shelter for ants in the hollow stipules and nectar in extrafloral nectaries for their symbiotic ants such as mimosae. In turn, the ants protect the plant by attacking large mammalian herbivores and stem-boring beetles that damage the plant. Pests In Australia, Acacia species are sometimes used as food plants by the larvae of hepialid moths of the genus Aenetus including A. ligniveren. These burrow horizontally into the trunk then vertically down. Other Lepidoptera larvae which have been recorded feeding on Acacia include Brown-tail, Endoclita malabaricus and Moth. The leaf-mining larvae of some bucculatricid moths also feed on Acacia: Bucculatrix agilis feeds exclusively on horrida and Bucculatrix flexuosa feeds exclusively on nilotica.Acacias contain a number of compounds that defend them from pests and grazing animals.(Chemistry of Acacias from South Texas) Uses  Food uses File:Hauxya Botana.jpg|thumb|Acacia seed pods, also known as Guajes, served as part of a botana in Oaxaca, Mexico.File:AcaciaSeeds.JPG|thumb|Acacia seeds in the Negev, Israel.seeds are often used for food and a variety of other products.In Burma, Laos and Thailand, the feathery shoots of Acacia pennata (common name cha-om,  and su pout ywet in Burmese) are used in soups, curries, omelettes, and stir-fries.In Mexico the seeds are known as Guajes.  Guajes or huajes are the flat, green pods of an acacia tree. The pods are sometimes light green or deep red in colorboth taste the same. Guaje seeds are about the size of a small lima bean and are eaten raw with guacamole, sometimes cooked and made into a sauce. They can also be made into fritters. The ground seeds are used to impart a slightly garlicy flavor to a mole called guaxmole (huaxmole). The dried seeds may be toasted and salted and eaten as a snack referred to as cacalas.The predominantly herbivorous spider kiplingi, which is found in Central America and Mexico, feeds on nubs at the tips of the acacia leaves, known as Beltian bodies, which contain high concentrations of protein.  These nubs are produced by the acacia as part of a symbiotic relationship with certain species of ant, which also eat them.(Meehan, Christopher J.; Olson, Eric J.; Curry, Robert L. (21 August 2008): Exploitation of the PseudomyrmexAcacia mutualism by a predominantly vegetarian jumping spider (Bagheera kiplingi). The 93rd ESA Annual Meeting.)Acacia is listed as an ingredient in Drop, Fresca, a citrus drink, Cola, Barqs beer, Full Throttle Unleaded Drink, Strawberry-Lemonade Powerade(Powerade Ion4 Sports Drink, B Vitamin Enhanced, Strawberry Lemonade | Wegmans) as well as in Lkerol pastille candies, Altoids mints, Langers Pineapple coconut Juice, Wrigleys Eclipse gum and M&Ms Pretzel.Honey labeled under the term Acacia Honey is a type of honey produced by bees from a false acacia known as locust in North America, but called by the misnomer  acacia in Europe, hence this liquid honey which practically doesnt crystallize does not come from true acacias.GumVarious species of acacia yield gum. True arabic is the product of senegal, abundant in dry tropical West Africa from Senegal to northern Nigeria.arabica is the gum-Arabic tree of India, but yields a gum inferior to the true gum-Arabic.File:Acacia covenyi02.jpg||thumb|left|covenyiMedicinal usesMany Acacia species have important uses in traditional medicine. Most of the uses have been shown to have a scientific basis since chemical compounds found in the various species have medicinal effects.In medicine, nilotica is considered a remedy that is helpful for treating ejaculation.A 19th century Ethiopian medical text describes a potion made from an Ethiopian species of Acacia (known as grar) mixed with the root of the tacha, then boiled, as a cure for rabies.(Richard Pankhurst, An Introduction to the Medical History of Ethiopia (Trenton: Red Sea Press, 1990), p. 97)An astringent medicine high in tannins, called catechu or cutch, is procured from several species, but more especially from catechu, by boiling down the wood and evaporating the solution so as to get an extract.(An OCRd version of the US Dispensatory by Remington and Wood, 1918. )Ornamental usesA few species are widely grown as ornamentals in gardens; the most popular perhaps is dealbata (Silver Wattle), with its attractive glaucous to silvery leaves and bright yellow flowers; it is erroneously known as mimosa in some areas where it is cultivated, through confusion with the related genus Mimosa.Another ornamental acacia is xanthophloea (Fever Tree).Southern European florists use Acacia baileyana, Acacia dealbata, Acacia pycnantha and Acacia retinodes as cut flowers and the common name there for them is mimosa.(World Wide Wattle)Ornamental species of acacia are also used by homeowners and architects for security. The sharp thorns of some species deter unauthorized persons from entering private properties, and may prevent break-ins if planted under windows and near drainpipes. The aesthetic characteristics of acacia plants, in conjunction with their home security qualities, makes them a considerable alternative to artificial fences and walls.PaintsThe ancient Egyptians used Acacia in paints.(Excerpt from A Consumers Dictionary of Cosmetic Ingredients: Fifth Edition (Paperback) Amazon.com)PerfumeFile:Acaciafarnesiana1web.jpg|thumb|left|farnesianafarnesiana is used in the perfume industry due to its strong fragrance. The use of Acacia as a fragrance dates back centuries.Symbolism and ritualThe Acacia is used as a symbol in Freemasonry, to represent purity and endurance of the soul, and as funerary symbolism signifying resurrection and immortality. The tree gains its importance from the description of the burial of Abiff, the builder of King Solomons Temple in Jerusalem.Several parts (mainly bark, root and resin) of Acacia are used to make incense for rituals. Acacia is used in incense mainly in India, Nepal, and China including in its Tibet region. Smoke from Acacia bark is thought to keep demons and ghosts away and to put the gods in a good mood. Roots and resin from Acacia are combined with rhododendron, acorus, cytisus, salvia and some other components of incense. Both people and elephants like an alcoholic beverage made from acacia fruit.(Naturheilpraxis Fachforum (German) )According to Eastons Bible Dictionary, the Acacia tree may be the burning bush (Exodus 3:2) which Moses encountered in the desert.(Eastons Bible Dictionary: Bush)  Also, when God gave Moses the instructions for building the Tabernacle, he said to make an ark  and a table of acacia wood (Exodus 25:10 & 23, Standard Version)In Russia, Italy and other countries it is customary to present women with yellow mimosas (among other flowers) on Womens Day (March 8). These mimosas are actually from dealbata (Silver Wattle).TanninFile:Bottle of tannic acid.jpg|thumb|right|A bottle of acid.The bark of various Australian species, known as wattles, is very rich in tannin and forms an important article of export; important species include pycnantha (Golden Wattle), decurrens (Tan Wattle), dealbata (Silver Wattle) and mearnsii (Black Wattle).Black Wattle is grown in plantations in Africa. Most Australian acacia species introduced to South Africa have become an enormous problem, due to their naturally aggressive propagation. The pods of nilotica (under the name of neb-neb), and of other African species are also rich in tannin and used by tanners.WoodFile:Starr 030405-0092 Acacia koa.jpg||thumb|right|koa WoodFile:Acacia Negev.JPG|thumb|right|Acacia tree near the end of its range in the Negev Desert of southern Israel.Some Acacia species are valuable as timber, such as melanoxylon (Blackwood) from Australia, which attains a great size; its wood is used for furniture, and takes a high polish; and Acacia omalophylla (Myall Wood, also Australian), which yields a fragrant timber used for ornaments. seyal is thought to be the Shittah-tree of the Bible, which supplied shittim-wood. According to the of Exodus, this was used in the construction of the of the Covenant. Acacia koa from the Islands and heterophylla from Runion island are both excellent timber trees. Depending on abundance and regional culture, some Acacia species (e.g. Acacia fumosa), are traditionally used locally as firewoods.()PulpwoodIn Indonesia (mainly in Sumatra) and in Malaysia (mainly in Sarawak) plantations of mangium are being established to supply pulpwood to the paper industry.Acacia gives high opacity and below average bulk paper. This is suitable in lightweight offset papers used for bibles and dictionaries. It is also used in tissue where it improves softness.Land ReclamationAcacia can be planted for erosion control, especially after mining or construction damage.() Ecological invasion For the same reasons it is favored as an erosion-control plant, with its easy spreading and resilience, some varieties of acacia, are potentially an invasive species.  One of the most globally significant invasive Acacias is Black Wattle mearnsii,  which is taking over grasslands and abandoned agricultural areas worldwide, especially in moderate coastal and island regions where mild climate promotes its spread.  Australian/New Zealand Weed Risk Assessment gives it a high risk, score of 15 rating and it is considered one of the worlds 100 most invasive species.(Acacia mearnsii (PIER species info))Extensive ecological studies should be performed before further introduction of acacia varieties as this fast-growing Genus, once introduced, spreads fast and is extremely difficult to eradicate.Phytochemistry of AcaciaAlkaloidsAs mentioned previously, Acacias contain a number of compounds that defend them from pests and grazing animals.( Many of these compounds are psychoactive in humans.The alkaloids found in Acacias include dimethyltryptamine (DMT), 5-methoxy-dimethyltryptamine (5-MeO-DMT) and N-methyltryptamine (NMT). The plant leaves, stems and/or roots are sometimes made into a brew together with some MAOI-containing plant and consumed orally for healing, ceremonial or religious uses. mythology has associated the acacia tree with characteristics of the of life (see the article on the of Osiris and Isis).Cyanogenic glycosidesNineteen different species of Acacia in the Americas contain cyanogenic glycosides, which, if exposed to an enzyme which specifically splits glycosides, can release cyanide (HCN) in the acacia leaves.(Cyanogenic Glycosides in Ant-Acacias of Mexico and Central America David S. Seigler, John E. Ebinger The Southwestern Naturalist, Vol. 32, No. 4 (December 9, 1987), pp. 499-503 doi:10.2307/3671484) This sometimes results in the poisoning death of livestock.If fresh plant material spontaneously produces 200 ppm or more HCN, then it is potentially toxic. This corresponds to about 7.5 mol HCN per gram of fresh plant material. It turns out that, if acacia leaves lack the specific glycoside-splitting enzyme, then they may be less toxic than otherwise, even those containing significant quantities of cyanic glycosides.(Chemotaxonomie der Pflanzen By Robert Hegnauer)Some Acacia species containing cyanogens:* erioloba* Acacia cunninghamii* Acacia obtusifolia* Acacia sieberiana* Acacia sieberiana var. woodii(FAO Kamal M. Ibrahim, The current state of knowledge on Prosopis juliflora... ) Species There are over 1,300 species of Acacia. See of Acacia species for a more complete listing.Famous acaciaPerhaps the most famous acacia is the du Tnr in Niger. The reason for the trees fame is that it used to be the most isolated tree in the world, approximately  from any other tree. The tree was knocked down by a truck driver in 1973.Identification galleryFlowersImage:Acacia aneura blossom.jpg|aneuraImage:Koeh-003.jpg|catechuImage:Acacia baileyana.jpg|baileyanaImage:Acacia berlandieri branch.jpg|berlandieriImage:Acacia confusa-01.jpg|confusaImage:Acacia constricta flower.jpg|constricta, Las Vegas, Nevada, USAImage:Acacia covenyi02.jpg|covenyiImage:Acacia dealbata-1.jpg|dealbataImage:Acacia denticulosa.jpg|denticulosaImage:Acacia_drummodii_fg01.JPG|drummondiiImage:Akazie Blte PA060002 .JPG|erioloba Sossusvlei, NamibiaImage:Acacia fimbriata 02.jpg|fimbriata National Botanic Gardens, CanberraImage:Acacia heterophylla (flowers) 2.JPG|heterophyllaImage:Acacia_longifolia_fg01.JPG|longifoliaImage:Acacia melanoxylon branch.jpg|melanoxylon Nazar, PortugalImage:Acacia saligna(04).jpg|saligna Side, TurkeyImage:Acacia schinoides.JPG|schinoides Australian National Botanic GardensImage:Acacia tetragonophylla.jpg|tetragonophylla Botanic Gardens, Victoria, AustraliaImage:Acacia pennata in Talakona forest, AP W2 IMG 8290.jpg|pennata in Talakona forest, in District of Pradesh, IndiaImage:Acacia pennata in Anantgiri, AP W IMG 8795.jpg|pennata at Hills, in district of Pradesh, India.BarkImage:Acacia-aneura-bark3.jpg|aneura BarkImage:Starr 031013-0028 Acacia auriculiformis.jpg|auriculiformis BarkImage:Acacia-berlandieri-bark.jpg|berlandieri BarkImage:Acacia collinsii1.jpg|collinsii BarkImage:Starr 050107-2872 Acacia confusa.jpg|confusa Bark, Hawaii, USAImage:Yellow Mimosa.jpg|dealbataImage:Acacia-decurrens2.jpg|decurrensImage:Akazie Blte PA060002_.JPG|eriolobaImage:Acacia-estrophiolata-bark2.jpg|estrophiolataBarkImage:Acacia-greggii-bark.jpg|greggii BarkImage:Acacia heterophylla 7.JPG|heterophyllaBarkImage:Acacia pennata trunk in Talakona forest, AP W IMG 8292.jpg|pennata trunk in Talakona forest, in District of Pradesh, India.FoliageImage:Koeh-003.jpg|catechuImage:Acacia collinsii4.jpg|collinsii FoliageImage:Acacia concinna Blanco2.374.png|concinna FoliageImage:Acacia denticulosa.jpg|denticulosa FoliageImage:Acacia karroo1.jpg|karroo FoliageImage:Acacia leprosa1.jpg|leprosa FoliageImage:Acacia pennata leaves in Talakona forest, AP W IMG 8291.jpg|pennata in Talakona forest, in District of Pradesh, India.Image:Acacia pennata in Anantgiri, AP W IMG 8797.jpg|pennata at Hills, in district of Pradesh, India.Seed podsImage:Acacia aneura pods.jpg|aneuraImage:Koeh-003.jpg|catechuImage:Starr_061224-2814_Acacia_confusa.jpg|confusaImage:Acacia constricta pods.jpg|constrictaImage:Acacia dealbata fruto.jpg|dealbataImage:Acacia heterophylla (1).JPG|heterophyllaImage:Acacia verticillata1.jpg|melanoxylonSeedsImage:Acacia baileyana seeds.jpg|baileyanaImage:Acacia berlandieri seeds.jpg|berlandieriImage:Acacia confusa seeds.jpg|confusaImage:Acacia constricta seeds.jpg |constrictaImage:Acacia cyclops seeds.jpg |cyclopsImage:Acacia dealbata seeds.jpg|dealbataImage:Acde 001 lhp.jpg|decurrensImage:Acfa 002 lhp.jpg|farnesianaImage:Acacia greggii seeds.jpg|greggiiImage:Acacia longifolia seeds.jpg|longifoliaImage:Acacia mearnsii seeds.jpg|mearnsiiImage:Acme 001 lhp.jpg|melanoxylonImage:Acacia pycnantha seeds.jpg|pycnanthaImage:Acacia rigidula seeds.jpg|rigidulaImage:Acacia tortuosa seeds.jpg|tortuosaThornsImage:Koeh-003.jpg|catechuImage:Acacia collinsii0.jpg|collinsiiImage:A-cornigera.jpg|cornigeraImage:Acacia-horrida.jpg|horridaImage:Acacia-smallii-thorns.jpg|farnesiana var. farnesianaImage:Acacia pennata in Talakona forest, AP W IMG 8290.jpg|pennata in Talakona forest, in District of Pradesh, India.TreeFile:Mulga.jpg|aneuraImage:Acacia-berlandieri-habit.jpg|berlandieriImage:Starr_050107-2872_Acacia_confusa.jpg|confusaImage:Acacia constricta WPC.jpg|constrictaImage:Acacia dealbata1.jpg|dealbataImage:Acacia heterophylla 1.JPG|heterophyllaFile:Starr 040723-0533 Acacia_koa.jpg|koaImage:Acacia leprosa2.jpg|leprosaWoodImage:Starr_030405-0092_Acacia_koa.jpg|koaImage:PlateauxTamarin2.jpg|heterophyllaImage:Acacia-schaffneri-wood.jpg|schaffneri See also * of Acacia species* defense against herbivory* plants Notes  General references * Clement, B.A., Goff, C.M., Forbes, T.D.A. Toxic Amines and Alkaloids from Acacia rigidula, Phytochem. 1998, 49(5), 1377.* Shulgin, Alexander and Ann, TiHKAL the Continuation. Transform Press, 1997. ISBN 978-0-9630096-9-2 External links * * World Wide Wattle* Acacia-world* Waynes Word on The Unforgettable Acacias* The genus Acacia and Entheogenic Tryptamines, with reference to Australian and related species, by mulga* A description of Acacia from Pomets 1709 reference book, History of Druggs* Dr. Dukes Phytochemical and Ethnobotanical Databases* Flora identification tools from the State Herbarium of South Australia* Tannins in Some Interrelated Wattles* List of Acacia Species in the U.S.* FAO Timber Properties of Various Acacia Species* FAO Comparison of Various Acacia Species as Forage* Long-term effects of roller chopping on antiherbivore defenses in three shrub species, Jason R. Schindlera, Timothy E. Fulbright* Vet. Path. ResultsAFIP Wednesday Slide Conference - No. 21 February 24, 1999* Acacia cyanophylla lindl as supplementary feed/for small stock in Libya* Description of Acacia Morphology* Nitrogen Fixaton in Acacias* Acacias with Cyagenic Compounds* Acacia Alarm Systemar:guasuaz:Akasiyabg:ca:Acciacs:Akciecy:Acesiada:Akaciede:Akazienet:Akaatsiael:es:Acaciaeo:Akacioeu:Akaziafa:fr:Acaciagl:Acaciako:hr:Akacijaio:Akacioid:Akasiait:Acaciahe:kn:(Acacia)pam:Acaciaka:kk:la:Acacialt:Akacijahu:Akciaml:ro:Acacianl:Acaciaja:no:Akasieslektenpnb:pl:Akacjapt:Acciaru:simple:Acaciasr:sh:Akacijafi:Akasiatsv:Akaciaslktettl:Akasyate:th:ve:Muungatr:Akasyauk:za:AhlahbozsugyauhKeowa:Acaciazh-yue:zh:
1446
Acapulco
footnotes              Acapulco (officially known as Acapulco de Jurez) is a city, municipality and major sea port in the state of Guerrero on the Pacific coast of Mexico,  southwest from City. Acapulco is located on a deep, semi-circular bay and has been a port since the early colonial period of Mexicos history.()  It is a port of call for shipping and cruising lines running between Panama and Francisco, California, States.() The city of Acapulco is the largest in the state, far larger than the state capital Chilpancingo and as well, Mexicos largest beach and balneario resorted city.()The city is best known as one of Mexicos oldest and most well-known beach resorts, which came into prominence by the 1950s as a getaway for Hollywood stars and millionaires.()  Acapulco is still famous for its nightlife and still attracts many vacationers, although most are now from Mexico itself.()() The resort area is divided into two: The north end of the bay is the traditional area, where the famous in the mid 20th century vacationed and the south end is dominated by newer luxury high rise hotels.()The name Acapulco comes from Nahuatl language Aca-pl-co, and means At the big reeds ()  or At the broken reeds.  de Jurez was added to the official name in 1885 to honor Jurez, the former of Mexico. The seal for the city shows broken reeds or cane.(HistoryBy the eighth century, there was a small culture in the Acapulco area, which would first be dominated by the Olmecs, then by a number of others during the pre-Hispanic period. In Acapulco bay itself, there were two Olmec sites, one by Playa Larga and the other on a hill known as El Guitarrn. Olmec influence caused the small spread-out villages here to coalesce into larger entities and build ceremonial centers. Later, Teotihuacan influence made its way here via Cuernavaca and Chilpancingo. Then Mayan influence arrived from the of Tehuantepec and through what is now Oaxaca. This history is known through the archeological artifacts that have been found here, especially at Playa Hornos, Pie de la Cuesta and Tambuco.(In the 11th century, new waves of migration of Nahuas and Coixas came through here. These people were the antecedents of the Aztecs.  Acapulco formally became part of the Empire in 1486 during the reign of Ahuizotl. It was part of a tributary province called Tepecuacuilco, but control here was relatively unorganized.(There are two stories about how Acapulco bay was discovered by Europeans. The first states that two years after the Conquest, Corts sent explorers west to find gold. The explorers had subdued this area after 1523, and Captain Saavedra Cern was authorized by Corts to found a settlement here. The other states that the bay was discovered on 13 December 1526 by a small ship named the El Tepache Santiago captained by Santiago Guevara.(The first encomendero was established in 1525 at Cacahuatepec, which is part of the modern Acapulco municipality. In 1531, a number of Spaniards, most notably Rodriguez de Villafuerte, left the Oaxaca coast and founded the village of Villafuerte where the city of Acapulco now stands. Villafuerte was unable to subdue the local native peoples, and this eventually resulted in the Yopa Rebellion in the region of Cuautepec. Hernn Corts was obligated to send Vasco Porcayo to negotiate with the indigenous people giving concessions. The province of Acapulco became the encomendero of Rodriguez de Villafuerte who received taxes in the form of cocoa, cotton and corn.(Corts established Acapulco as a major port by the early 1530s, with the first major road between Mexico City and the port constructed by 1531. The wharf, named Marqus, was constructed by 1533 between Bruja Point and Diamond Point. Soon after, the area was made an alcadia (major province or town).(Spanish trade in the East would give Acapulco a prominent position in the economy of Spain. Galleons started arriving here from Asia by 1550, and in that year  thirty Spanish families were sent to live here from Mexico City to have a permanent base of European residents.( Acapulco would become the second most important port, after Veracruz, due to its direct trade with the Philippines. This trade would focus on the yearly Galleon, which was the nexus of all kinds on communications between New Spain, Europe and Asia. In 1573, the port was granted the monopoly of the Manila trade.(File:Carl Saltzmann - View of Acapulco, 1879.jpg|thumb|upright|View of Acapulco, 1879, oil painting by SaltzmannThe Galleon would make its yearly run from the mid 16th century until the early 19th. The luxury items it brought to New Spain attracted the attention of English and Dutch pirates,  such as  Drake, Morgan and Cavendish, who called it The Black Ship.(( To protect the port and the cargo of ships coming here the San Diego Fort was built. Despite the forts existence, a Dutch fleet invaded Acapulco in 1615, destroying much of the town and fort before being driven off. The fort was destroyed by an earthquake in 1776 and was rebuilt in 1783.((At the beginning of the 19th Century, King Charles IV declared Acapulco a Ciudad Official and it became an essential part of the Spanish Crown. However, soon after the War of Independence began.  In 1810, Mara Morelos y Pavn attacked and burnt down the city,( after he defeated royalist commander Francisco Pars at the Battle of Tres Palos.( The independence of Mexico in 1821 ended the run of the Manila Galleon.(Acapulcos importance as a port recovered during the Gold Rush in the mid 19th century, with ships going to and coming from Panama stopping here.(In 1911, revolutionary forces took over the main plaza of Acapulco.(In 1920, the of Wales and future King Edward VIII visited the area. Impressed by what he saw, he recommended the place in Europe, making it popular with the elite there. Much of the original hotel and trading infrastructure was built by an East Texas businessman named Albert B.Pullen from Corrigan, Tx. in the area now known as Old Acapulco.( But some of Acapulcos best known hotels were built by others.  In 1933 Carlos Barnard started the first section of Hotel El Mirador,(Portal de Acapulco - Acapulco y su Arquitectura) with 12 rooms on the cliffs of La Quebrada. Wolf Shoenborn purchased large amounts of undeveloped land and Al Polin built the Las Americas Hotel.(In the mid 1940s, the first commercial wharf and warehouses has been built.( In the early 1950s President Alemn Valds upgraded the ports infrastructure, installing electrical lines, drainage systems, roads and the first highway to connect the port with Mexico City.(The economy grew and foreign investment increased with it. During the 1950s, Acapulco became the fashionable place for millionaires Hollywood stars such as Taylor, Sinatra, Eddie Fisher and Bardot.( Former Swing Musician Stauffer, so called Mister Acapulco, was a hotelowner (Villa Vera, Casablanca), who attracted a lot of celebrities to Acapulco.(Teddy Stauffer: Der Swingknig im Paradies - STOCKPRESS.de | STOCKPRESS.de)From a population of only 4,000 or 5,000 in the 1940s,( by the early 1960s Acapulco had a population of about 50,000.(World Book Encyclopedia, 1967 Edition, Vol. 1, p. 19) In 1958, The Diocese of Acapulco was created by Pius XII. It would become an archdiocese in 1983.()During the 1960s and 1970s, new hotel resorts were built, and accommodation and transport were made cheaper. It was no longer necessary to be a millionaire to spend a holiday in Acapulco, the foreign and Mexican middle class could now afford to travel here.( However, as more hotels were built in the south part of the bay, the old hotels of the 1950s lost their grandeur.()In the 70s there was a significant expansion of the port.(During the 1990s, the road known as the Ruta del Sol was built, crossing the mountains between Mexico City and Acapulco. The journey only takes about three and a half hours, making Acapulco a favorite weekend destination for Mexico City inhabitants.( The port continued to grow and in 1996, a new private company, API Acapulco, was created to manage operations. This consolidated operations and now Acapulco is the major port for car exports to the Pacific.(The city was devastated by Pauline in 1997. The storm stranded tourists and left more than 100 dead in the city. Most of the victims were from the shantytowns that surround the city, built on steep hillsides. Other victims were swept away by thirty foot waves and  winds. The main road, Avenida Costera became a fast-moving three foot river of sludge.()In the 2000s, the drug war in Mexico has had a negative effect on tourism in Acapulco as rival drug traffickers fight each other for the Guerrero coast route that brings drugs from America as well as soldiers that have been fighting the cartels since 2006. A major gun battle between 18 gunmen and soldiers took place in the summer of 2009 in the Old Acapulco seaside area, lasting hours and killing 16 of the gunmen and two soldiers.(() This came after the swine flu outbreak earlier in the year nearly paralyzed the Mexican economy, forcing hotels to give discounts to bring tourists back.( However, hotel occupancy for 2009 was down five percent from the year before.() The death of Arturo Beltran Leyva in December 2009 resulted in infighting among different groups within the Beltran Leyva cartel. () Gang violence continued to plague Acapulco through 2010 and into 2011, most notably with at least 15 dying in drug-related violence on March 13, 2010 and another 15 deaths on January 8, 2011.  Among the first incidents dead were six members of the city police and the brother of an ex-mayor.(Mexico: Guerrero narco-violence breaks grisly record | World War 4 Report) In the second incident the headless bodies of 15 young men were found dumped near the Plaza Senderos shopping center.() On August 20, 2011, Mexican authorities reported that five headless bodies were found in Acapulco, three of which were placed in the citys main tourist area and two of which were cut into multiple pieces. ()Geography and climateForty percent of the municipality is mountainous terrain. Another forty percent is semi flat, and the other twenty percent is flat. Altitude varies from sea level to . The highest peaks are Potrero, San Nicolas and Alto Camarn. There is one major river, the Papagayo, which runs through the municipality, along with a number of arroyos. There are also two small lagoons, Tres Palos and Coyuca. along with a number of thermal springs.Acapulco features a wet and dry climate. The climate here is hot with distinct wet and dry seasons, more even temperatures between seasons than resorts further north in Mexico, but this vary depending on altitude. The warmest areas are next to the sea where the city is. Tropical Storms and Hurricanes are threat from May through November. The forested area tends to lose leaves during the winter dry season with evergreen pines in the highest elevations. Fauna mostly consists of deer, small mammals, a wide variety of birds of both land and sea as well as marine animals such as turtles.(dateAugust 2010EconomyTourism is the main economic activity of the municipality and most of this is centered on Acapulco Bay. About seventy three percent of the municipalitys population is involved in commerce and most of this is related to tourism and the port. Mining and manufacturing employs less than twenty percent and only about five percent are dedicated to agriculture. Industrial production is mostly limited to bottling, milk products, cement products, ice and energy production. Agricultural products include tomatoes, corn, watermelon, beans, green chili peppers and melons.(TourismAcapulco is one of Mexicos oldest coastal tourist destinations, reaching prominence in the 1950s as the place where Hollywood stars and millionaires vacationed on the beach in an exotic locale.() But nowadays, tourists in Acapulco have been facing problems with local corrupt police who steal money by extortion, and intimidate visitors with threats to jail.()()() The original Acapulco, where hotels owned by personalities such as Weismuller and Wayne are located, is on the northern end of the bay. This is where the boardwalk and main square are and today the area is filled with modern, Mexican style hotels, with discothques and restaurants in walking distance.( This side of the bay is also known as Tradicional or Nautica.The south end of the bay holds the newer constructions, including the high rise hotels. This area includes Punta Diamante, Puerto Marqus, and stretches from the airport to the Papagayo River which separates it from the older section of town. In this area, no one walks as almost all transportation is by car, limousine or golf cart.(( The older section of town now mostly caters to middle class, almost exclusively Mexican clientele, while the glitzier newer section caters to international visitors and the Mexican upper classes, many of whom never venture into the older, traditional part of town.(( This area also has the higher hotel occupancy rates.((Acapulcos reputation is that of a high-energy party town, where one can have dinner at midnight, dance until dawn then relax in the daytime on the beach crowded with sexy bodies in bikinis. The nightlife has made this place famous for decades.( From November to April, luxury liners stop here daily and include ships such as the Queen Victoria, the Rotterdam, Harmony as well as all the Princess liner ships.( Despite its international fame, most of Acapulcos visitors are from central Mexico, especially the affluent from Mexico City.((Acapulco is one of the embarkation ports for the Mexican cruise line Star Cruises.(Ocean Star Cruises - Acapulco, Retrieved 05 August 2011.)For the Christmas season of 2009, Acapulco received 470,000 visitors, most of whom are Mexican nationals adding 785 million pesos to the economy.  Eighty percent arrive by land and 18 percent by air.()  The area has over 25,000 condominiums, most of which function as second homes for their Mexican owners.( Acapulco is still popular with Mexican celebrities and wealthy, such as Miguel, Plcido Domingo and Olmedo, who maintain homes here.(While much of the glitz and glamour that made Acapulco famous still remains, from the latter 20th century on, the city has also taken on other less-positive reputations. Some consider it a pass resort, eclipsed by the newer Cancn and San Lucas.( Over the years a number of problems have developed here, especially in the bay and the older sections of the city. The large number of wandering vendors on the beaches such as Tamarindos, who offer everything from newspapers to massages are a recognized problem. It is a bother to tourists who simply want to relax on the beach but the government says is difficult to eradicate as there is a lot of unemployment and poor here.()  Around the city are many shantytowns that cling onto the mountainsides, populated by migrants who have come here looking for work. Prostitution is also common here as well.( In the last decade, drug related violence has caused problems for the tourism trade here.(Another problem is garbage that has accumulated in the bay. Although 60.65 tons have recently been extracted from the bays of Acapulco and nearby Zihuatanejo, more needs to be done. Most of trash that is cleaned up during the off seasons is done on the beaches and in the waters closest to them. However, the center of the bay is not touched. The reason trash winds up in the bay is that it is common here to throw it in streets, rivers and the bay itself. The most common items cleaned out of the bay are beer bottles and car tires.()AttractionsAcapulcos main attraction is its nightlife, and has been for many decades.(()  Nightclubs change names and owners frequently. Informal lobby or poolside cocktail bars often offer free live entertainment. In addition, there is the beach bar zone, where younger crowds go. These are located along the Costera road, face the ocean and feature techno or alternative rock. Most are concentrated between the Fiesta Americana and Continental Plaza hotels. These places tend to open earlier and have more informal dress. There is also a jump in this area as well.File:Cliffdivers in La Quebrada, Acapulco, Guerrero, Mexico.jpg|thumb|upright|Quebrada Cliff Divers.Another enigmatic attraction at Acapulco are the Quebrada Cliff Divers.( The tradition started in the 1930s when young men casually competed against each other to see who could dive from the highest point into the sea below. Eventually, locals began to ask for tips for those coming to see the men dive.()  Today the divers are professionals,( diving from heights of forty meters into an inlet that is only seven meters wide and four meters deep, after praying first at a shrine to the Virgin of Guadalupe.( On 12 December, the feast day of this Virgin, freestyle cliff divers jump into the sea to honor her. Dives ranges from the simple to the complicated and end with the Ocean of Fire when the sea is lit with gasoline, making a circle of flames which the diver aims for.( The spectacle can be seen from a public area, which charges a small fee or from the Hotel Plaza Las Glorias/El Mirador from its bar or restaurant terrace.()There are a number of beaches in the Acapulco Bay and the immediate coastline. In the bay proper there are the La Angosta (in the Quebrada), Caleta, Caletilla, Dominguillo, Tlacopanocha, Hornos, Hornitos, Honda, Tamarindo, Condesa, Guitarrn, Icacos, Playuela, Playuelilla and Playa del Secreto. In the adjoining, smaller Bay of Puerto Marqus there is Pichilingue, Las Brisas, and Playa Roqueta. Facing open ocean just northwest of the bays is Pie de la Cuesta and southeast are Playa Revolcadero, Playa Aeromar, Playa Encantada and Barra Vieja. Two lagoons are in the area, Coyuca to the northwest of Acapulco Bay and Tres Palos to the southeast. Both lagoons have mangroves and offer boat tours. Tres Palos also has sea turtle nesting areas which are protected.()In addition to sunbathing, the beaches around the bay offer a number of services, such as boat rentals, boat tours, horseback riding, scuba diving and other aquatic sports. One popular cruise is from Caletilla Beach to Roqueta Island, which has places to snorkel, have lunch, a small zoo and a lighthouse. There is also an underwater statue of the Virgin of Guadalupe here, created in 1958 by Armando Quesado in memory of a group of divers that died here. Many of the scuba diving tours come to this area as well, where there are sunken ships, sea mountains, and cave rock formations.() Another popular activity is deep sea fishing. The major attraction is sail fishing. Fish caught here have weighed between 89 and 200 pounds. Sailfish are so plentiful that boat captains have been known to bet with a potential customer that if he does not catch anything the trip is free.((In the old part of the city, there is a traditional main square called the Zcalo with shade trees and lined with cafes and shops. At the north end of the Nuestra Seora de la Soledad cathedral, with blue onion-shaped domes and Byzantine towers. The building was originally constructed as a movie set, but when was later adapted into a church.( Acapulcos most historic building is the San Diego Fort, located east of the main square and originally built in 1616 to protect the city from pirate attacks.( The fort was partially destroyed by the Dutch in the mid 17th century, rebuilt, then destroyed again in 1776 by an earthquake. It was rebuilt again by 1783 and this is the building that can be seen today, unchanged except for renovations done to it in 2000. Parts of the moats remain as well as the five bulwarks and the battlements.()()  Today the fort serves as the Museo Histrico de Acapulco (Acapulco Historical Museum), which shows the ports history from the pre-Hispanic period until independence. There are also temporary exhibits as well.(The Centro Internacional de Convivencia Infantial or CICI is a sea life and aquatic  park located on Costera Aleman. It offers wave pools, water slides and water toboggans. There are also dolphin shows daily and a swim with dolphins program. The center mostly caters to children.(( Another place popular with children is the Parque Papagayo which is a large family park which has life-sized replicas of a Spanish galleon and the space shuttle Columbia, three artificial lakes, aviary, skating rink, rides, go-karts and more.(The Dolores Olmedo House is located in the traditional downtown of Acapulco and is noted for the murals by Rivera that adorn it. Olmedo and Rivera had been friend since Olmedo was a child and Rivera spent the last two years of his life here. During that time, he painted nearly nonstop and created the outside walls with tile mosaics, featuring Aztec deities such as Quetzalcoatl. The interior of the home is covered in murals. The home is not a museum, so only the outside murals are able to be seen by the public.(There is a small museum called Casa de la Mscara (House of Masks) which is dedicated to masks, most of them from Mexico but there are examples from many parts of the world. The collection contains about one thousand examples and are divided into seven rooms called Masks of the World, Mexico across History, The Huichols and the Jaguar, Alebrijes and Dances of Guerrero, Devils and Death, Identity and Fantasy, and Afro-Indian masks.(The Botanical Garden of Acapulco is a tropical garden located on lands owned by the Universidad Loyola del Pacifico. Most of the plants here are native to the region, and many are in danger of extinction, such as the mexicana or purple stick tree.(The annual French Festival takes place throughout Acapulco city and offers a multitude of events that cement cultural links between Mexico and France. The main features are a fashion show and gourmet food fair. The Cinpolis Galeras Diana and the Teatro Juan Ruz de Alarcn show French and French literary figures give talks on their specialised subjects. Even some of the local nightclubs will feature French DJs.()  Other festivals celebrated here include  Carnival, the feast of San Isidro Labrador on 15 May and a crafts and livestock fair called the Nao de China in November.(There are a number of golf courses in Acapulco including the Acapulco Princess and the Pierre Marqus course, the latter designed by Trent Jones in 1972 for the World Cup Golf Tournament. The Mayan Palace course was designed by Guericia and an economical course called the Club de Golf Acapulco is near the convention center.  The most exclusive course is that of the Tres Vidas Golf Club, designed by von Hagge. It is located next to the ocean and is home to flocks of ducks and other birds.(Acapulco also has a bullring, called the Plaza de Toros, near Caletilla Beach. The season runs during the winter and is called the Fiesta Brava.(Spring breakOver 100,000 American teenagers and young adults travel to resort areas and balnearios throughout Mexico over break each year.() The main reason students head to Mexico is the 18 year old drinking age (versus 21 for the United States), something that has been marketed by tour operators along with the sun and ocean. This has become attractive since the 1990s, especially since more traditional spring break places such as Beach, Florida have become restrictive on drinking and other behaviors. This has pushed spring break visitation to various parts of Mexico, with Acapulco as one of the top destinations.()In the late 1990s and early 2000s, Cancn had been favored at the spring break destination of choice. However, Cancun has taken some steps to control the reckless behavior associated with the event, and students have been looking for someplace new. This has led many more to choose Acapulco, in spite of the fact that the flight is longer and more expensive than to Cancun for many travelers. Many are attracted by the glitzy hotels on the south side and Acapulcos famous nightlife.() In 2008, 22,500 students came to Acapulco for spring break. Hotels did not get that many in 2009, mostly due to the economic situation in the United States,() and partially because of scares of drug-related violence.() MTV will transmit special programming from Acapulco in 2010.()In February 2009, the US State Department issued a travel alert directed at college students planning spring break trips to Acapulco.(http://travel.state.gov/travel/cis_pa_tw/pa/pa_3028.html ) The warninga result of violent activity springing from Mexicos drug cartel debacletook college campuses by storm, with some schools going so far as to warn their students about the risks of travel to Mexico over spring break.  The New York Times tracked the travels of another Penn student on spring break in Acapulco just a week after the dissemination of the email, while Bill OReilly devoted a segment of his show, OReilly Factor, to urge students to stay away from Acapulco.()  In June 2009 a number of incidents occurred between the drug cartel and the government. These included coordinated attacks on police headquarters and open battles in the streets involving large-caliber weapons and grenades.()  However, no incidents of violence against spring breakers were reported.TransportationFrom the U.S., many airlines now fly to Acapulco Airport year-round. While in the city, there are many buses and taxi services one can take to get from place to place, but most of the locals choose to walk to their destinations. However, an important mode of transportation is the government subsidized Colectivo cab system. These cabs cost 10 pesos per person to ride, but they are not private. The driver will pick up more passengers as long as seats are available, and will transport them to their destination based on first come first served rules. The colectivos each travel a designated area of the city, the three main ones being Costera, Colosio, Coloso, or a mixture of the three. Coloso cabs mainly travel to old Acapulco. Colosio cabs travel through most of the tourist area of Acapulco. Costera cabs drive up and down the coast of Acapulco, which is where most of the hotels for visitors are, but also includes some of old Acapulco. Where a driver will take you is partly up to his choice. Some are willing to travel to the other designated areas, especially during slow periods of the day.The bus system is highly complex, and can be rather confusing to an outsider. As far as transportation goes, it is the cheapest form other than walking in Acapulco. The most expensive buses have conditioning, while the cheaper buses do not. For tourists, the Acapulco city government has established a system of yellow buses with Acapulco! painted on the side of them. These buses are not for tourists only, but are certainly the nicest and most uniform of the bus systems. These buses travel the tourist section of Acapulco, driving up and down the coast. There are buses with specific routes and destinations, generally written on their windshields or shouted out by a barker riding in the front seat. Perhaps the most unusual thing about the privately operated buses is the fact that they are all highly decorated and personalized, with decaling and home made interior designs that range from book scenes, to adult themes, and even to Kitty themes.GovernmentAs the seat of a municipality, the city of Acapulco is the government authority for over 700 other communities,( which together have a territory of 1,880.60 km2.( This municipality borders the municipalities of Chilpancingo, Juan R Escudero (Tierra Colorada), San Marcos, de Bentez with the Pacific Ocean to the south.The metropolitan area is made up of the municipalities of Acapulco de Jurez and Coyuca de Benitez. The area has a population (as of 2005) of 786,830.()See also* (municipality)* goldReferences External links * Official city website* Acapulco Then and Now  slideshow by magazinezh-min-nan:Acapulcobe-x-old:bg:ca:Acapulcocs:Acapulcocy:Acapulcoda:Acapulcode:Acapulcoet:Acapulcode Jurezeo:Akapulkoeu:Acapulcofr:Acapulcogl:Acapulcoko:hr:Acapulcoid:Acapulcoit:Acapulcohe:kl:Acapulcoka:Guerreromrj:lt:Akapulkaslmo:Acapulcohu:Acapulcoml:nah:caplco(Guerrero)ja:no:Acapulconn:Acapulcopms:Acapulcopl:Acapulcopt:AcapulcoGuerreroru:simple:Acapulcosk:Acapulcosl:Acapulcosr:sh:Acapulcofi:Acapulcosv:Acapulcotl:Acapulcotr:Acapulcouk:vo:Acapulcowar:Acapulcozh:
1495
Australian_Labor_Party
workThe Australian Labor Party (ALP; sometimes simply Labor) is an Australian political party. It has been the governing party of the Commonwealth of Australia since the 2007 federal election. Gillard is the partys federal parliamentary leader and Minister of Australia. Labor also currently governs in Queensland, Australia, Tasmania, Territory and the Capital Territory.Founded in 1891 by the emerging labour movement in Australia, Labor is the countrys longest running political party. Labor contested state seats from 1891 and federal seats following the Federation at the 1901 federal election. Labor was the first party in Australia to win a majority in either house of the Australian Parliament, at the 1910 federal election. The ALP predates both the British Labour Party and Zealand Labour Party, among others, in both party formation and government. The party competes against the Liberal/National Coalition for political office at the federal and state (and sometimes local) level.HistoryFile:Julia Gillard 2010.jpg|thumb|left|150px|Prime Minister Gillard, Leader of the Australian Labor Party since 24 June 2010File:ChrisWatsonSepia.jpg|thumb|100px|Watson, first leader of then Federal Labour Party 190107 (held the balance of power) and Prime Minister of Australia in 1904File:Andrewfisher.JPG|thumb|100px| Fisher, Labor Prime Minister of Australia 190809, 191013, 191415File:Nla.ms-ms1538-10-582-e.jpg|thumb|100px|Hughes, Labor Prime Minister of Australia 191516File:JamesSc.JPG|thumb|100px|Scullin, Labor Prime Minister of Australia 192932File:Johncurtin.jpg|thumb|100px|Curtin, Labor Prime Minister of Australia 194145File:BenChifley2.jpg|thumb|100px|Chifley, Labor Prime Minister of Australia 194549File:Whitlam1955.jpg|thumb|100px|Whitlam, Labor Prime Minister of Australia 197275File:BobHawke(cropped).jpg|thumb|100px|Hawke, Labor Prime Minister of Australia 198391File:Paul Keating - 2007-crop.jpg|thumb|100px|Keating, Labor Prime Minister of Australia 199196File:Kevin Rudd headshot.jpg|thumb|100px|Rudd, Labor Prime Minister of Australia 200710ALP mythology says the first party branch was founded at a meeting of striking pastoral workers under a ghost gum tree (the Tree of Knowledge) in Queensland in 1891. The New South Wales branch of the party also claims to be the oldest in Australia. The party as a serious electoral force dates from 1891 in New South Wales, 1893 in Queensland and South Australia, and later in the other colonies. In New South Wales in 1891, the first election contested by Labour candidates (as Labor was spelt at the time  see Etymology), 35 of 141 seats were won by Labour candidates.(Page 4, So Monstrous a Travesty, Ross McMullen. Scribe Publications 2004.) In 1899, Dawson formed a minority Labour government in Queensland, the first in the world, which lasted one week.Sections of state Labour and the labour movement were mixed in their support for the of Australia. Some labour representatives argued against the proposed constitution, claiming the Senate as proposed was much too powerful, similar to the anti-reformist Colonial upper houses and the British House of Lords. They feared federation would distract attention from the need of social and industrial reform, and further entrench the power of the conservative forces. The first Labour leader and Prime Minister, Watson, was a supporter of federation but not its implementation.After Federation, the Federal Parliamentary Labour Party (informally known as the Caucus) first met on 8 May 1901 at House, Melbourne, the meeting place of the first Federal Parliament.(Faulkner; Macintyre (2001) p. 3) This is now taken as the founding date of the federal Labor Party, but it was some years before there was any significant structure or organisation at a national level.The ALP during its early years was distinguished by its rapid growth and success at a national level, first forming a government under Watson, the first Labour Prime Minister in the world, for four months in 1904. Fisher then formed another minority government 190809. At the 1910 federal election, Fisher and Labour became Australias first federal government, held Australias first Senate majority, was the worlds first labour party majority government, the first time a Labour Party had controlled any house of a legislature, and the first time it controlled both houses of a bicameral legislature.() The state branches were also successful, except in Victoria, where the strength of Deakinite liberalism inhibited the partys growth. The state branches formed their first majority governments in South Wales and Australia in 1910, in Australia in 1911, and in Queensland in 1915. Such success eluded equivalent social democratic and labour parties in other countries for many years. One of the partys early innovations was the establishment of a federal arbitration system for the resolution of industrial disputes, which formed the basis of the industrial relations system for many decades.Through its membership of the International, the ALP is affiliated with democratic socialist, social-democratic and labour parties in many countries. The party was historically committed to socialist economic policies, but this term was never clearly defined, and no Labor government ever attempted to implement socialism in any serious sense. Labor supported national wage fixing and a strong welfare system, it did not nationalise private enterprise. The single exception to this was Chifleys attempt to nationalise the private banks in the 1940s, but this was ruled unconstitutional by the Court of Australia.(Faulkner; Macintyre (2001) p. 87) The commitment to nationalisation was dropped by Whitlam.From its formation until the 1950s Labor and its affiliated unions were the strongest defenders of the Australia Policy, which banned all non-European migration to Australia. This policy was partly motivated by 19th century theories about racial purity (shared by most Australians at this time), and partly by fears of economic competition from low-wage labour. In practice the party opposed all migration, on the grounds that immigrants competed with Australian workers and drove down wages, until after War II, when the Government launched a major immigration program. The partys opposition to non-European immigration did not change until after the retirement of Calwell as leader in 1967. Subsequently Labor has become an advocate of multiculturalism, although some of its trade union base and some of its members continue to oppose high immigration levels.During War II, Labor leader Curtin became Prime Minister of Australia in 1941 when independents the floor to bring down the Australia Party-Country Party Coalition Government, just weeks before the of Singapore. The Government thus led Australia through the years of the War during which Australia came under attack from the of Japan. Though a monarchist and supporter of the Empire, in December 1941, Curtin announced that Australia looks to America, free of any pangs as to our traditional links or kinship with the United Kingdom, thus helping to establish the Australian-American alliance (later formalised as ANZUS by the Government). Remembered as a strong war time leader, Curtin died in office just prior to the end of the war and was succeeded by Chifley.(http://primeministers.naa.gov.au/primeministers/curtin/) The Government won the 1946 election and oversaw Australias initial transition to a peacetime economy. At the conference of the New South Wales Labor Party in June 1949, Chifley sought to define the labour movement as having:source()To a large extent, Chifley saw centralisation of the economy as the means to achieve such ambitions. With an increasingly uncertain economic outlook, after his attempt to nationalise the banks and a strike by the Communist-dominated Miners Federation, Chifley lost office at the 1949 federal election to Menzies Liberal-National Coalition.(Ben Chifley - Australias PMs - Australias Prime Ministers) The newly formed Party of Australia won 55 seats and the Country Party 19 in the House of Representatives to Labors 47 seats and Labor commenced a 23-year period in opposition.(http://primeministers.naa.gov.au/primeministers/menzies/elections.aspx)Whitlam led the Federal Labor Party back to office in 1972. The Government lost office following the Australian constitutional crisis and Dismissal, and was defeated in a landslide at the resulting 1975 Australian Federal Election. Hawke led Labor back to office in 1983 and the Government remained in power until defeated by Howard at the 1996 election. Beazley led the party to the two subsequent elections as Opposition Leader and Latham to the 2004 election. Beazley was recalled to replace Latham in 2005 and Latham split from his party with the publication of a 2005 memoir Latham Diaries. Beazley in turn was challenged by Rudd who went on to defeat John Howard at the 2007 election. The Government concluded prior to the 2010 election following the replacement of Rudd as leader of the Party by deputy leader Gillard. The Government was commissioned to govern in a parliament following the 2010 election.Between the 2007 federal election and the 2008 Western Australian state election, the party was in government nationally, as well as in all eight state and territory legislatures. This was the first time any single party or any coalition had achieved this since the ACT and the NT gained self-government.(In 19691970, before the ACT and NT achieved self-government, the Liberal and National Coalition was also in power federally and in all six states. University of WA elections database) The party subsequently lost power in Victoria in 2010 and suffered its worst electoral defeat in decades in the New South Wales State Election.()EtymologyThe ALP adopted the formal name Australian Labour Party in 1908, but changed the spelling to Labor in 1912. While it is standard practice in English both today and at the time to spell the word labour with a u, the party was influenced by the United States labour movement and a prominent figure in the early history of the party, the Americanborn OMalley, was successful in having the spelling modernised.() The change also made it easier to distinguish references to the party from the movement in general.(Clarke, FG, Australia: A Concise Political and Social History (Sydney: Harcourt Brace & Company 1996), p 205) Furthermore, the spelling labor had been acceptable in both British and Australian English in earlier periods. (See also: Spelling in Australian English)Labor splitsThe Labor Party has suffered three major splits:* In 1916 over the issue of conscription during the First World War.(Hughes, William Morris (Billy) (18621952), Dictionary of Biography, ANU web site) Labor Prime Minister Hughes supported the introduction of conscription, while the majority of his colleagues in the ALP and trade union movement opposed it. After failing to gain majority support for conscription in two national plebiscites which bitterly divided the country in the process, Hughes and his followers were expelled from the Labor Party. He first formed the Labor Party before forming the Party of Australia in alliance with the conservatives and remained Prime Minister until 1923. At the state level Holman, also a supporter of conscription, quit the party at the same time and became Nationalist Party of New South Wales.* In 1931 over economic issues revolving around how best to handle the Depression. The ALP was essentially split three ways, between those who believed in radical policies such as NSW Premier Jack Lang, who wanted to repudiate Australias debt to British bondholders; proto-Keynesians such as federal Treasurer Theodore; and believers in orthodox finance such as Prime Minister Scullin and a senior minister in his government, Lyons. In 1931 Lyons left the party and joined the conservatives, forming the Australia Party as successors to the Nationalists and becoming Prime Minister in 1932.* The 1955 split on communism. During the 1950s the issue of communism and support for communist causes or governments caused great internal conflict in the Labor party and the trade union movement in general. From 1945 onward, staunchly anti-Communist Roman Catholic members (Catholics being an important traditional support base) in opposition to communist infiltration of unions, formed Groups to gain control of them, fostering intense internal conflict. After Labors loss of the 1954 election, federal leader Dr H.V. Evatt issued a statement attacking the Victorian ALP state executive.() He blamed subversive activities of the Groupers for the defeat. After bitter public dispute many Groupers were expelled from the ALP and formed the Democratic Labor Party (DLP) whose intellectual leader was Santamaria. The DLP was heavily influenced by social teaching and had the support of the Catholic Archbishop of Melbourne, Mannix. Because of its veto with a view to reunification strategy, the DLPs preferences (see electoral system) helped the Party of Australia remain in power for over two decades, but it was successfully undermined by the Whitlam Labor Government during the 1970s, so that after 1978 the DLP was reduced to a small rump based in Victoria, which nevertheless continued to contest federal elections as the DLP (according to the parliamentary library election results for 1980 and onward).()In addition, founding member Cook left the party in 1894, and went on to be Minister of Australia with the Liberal Party in 191314.PolicyThe policy of the Australian Labor Party is contained in its National Platform, which is approved by delegates to Labors National Conference, held every three years. According to the Labor Partys website, The Platform is the result of a rigorous and constructive process of consultation, spanning the nation and including the cooperation and input of state and territory policy committees, local branches, unions, state and territory governments, and individual Party members. The Platform provides the policy foundation from which we can continue to work towards the election of a federal Labor Government.()The platform gives a general indication of the policy direction which a future Labor government would follow, but does not commit the party to specific policies. It maintains that Labors traditional values will remain a constant on which all Australians can rely. While making it clear that Labor is fully committed to a market economy, it says that: Labor believes in a strong role for national government  the one institution all Australians truly own and control through our right to vote. Labor will not allow the benefits of change to be concentrated in fewer and fewer hands, or located only in privileged communities. The benefits must be shared by all Australians and all our regions. The Platform and Labor believe that all people are created equal in their entitlement to dignity and respect, and should have an equal chance to achieve their potential. For Labor, government has a critical role in ensuring fairness by: ensuring equal opportunity; removing unjustifiable discrimination; and achieving a more equitable distribution of wealth, income and status. Further sections of the Platform stress Labors support for Equality and Human Rights, Labour Rights and Democracy.In practice, the Platform provides only general policy guidelines to Labors federal, state and territory parliamentary leaderships. The policy Labor takes into an election campaign is determined by the Cabinet (if the party is in office) or the Shadow Cabinet (if it is in opposition), in consultation with key interest groups within the party, and is contained in the parliamentary Leaders policy speech delivered during the election campaign. When Labor is in office, the policies it implements are determined by the Cabinet, subject to the Platform. Generally, it is accepted that while the Platform binds Labor governments, how and when it is implemented remains the prerogative of the parliamentary caucus. It is now rare for the Platform to conflict with government policy, as the content of the Platform is usually developed in close collaboration with the partys parliamentary leadership as well as the factions. However, where there is a direct contradiction with the Platform, Labor governments have sought to change the Platform as a prerequisite for a change in policy. For example, privatisation legislation under the Hawke government occurred only after holding a special national conference to debate changing the Platform.Early ideologyThe Labor Party is commonly described as a social democratic party, but its constitution stipulates that it is a democratic socialist party.( ) light on the hill is a phrase used to describe the objective of the Australian Labor Party. The phrase was coined in a 1949 conference speech by then Prime Minister Chifley. The party was created by, and has always been influenced to some extent by trade unionists, and its policy at any given time has been the policy of the broader labour movement. Thus at the first federal election 1901 Labors platform called for a White Australia (a view held by all federal MPs at the time bar Bruce Smith, a Free Trader), a citizen army and compulsory arbitration of industrial disputes.(McKinlay (1981) p. 19) Labor has at various times supported high tariffs and low tariffs, conscription and pacifism, Australia and multiculturalism, nationalisation and privatisation, isolationism and internationalism, as has the conservative side of Australian politics.In the aftermath of War I and the Revolution of 1917, support for socialism grew in trade union ranks, and at the 1921 All-Australian Trades Union Congress a resolution was passed calling for the socialisation of industry, production, distribution and exchange. As a result, Labors Federal Conference in 1922 adopted a similarly worded socialist objective, which remained official policy for many years. The resolution was immediately qualified, however, by the Blackburn amendment, which said that socialisation was desirable only when was necessary to eliminate exploitation and other anti-social features.(McKinlay (1981) p. 53) In practice the socialist objective was a dead letter. Only once has a federal Labor government attempted to nationalise any industry (Chifleys bank nationalisation of 1947), and that was held by the High Court to be unconstitutional.However, the idea that only the socialist working class formed Labor is untrue. Analysis of the early NSW Labor caucus reveals a band of unhappy amateurs, made up of blue collar workers, a squatter, an MD, and even a mine owner. In addition, many members from the working class supported the liberal notion of free trade between the colonies  in the first grouping of state MPs, 17 of the 35 were free-traders. Some historically declare the party a mix of socialism, liberalism, pragmatism and Laborism.() These commitments are deemed to place Labor closer, intellectually and historically, to the 19th century colonial liberals as the forerunners to the Labor party over the conservatives of the time.()Modern LaborVarious ideological beliefs were factionalised under reforms to the ALP under Whitlam, resulting in what is now known as the Socialist Left who tend to favour a more interventionist economic policy and more socially progressive ideals, and Right, the now dominant faction that tends to be more economically liberal and focus to a lesser extent on social issues.The Whitlam government was the first Australian government to use the term rationalism.() The Whitlam Labor government from 1972 to 1975 was different to previous Labor governments, in that it pursued social-democratic policies rather than democratic socialist policies, a precursor to the partys current third way position. Under the Whitlam government, tariffs across the board were cut by 25 percent after 23 years of Labor being in opposition.()The Hawke and Keating governments from 1983 to 1996 pursued many economic policies associated with rationalism and the Third Way, such as floating the Dollar in 1983, reductions in trade tariffs, taxation reforms, changing from centralised wage-fixing to enterprise bargaining, the privatisation of Qantas and Bank, and deregulating the banking system. Keating also proposed a GST in 1985, however due to its unpopularity amongst Labor as well as the electorate, was not adopted. The party also refrained from other reforms, such as wholesale labour market deregulation (e.g. WorkChoices), the eventual GST, the privatisation of Telstra and reform including for the dole, which Howard and the Party of Australia were to initiate after winning office in 1996.It is also said by a former staff member of Blair that New Labour and Blair learnt from the Hawke government in the 1980s on how to govern when they took power in the UK.()Former Labor leader Rudds first speech to parliament in 1998 stated: Competitive markets are massive and generally efficient generators of economic wealth. They must therefore have a central place in the management of the economy. But markets sometimes fail, requiring direct government intervention through instruments such as industry policy. There are also areas where the public good dictates that there should be no market at all.We are not afraid of a vision in the Labor Party, but nor are we afraid of doing the hard policy yards necessary to turn that vision into reality. Parties of the Centre Left around the world are wrestling with a similar challengethe creation of a competitive economy while advancing the overriding imperative of a just society. Some call this the `third way. The nomenclature is unimportant. What is important is that it is a repudiation of Thatcherism and its Australian derivatives represented opposite. It is in fact a new formulation of the nations economic and social imperatives.() Rudd is critical of free market economists such as Hayek,( )() although Rudd describes himself as basically a conservative when it comes to questions of public financial management, pointing to his slashing of public service jobs as a Queensland governmental advisor.()()StructureThe Australian Labor Party is a democratic and federal party, which consists of both individual members and trade unions, who between them decide the partys policies, elect its governing bodies and choose its candidates for public office. The majority of trade unions in Australia are affiliated to the party, and their affiliation fees, based on the size of their memberships, makes up a large part of the partys income. The party consists of six state and two territory branches, each of which consists of local branches which any Australian resident can join, plus affiliated trade unions. Individual members pay a membership fee, which is graduated according to income. Members are generally expected to attend at least one meeting of their local branch each year, although there are differences in the rules from state to state. In practice only a dedicated minority regularly attend meetings. Many members only become active during election campaigns. The party has about 50,000 individual members, although this figure tends to fluctuate along with the partys electoral fortunes.The members and unions elect delegates to state and territory conferences (usually held annually, although more frequent conferences are often held). These conferences decide policy, and elect state or territory executives, a state or territory president (an honorary position usually held for a one-year term), and a state or territory secretary (a full-time professional position). The larger branches also have full-time assistant secretaries and organisers. In the past the ratio of conference delegates coming from the branches and affiliated unions has varied from state to state, however under recent national reforms at least 50% of delegates at all state and territory conferences must be elected by branches.The party holds a National Conference every three years, which consists of delegates representing the state and territory branches (many coming from affiliated trade unions, although there is no formal requirement for unions to be represented at the National Conference). The National Conference approves the partys Platform and policies, elects the National Executive, and appoints office-bearers such as the National Secretary, who also serves as national campaign director during elections. The current National Secretary is Wright. The most recent National Conference was held from 30 July 2009 to 1 August 2009. The next National Conference is scheduled for early December 2011. It was brought forward six months in order to have a debate on gay marriage well ahead of the next election.(http://www.smh.com.au/opinion/politics/doughty-defender-to-tackle-labors-white-bread-ways-20110410-1d97j.html, Sydney Morning Herald, 11 April 2011)(ALP Right rejects proposal, Brisbane Times, 20 November 2010)The national Leader of the Labor Party is elected by the Labor members of the national Parliament (the Caucus), not by the conference. Until recently the national conference elected the partys National President, a largely honorary position, but since 2003 the position has rotated amongst a presidential team of three, directly elected by the partys individual members. Each member of the team serves a one-year term as National President, with the other members serving as Vice-Presidents.(Bligh joins ALP national president team, The Age, 30 March 2009.) The current National President is McAllister,(Welcome to New ALP National President, Australian Labor Party, 6 July 2011.) the National Vice-Presidents are Michael Williamson (President from July 2009 to July 2010) and Bligh (President from July 2010 to July 2011).The Labor Party contests national, state and territory elections. In some states it also contests local government elections: in others it does not, preferring to allow its members to run as non-endorsed candidates. The process of choosing candidates is called pre-selection. Candidates are pre-selected by different methods in the various states and territories. In some they are chosen by ballots of all party members, in others by panels or committees elected by the state conference, in still others by a combination of these two. Labor candidates are required to sign a pledge that if elected they will always vote in Parliament in accordance with the Platform and decisions made by a vote of the Caucus. They are also sometimes required to donate a portion of their salary to the party, although this practice has declined with the introduction of public funding for political parties.FactionsThe Labor Party has always had a left wing and a right wing, but since the 1970s it has been organised into formal factions, to which some party members belong and often pay an additional membership fee. The two largest factions are Unity (on the right) and the Socialist Left. Labor Unity generally supports free-market policies and the US Alliance and tends to be conservative on some social issues. The National Left, although it seldom openly espouses socialism, favours more state intervention in the economy, is generally less enthusiastic about the US Alliance and is often more progressive on social issues. The factions are themselves divided into sub-factions, and there is a constantly changing pattern of factional and sub-factional alliances around particular policy issues or around particular pre-selection disputes. Frequently these alliances and disputes reflect power struggles between or within trade unions.The trade unions are also factionally aligned. The largest unions supporting the right are the Workers Union (AWU), the Union of Workers (NUW) and the Distributive and Allied Employees Association (SDA). Important unions supporting the left include the Manufacturing Workers Union (AMWU), the Hospitality and Miscellaneous Union (LHMU), the Forestry, Mining and Energy Union (CFMEU), the Services Union (ASU) and the Union of Australia (MUA). But these affiliations are seldom unconditional or permanent. The AWU and the NUW, for example, are bitter rivals and the NUW sometimes aligns itself with the left. Moreover, in some cases different branches may have different factional alignment. On some issues, such as opposition to the Governments industrial relations policy, all the unions are in agreement and work as a bloc within the party.Pre-selections are usually conducted along factional lines, although sometimes a non-factional candidate will be given preferential treatment (this happened with Kernot in 1998 and again with Garrett in 2004). Deals between the factions to divide up the safe seats between them often take place. Pre-selections, particularly for safe Labor seats, can sometimes be strongly contested along factional lines. A particularly fierce pre-selection sometimes gives rise to accusations of stacking (signing up large numbers of nominal party members to vote in pre-selection ballots), personation, multiple voting and, on occasions, fraudulent electoral enrolment. Trade unions were in the past accused of giving inflated membership figures to increase their influence over pre-selections, but party rules changes have stamped out this practice. Pre-selection results are sometimes challenged, and the National Executive is sometimes called on to arbitrate these disputes.ALP Federal Leaders:Shown by default in chronological order of leadership{| classwikitable sortable|-! Year! Name! Term in office! classunsortable|Period! Time in office|-| 1901| Watson| Prime Minister 1904| May 1901  October 1907| 06y 07m|-| 1907| Fisher| Prime Minister 19081909, 19101913, 19141915| October 1907  27 October 1915| 08y 00m|-| 1915| Hughes| Prime Minister 19151923| 27 October 1915  14 November 1916| 01y 01m|-| 1916| Tudor|| 14 November 1916  10 January 1922| 05y 01m|-| 1922| Charlton|| 16 May 1922  29 March 1928| 05y 10m|-| 1928| Scullin| Prime Minister 19291932| 26 April 1928  1 October 1935| 07y 05m|-| 1935| Curtin| Prime Minister 19411945| 1 October 1935  5 July 1945| 09y 09m|-| 1945| Forde| Prime Minister 1945| 6 July 1945  13 July 1945| 00y Northern Territory* Martin (200107, first Labor Chief Minister of the Northern Territory, first female Chief Minister of the Northern Territory)Australian Capital Territory* Follett (1989, 199195, inaugural Chief Minister of the ACT, and first female head of government of an Australian state or territory)* Stanhope (200111)New South Wales* Keneally (200911)* Rees (200809)* Iemma (200508)* Carr (19952005)* Unsworth (198688)* Wran (197686)* Renshaw (196465)* Heffron (195964)* Cahill (195259)* McGirr (194752)* McKell (194147)* Jack Lang (192527, 193032)* James Dooley (1921, 192122)* John Storey (192021)* Holman (191316)* McGowen (191013)see also of the Australian Labor Party in New South WalesQueensland* Beattie (19982007)* Goss (198996)* Gair (195257)* Ned Hanlon (194652)* Frank Cooper (194246)* Forgan Smith (193242)* McCormack (192529)* William Gillies (1925)* Theodore (191925)* J. Ryan (191519)* Dawson (1899, worlds first leader of a parliamentary socialist government)South Australia* Arnold (199293)* Bannon (198292)* Corcoran (1979)* Dunstan (196768, 197079)* Walsh (196567)* Robert Richards (1933)* Hill (192627, 193033)* John Gunn (192426)* Vaughan (191517)* Verran (191012)* Price (190509)Tasmania* Bartlett (200811)* Lennon (200408)* Bacon (19982004)* Michael Field (198992)* Holgate (198182)* Doug Lowe (197781)* Neilson (197577)* Reece (195869, 197275)* Edward Brooker (194748)* Cosgrove (193947, 194858)* Dwyer-Gray (1939)* Ogilvie (193439)* Lyons (192328)* John Earle (1909, 191416)Victoria* Brumby (200710)* Bracks (19992007)* Kirner (199092, first female premier of Victoria)* Cain II (198290)* Cain (senior) (1943, 194547, 195255)* Hogan (192728, 192932)* Prendergast (1924)* George Elmslie (1913)Western Australia* Carpenter (200608)* Gallop (200106)* Lawrence (199093, first female premier of an Australian state)* Dowding (198890)* Burke (198388)* Tonkin (197174)* Hawke (195359)* Wise (194547)* Willcock (193645)* Collier (192430, 193336)* Scaddan (191116)* Daglish (190405)Other past Labor politiciansSee Australian Labor Party politiciansFor current ALP federal politicians, see:* of members of the Australian House of Representatives* of members of the Australian SenateSee also* Ministry* Labor Party National Executive* Young Labor* of Australia* of political parties in AustraliaReferencesFurther References* Bramble, Tom, and Rick Kuhn. Labors Conflict: Big Business, Workers, and the Politics of Class (Cambridge University Press; 2011) 240 pages;* Calwell, A.A. (1963). Labors Role in Modern Society. Melbourne, Lansdowne Press* * * External links* Australian Labor Party website L-tng Tng strana prceLabor PartyLabor PartyLaborista AustralianoLaborista Partio travailliste australienBuruh AustraliaLaburista Australiano darbinink partijaBuruh AustraliaLabor Partyja:Labor PartyPartia PracyTrabalhista Australiano Labor PairtyLabor Partylaburistika partijatyvenpuoluearbetarparti ()i Partisi ()Lao ng czh:
1520
Aachen
footnotes              Aachen (, also known in English by its French name Aix-la-Chapelle) has historically been a town in Rhine-Westphalia, Germany. Aachen was a favoured residence of Charlemagne, and the place of coronation of the Kings of Germany. Geographically, Aachen is the westernmost town of Germany, located along its borders with Belgium and the Netherlands,  west of Cologne.(Bridgwater, W. & Beatrice Aldrich. (1966) The Columbia-Viking Desk Encyclopedia. Columbia University. p11.) Aachen University, one of Germanys Universities of Excellence, is located in the city.(RWTH is the abbreviation of Rheinisch-Westflische Technische Hochschule, which translates into Rhine-Westphalian Technical University. The institution is commonly referred to as RWTH Aachen or simply RWTH, with the abbreviation remaining untranslated in other languages to avoid the use of the Hochschule term, which is sometimes mistakenly translated as highschool. Sometimes, RWTH Aachen is also referred to as TH Aachen or Aachen University.Note: The term FH Aachen does not refer to the RWTH but to the Aachen, a university of applied sciences, which is also located in Aachen.)(2007 statistics of RWTH Aachen University(German; retrieved 2009-04-09)) Aachens predominant economic focus is on science, engineering, information technology and related sectors. For innovation, Aachen is currently ranked 8th among cities in Germany.(Innovation Cities Index 2009)HistoryA quarry on the Lousberg, which was first used in Neolithic times, attests to the long occupation of the site of Aachen.No larger settlements, however, have been found to have existed in this remote rural area, located at least 15 km from the nearest road even in Roman times, up to the early medieval period when the place is mentioned as a kings mansion for the first time, not long before Charlemagne became ruler of the Germanic Franks.Since Roman times, the hot springs at Aachen have been channeled into baths.( There are currently two places to take the waters, at the Thermen complex and the bathhouse in Burtscheid.(Spa districts in Aachen (German))There is some documentary proof that the Romans named the hot sulfur springs of Aachen Aquis-Granum, and indeed to this day the city is known in Italian as Aquisgrana, in Spanish as Aquisgrn and in Polish as Akwizgran. The name Granus has lately been identified as that of a Celtic deity.In French-speaking areas of the former Empire, the word aquis evolved into the modern Aix.The Middle AgesFile:Construction d Aix-la-Chapelle.jpg|thumb|left|Construction of Aix-la-Chapelle, by Fouquet.After Roman times, Einhard mentions that in 7656 Pippin the Younger spent both Christmas and Easter at Aquis villa (),(Ppin le Bref, Annales dginhard) which must have been sufficiently equipped to support the royal household for several months. In the year of his coronation as King of Franks, 768, Charlemagne came to spend Christmas at Aachen for the first time. He went on to remain there in a mansion which he may have extended, although there is no source attesting to any significant building activity at Aachen in his time, apart from the building of the Chapel in Aachen (since 1929, cathedral) and the palatial presentation halls. Charlemagne spent most winters between 792 and his death in 814 in Aachen, which became the focus of his court and the political centre of his empire. After his death, the king was buried in the church which he had built; his original tomb has been lost, while his alleged remains are preserved in the shrine where he was reburied after being declared a saint; his saintliness, however, was never very widely acknowledged outside the bishopric of Lige where he may still be venerated by tradition.(In 936, Otto I was crowned king of the kingdom in the collegiate church built by Charlemagne. Over the next 500 years, most kings of Germany destined to reign over the Roman Empire were crowned in Aachen. The last king to be crowned here was Ferdinand I in 1531.( During the Ages, Aachen remained a city of regional importance, due to its proximity to Flanders, achieving a modest position in the trade in woollen cloths, favoured by imperial privilege. The city remained a Free Imperial City, subject to the Emperor only, but was politically far too weak to influence the policies of any of its neighbours. The only dominion it had was over Burtscheid, a neighbouring territory ruled by a Benedictine abbess. It was forced to accept that all of its traffic must pass through the Aachener Reich. Even in the late 18th century the Abbess of Burtscheid was prevented from building a road linking her territory to the neighbouring estates of the duke of Jlich; the city of Aachen even deployed its handful of soldiers to chase away the road-diggers.From the early 16th century, Aachen lost power. A fire devastated the city in 1656.(Aachen. (2006). In Britannica. Retrieved 9 December 2006, from Encyclopdia Britannica Online.) Aachen became attractive as a spa by the middle of the 17th century, not so much because of the effects of the hot springs on the health of its visitors but because Aachen was then  and remained well into the 19th century  a place of high-level prostitution in Europe. Traces of this hidden agenda of the citys history is found in the 18th century guidebooks to Aachen as well as to the other spas; the main indication for visiting patients, ironically, was syphilis; only by the end of the 19th century had rheuma become the most important object of cures at Aachen and Burtscheid. Aachen was chosen as the site of several important congresses and peace treaties: the first congress of Aachen (often referred to as Congress of Aix-la-Chapelle in English) in 1668, leading to the First Treaty of Aachen in the same year which ended the of Devolution. The second congress ended with the second treaty in 1748, finishing the of the Austrian Succession.( The third congress took place in 1818 to decide the fate of occupied Napoleonic France.The nineteenth centuryBy the middle of the 19th century, industrialization swept away most of the citys medieval rules of production and commerce, although the entirely corrupt remains of the citys medival constitution was kept in place (compare the famous remarks of Georg Forster in his Ansichten vom Niederrhein) until 1801, when Aachen became the chef-lieu du dpartement de la Roer in Napolons French Empire. In 1815 after the Wars, the of Prussia took over and the city became one of its most socially and politically backward centres until the end of the 19th century.( Administered within the Province, by 1880 the population was 80,000. Starting in 1840, the railway from Cologne to Belgium passed through Aachen. The city suffered extreme overcrowding and deplorable sanitary conditions up to 1875 when the medieval fortifications were finally abandoned as a limit to building operations and new, less miserable quarters were built in the eastern part of the city, where drainage of waste liquids was easiest. In the 19th century and up to the 1930s, the city was important for the production of railway locomotives and carriages, iron, pins, needles, buttons, tobacco, woollen goods, and silk goods.The twentieth centuryAachen was heavily damaged during War II. The city and its fortified sourroundings were encircled 13 September-16 October 1944 by the US 1st Infantry Division and 3rd Armored Division in conjunction with the US 2nd Armored Division and 30th Infantry Division during the prolonged of Aachen, later reinforced by US 28th Infantry Division elements. Direct assaults through the heavily defended city finally forced the German garrison to surrender on 21 October 1944.(Stanton, Shelby, World War II Order of Battle: An Encyclopedic Reference to U.S. Army Ground Forces from Battalion through Division, 1939-1946, Stackpole Books (Revised Edition 2006), p. 50, 51, 76, 105) Aachen was the first German city to be captured by the Allies. The city was destroyed partially  and in some parts completely  during the fighting,( mostly by American artillery fire and demolitions carried out by the Waffen-SS defenders. Damaged buildings included the medieval churches of St. Foillan, St. Paul and St. Nicholas, and the Rathaus (city hall), although Cathedral was largely unscathed. Only 4,000 inhabitants remained in the city; the rest had followed evacuation orders. Its first Allied-appointed mayor, Oppenhoff, was murdered by an SS commando unit.While the emperors palace no longer exists, the church built by Charlemagne is still the main attraction of the city.(Cathedral of Aachen) In addition to holding the remains of its founder, it became the burial place of his successor Otto III. Aachen Cathedral has been designated as a UNESCO Heritage Site.Main sightsrathaus front.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Aachen city hallFile:Aachen Cathedral North View at Evening.jpg|thumb|Cathedralborder as seen from the town areaCathedral was erected on the orders of Charlemagne in AD 786 and was on completion the largest cathedral north of the Alps. On his death Charlemagnes remains were interred in the cathedral and can be seen there to this day. The cathedral was extended several times in later ages, turning it into a curious and unique mixture of building styles. For 600 years, from 936 to 1531, Aachen Cathedral was the church of coronation for 30 German kings and 12 queens.File:CarolusThermen01.JPG|thumb|200px|left|upright|In the Carolus Thermen named for Charlemagne.The 14th century city hall lies between two central places, the Markt (market place) and the Katschhof (between city hall and cathedral). The coronation hall is on the first floor of the building. Inside you can find five frescoes by the Aachen artist Alfre Rethel which show legendary scenes from the life of Charlemagne, as well as Charlemagnes signature.The Grashaus, a late medieval house at the Markt, is one of the oldest non-religious buildings in downtown Aachen. It hosts the city archive. The Grashaus was the former city hall before the present building took over this function.The Elisenbrunnen is one of the most famous sights of Aachen. It is a neo-classical hall covering one of the citys famous fountains. It is just a minute away from the cathedral. Just a few steps in south-eastern direction lies the 19th century theatre.Also well-known and well worth seeing are the two remaining city gates, the Ponttor, one half mile northwest of the cathedral, and the Kleinmarschiertor, close to the central railway station. There are also a few parts of both medieval city walls left, most of them integrated into more recent buildings, but some others still visible. There are even five towers left, some of which are used for housing.There are many other places and objects worth seeing, for example a notable number of churches and monasteries, a few remarkable 17th- and 18th-century buildings in the particular Baroque style typical of the region, a collection of statues and monuments, park areas, cemeteries, amongst others. The areas industrial history is reflected in dozens of 19th- and early twentieth-century manufacturing sites in the city.EconomyFord-Entwicklungszentrum.jpg|thumb|left|Ford Research Center, Aachen.Aachen has a large number of spin-offs from the universitys IT-technology department and is a major centre of IT development in Germany. Due to the low level of investment in cross-border railway projects, the city has preserved a slot within the Thalys high-speed train network which uses existing tracks on its last 70 km from Belgium to Cologne.The airport that serves Aachen, Aachen Airport, is located about 40 km away in Dutch territory, close to the town of Beek.Aachen was the administrative centre for the coal-mining industries in neighbouring places to the northeast; it never played any role in brown coal mining, however, neither in administrative or industrial terms.Products manufactured in or around Aachen include electronics, chemicals, plastics, textiles, glass, cosmetics, and needles and pins. Its most important source of revenue, the textile industries, have been dead for almost half a century now.TransportAachens railway station, the Hauptbahnhof, was constructed in 1841 at the Cologne-Aachen railway line and replaced in 1905, moving it significantly closer to the city centre. It serves main lines to Cologne, Mnchengladbach and Lige as well as branch lines to Heerlen, Alsdorf, Stolberg and Eschweiler. ICE high speed trains from Brussels via Cologne to am Main and Thalys trains from Paris to Cologne also stop at Aachen Hauptbahnhof. Four RE lines and one RB line connect Aachen with the Ruhrgebiet, Mnchengladbach, Lige, Dsseldorf and the Siegerland. The euregiobahn, a regional railway system, reaches several minor cities in the Aachen region.There are four smaller stations in Aachen: Aachen West, Aachen-Schanz, Aachen-Rothe Erde and Eilendorf. Only slower trains stop at these, but Aachen-West has developed enormous importance due to the expanding Aachen university.Aachen is connected to the Autobahn A4 (West-East), A44 (North-South) and A544 (a smaller motorway from the A4 to the Europaplatz near the city centre). Due to the enormous amount of traffic at the Aachen road interchange, there is often serious traffic accumulation, which is why there are plans to expand the interchange in the coming years.The nearest airports are International Airport (80 km), Bonn Airport (90 km) and Aachen Airport (40 km).SportsFile:600px Alemannia Aachen.png|thumb|Aachen The annual CHIO (short for the French term Concours Hippique International Officiel) is the biggest equestrian meeting of the world and among horsemen considered to be as prestigious for equitation as the tournament of Wimbledon for tennis. Aachen hosted the FEI World Equestrian Games and CHIO Aachen.The local football team Aachen had a short run-out in Germanys first division, after its promotion in 2006. However, the team could not sustain its status and is now back in the second division.The stadium Tivoli, opened in 1928, served as the venue for the teams home games and was well known for its incomparable atmosphere throughout the whole of the second division. Today, the stadium is used by the amateurs, whilst the Bundesliga Club holds its games in the new stadium Neuer Tivoli  meaning New Tivoli- a couple of metres down the road. The building work for the stadium which has a capacity of 32.960, began in May 2008 and was completed by the beginning of 2009.In the South of the city you can find Aachens biggest tennis club TC Grn Weiss, which hosts the famous ATP Tournament once a year.AwardsSince 1950, a committee of Aachen citizens annually awards the Karlspreis (German for Charlemagne Award) to personalities of outstanding service to the unification of Europe. The International Charlemagne Prize of Aachen was awarded in the year 2000 to the President of the United States, Clinton, for his special personal contribution to cooperation with the states of Europe, for the preservation of peace, freedom, democracy and human rights in Europe, and for his support of the enlargement of the European Union. In 2003 the medal was awarded to Giscard dEstaing. In 2004, John Paul IIs efforts to unite Europe were honoured with an Extraordinary Charlemagne Medal, which was awarded for the first time ever. Most recently in 2011, the Charlemagne Award was conferred on Trichet, the president of the European Central Bank. He was acknowledged for his critical role in the stability of the euro despite the economic crises that prevailed in many economic powers.GeographyAachen is at the western end of the line that divides High German to the south from the rest of the West Germanic speech area to the north. Aachen has the hottest springs of Europe with water temperatures of 74C(165F). The water contains a considerable percentage of common salt and other sodium salts and sulphur. As a spa city, Aachen could use the title Bad  Aachen, but as the town then would not then appear in first place on alphabetically ordered lists, it declined to do so.CultureFile:Aachen Rosenmontag 2009.jpg|thumb|Aachen is also famous for its carnival (Karneval, Fasching), in which families dress in colorful costumes.In 1372, Aachen became the first coin-minting city in the world to regularly place an Domini date on a general circulation coin, a groschen.The Scotch-Club in Aachen was the first discothque since October 19, 1959. Klaus Quirini as DJ Heinrich was the first DJ ever.The local specialty of Aachen is an originally stonehard type of sweet bread, baked in large flat loaves, called Printen. Unlike gingerbread (), which is sweetened with honey, Printen are sweetened with sugar. Today, a soft version is sold under the same name which follows an entirely different recipe.Notable residentsvan der Rohe - Wohnhaus II.JPG|thumb|House of the family of Mies van der Rohe.King Ethelwulf of Wessex, father of the Great was born in Aachen. Ludwig Mies van der Rohe, one of the founders of architecture and the last director of the Bauhaus during its period in Dessau and Berlin was born in Aachen as well. In 1850 Paul Julius Reuter founded the Reuters News Agency in Aachen which transferred messages between Brussels and Aachen using pigeons.EducationFile:Aachen-ElegantStreet.JPG|thumb|Typical Aachen street with early twentieth century Grnderzeit houses|rightRWTH Aachen University, established as Polytechnicum in 1870, is one of the Germanys Universities of Excellence with strong emphasis on technological research, especially for electrical and mechanical engineering, computer sciences, physics, and chemistry. The university clinics attached to the RWTH, the Aachen, is the biggest single-building hospital in Europe.() Over time, a host of software and computer industries have developed around the university. It also maintains a garden (the Garten Aachen).Aachen, University of Applied Sciences (AcUAS) was founded in 1971. The AcUAS offers a classic engineering education in professions like Mechatronics, Construction Engineering, Mechanical Engineering or Electrical Engineering. German and international students are educated in more than 20 international or foreign-oriented programs and can acquire German as well as international degrees (Bachelor/Master) or Doppeldiplome (double degrees). Foreign students accounts for more than 21% of the student body.The Armys Technical School (Technische Schule des Heeres und Fachschule des Heeres fr Technik) is in Aachen.International relationsAachen is twinned with:*  Lige, Belgium; since 1955.*  Reims, France; since 1967.*  Halifax, England, Kingdom; since 1979.*  Toledo, Mancha, Spain; since 1985.*  Ningbo, China; since 1986.*  Naumburg, Germany; since 1988.*  Arlington County, Virginia, States; since 1993.*  Town, Africa; since 1999.(Aachen-Kapstadt.de)*  Kostroma, Russia; since 2005.*  HaAyin, Israel; since 2007.*  Baltimore, Ireland; since 2010.See also*(district)*tram*Aachener*Bachverein*of mayors of Aachen*of Aix-la-ChapelleNotesExternal links*City of Aachen (partly available in English)*Aachen-emotion.com  photos, interviews, stories, audio files and video clips featuring Aachen  presented by Aachen City Council. (in German and English)*ASEAG (public bus transport) (in German)*RWTH Aachen University (in German and English)*Fachhochschule Aachen (Aachen University of Applied Sciences)*Google Earth placemark with official image overlays*Panorama pictures of landmarks and places of interest*The Spirit of Aachen  documentary film by SportsQuest International*Einhards Annals: first mention of Aquis villa, 765* Aachen Zoo at Zoo-Infos.de*Article on Aachens historic buildings*Map of the Aachen Area in 1789af:Akenar:roa-rup:Aachenaz:Axenzh-min-nan:Aachenbe-x-old:bs:Aachenbr:Aachenbg:ca:Aquisgrcs:Cchyco:Aquisgranacy:Aachenda:Aachende:Aachenet:Aachenel:es:Aquisgrneo:Aacheneu:Akisgranfa:fr:Aix-la-Chapelle(std)ga:Aachenko:hi:hr:Aachenid:Aachenia:Aachenie:Aachenis:Aachenit:Aquisgranahe:ka:kk:sw:Aachenla:Aquisgranumlv:henelb:Oochenlt:Achenasli:Aokelmo:Aquisgranahu:Aachenmr:ms:Aachen(stad)ja:frr:Aachenno:Aachennn:Aachenoc:Aquisgranpnb:nds:Akenpl:Akwizgranpt:Aquisgranoksh:Ochero:Aachenqu:Aachenru:scn:Aquisgranasimple:Aachensk:Aachensl:Aachensr:sh:Aachenfi:Aachensv:Aachentl:Aachenta:th:(kent)uk:vi:Aachenvo:Aachenwa:xhewar:Aachendiq:Axnzh:
1530
Ainu_people
 related The  , also called Aynu, Aino (), and in historical texts Ezo (), are indigenous people or groups in Japan and Russia. Historically they spoke the language and related varieties and lived in Hokkaid, the Islands, and much of Sakhalin. Most of those who identify themselves as Ainu still live in this same region, though the exact number of living Ainu is unknown. This is due to confusion over mixed heritages and to issues in Japan resulting in those with Ainu backgrounds hiding their identities. In Japan, because of intermarriage over many years with Japanese, the concept of a pure Ainu ethnic group is no longer feasible.(Encyclopedia of bilingualism and bilingual education, Volume 1997 By Colin Baker, Sylvia Prys Jones) Official estimates of the population are of around 25,000, while the unofficial number is upward of 200,000 people.(HistoryAinu culture dates from around 1200 CE() and recent research suggests that it originated in a merger of the Okhotsk and Satsumon cultures.(Sato, Takehiro; et al. (2007). Origins and genetic features of the Okhotsk people, revealed by ancient mitochondrial DNA analysis. Journal of Human Genetics 52 (7): 618627. doi:10.1007/s10038-007-0164-z) In 1264, people reported to the Dynasty of the Empire that Ainu invaded the land of Nivkh, resulting in battles between Ainu and the Yuan Dynasty.() Active contact between the Wajin (the ethnically Japanese) and the Ainu of Ezochi (now known as Hokkaido) began in the 13th century.(Weiner, M (eds) 1997, Japans Minorities: The Illusion of Homogeneity, Routledge, London.) The Ainu were a society of hunter-gatherers, who lived mainly by hunting and fishing, and the people followed a religion based on phenomena of nature.(NOVA Online  Island of the Spirits  Origins of the Ainu. Retrieved on May 8, 2008.)During the Tokugawa period (16001868) the Ainu became increasingly involved in trade with Japanese who controlled the southern portion of the island that is now called Hokkaido. The Bakufu government granted the clan exclusive rights to trade with the Ainu in the Northern part of the island. Later the Matsumae began to lease out trading rights to Japanese merchants, and contact between Japanese and Ainu became more extensive. Throughout this period Ainu became increasingly dependent on goods imported by Japanese, and suffered from epidemic diseases such as smallpox.(Brett L. Walker, The conquest of Ainu Lands:Ecology and Culture in Japanese Expansion 1590-1800-University of California Press,2001,Pages 4956,6171 and Pages 172176) Although trade contributed to better understandings between the Japanese and the Ainu sometimes it also led to conflict, some of these became violent Ainu revolts of which the most important was Revolt (16691672).The turning point for Ainu culture was the beginning of the Restoration in 1868. A variety of social, political and economic reforms were introduced by the Japanese government, in hope of modernising the country in the Western style, and included the annexation of Hokkaido.  Sjberg quotes Babas (1980) account of the Japanese governments reasoning:(  The development of Japans large northern island had several objectives: First, it was seen as a means to defend Japan from a rapidly developing and expansionist Russia.  Second  it offered a solution to the unemployment for the former samurai class  Finally, development promised to yield the needed natural resources for a growing capitalist economy.(Sjberg, K 1993, The Return of the Ainu, Harwood Academic Publishers, Switzerland.)In 1899, the Japanese government passed an act labeling the Ainu as former aborigines, with the idea they would assimilatethis resulted in the land the Ainu people lived on being taken by the Japanese government, and was from then on under Japanese control.(Loos, N & Osani, T 1993, Indigenous Minorities and Education, Sanyusha Publishing Co., Ltd., Tokyo.) Also at this time, the Ainu were granted automatic Japanese citizenship, effectively denying them the status of an indigenous group.The Ainu were becoming increasingly marginalized on their own landover a period of only 36 years, the Ainu went from being a relatively isolated group of people to having their land, language, religion and customs assimilated into those of the Japanese.()  In addition to this, the land the Ainu lived on was distributed to the Wajin who had decided to move to Hokkaido, who had been encouraged by the Japanese government of the Meiji era to take advantage of the islands abundance of natural resources, and to create and maintain farms in the model of western industrial agriculture.   This development was termed Kaitakushi.(Hohmann, S 2008, The Ainus modern struggle in World Watch, Vol 21, No. 6, pp. 2024.)  As well as this, factories such as flour mills and beer breweries and mining practices resulted in the creation of infrastructure such as roads and railway lines, during a development period that lasted until 1904.(Sjberg, K 1993, The Return of the Ainu, Harwood Academic Publishers, Switzerland, p. 117.)  During this time the Ainu were forced to learn Japanese, required to adopt Japanese names and ordered to cease religious practices such as animal sacrifice and the custom of tattooing.()The 1899 act mentioned above was replaced in 1997until then the government had stated there were no ethnic minority groups.( It was not until June 6, 2008 that Japan formally recognised the Ainu as an indigenous group (see Official Recognition, below).(Ainu Dub Band at tff.Rudolstadt 2007.jpg|thumb|left|The Oki Dub Ainu Band, led by the Ainu Japanese musician Oki, in Germany in 2007Intermarriages between Japanese and Ainu were actively promoted by the Ainu to lessen the chances of discrimination against their offspring. As a result, many Ainu are indistinguishable from their Japanese neighbors, but some Ainu-Japanese are interested in traditional Ainu culture. For example, Oki, born as a child of an Ainu father and a Japanese mother, became a musician who plays the traditional Ainu instrument tonkori.() There are many small towns in the southeastern or Hidaka region where full-blooded Ainu may still be seen such as in Nibutani (Ainu: Niputay). In Sambutsu especially, on the eastern coast, many children of such marriages may be seen.Their most widely known ethnonym is derived from the word ainu, which means human (particularly as opposed to kamui, divine beings), basically neither ethnicity nor the name of a race, in the Hokkaid dialects of the language; Emishi (Ebisu) and Ezo  (Yezo)  (both ) are Japanese terms, which are believed to derive from another word for human, which otherwise survived in Sakhalin Ainu as enciw or enju. Today, many Ainu dislike the term Ainu because it had once been used with derogatory nuance, and prefer to identify themselves as Utari (comrade in the Ainu language). Official documents use both names.Official recognitionOn June 6, 2008, a bi-partisan, non-binding resolution was approved by the Diet calling upon the government to recognize the Ainu people as indigenous to Japan and urge an end to discrimination against the group. The resolution recognised the Ainu people as an indigenous people with a distinct language, religion and culture and rescinds the law passed in 1899.(()Though the resolution is historically significant, Hideaki Uemura, professor at University in Tokyo and a specialist in indigenous peoples rights, commented that the motion is weak in the sense of recognizing historical facts as the Ainu were forced to become Japanese in the first place.(OriginsThe origins of the Ainu have often been considered Jmon-jin, natives to Japan from the period.() The  lived in this place a hundred thousand years before the Children of the Sun came is told in one of their Yukar Upopo (Ainu legends).()Ainu culture as it is known today dates from around the year 1200( and recent research suggests that it originated in a merger of the Okhotsk and Satsumon cultures, one of the ancient Japanese cultures.() Their economy was based on farming as well as hunting, fishing and gathering.()Full-blooded Ainu are lighter skinned than their Japanese neighbors and have more body hair.(Travis, John Jomon Genes:Using DNA, researchers probe the genetic origins of modern Japanese Science News February 15, 1997 Vol. 151 No. 7 p. 106 http://findarticles.com/p/articles/mi_m1200/is_n7_v151/ai_19143382/) Many early investigators proposed a Caucasian ancestry,(1911 Encyclopdia Britannica/Ainu) although recent DNA tests have not shown any genetic similarity with modern caucasian Europeans.(dreamersrise.blogspot.com/2009_05_01_archive.html) Many Ainu people have wavy hair, but some straight black hair. Very few of them have wavy brownish hair. Their skins are generally reported to be light brown. But this is due to the fact that they labor on the sea and in briny winds all day. Old people who have long desisted from their outdoor work are often found to be as white as western men. Ainu also have very long beards, ranging from straight to wavy.Genetic testing of the Ainu people has shown them to belong mainly to Y-haplogroup D2.() Y-DNA haplogroup D2 is found frequently throughout the Archipelago including Okinawa. The only places outside of Japan in which Y-haplogroup D is common are Tibet and the Islands in the Indian Ocean.(http://www.scs.uiuc.edu/~mcdonald/WorldHaplogroupsMaps.pdf)left|thumb|170px|1862 illustration of Ainu (left) and NivkhsIn a study by Tajima et al. (2004), two out of a sample of sixteen (or 12.5%) Ainu men have been found to belong to Haplogroup C3, which is the most common Y-chromosome haplogroup among the indigenous populations of the Far East and Mongolia.( Hammer et al. (2006) have tested a sample of four Ainu men and have found that one of them belongs to haplogroup C3.() Some researchers have speculated that this minority of Haplogroup C3 carriers among the Ainu may reflect a certain degree of unidirectional genetic influence from the Nivkhs, a traditionally nomadic people of northern Sakhalin Island and the adjacent mainland, with whom the Ainu have long-standing cultural interactions.(Based on analysis of one sample of 51 modern Ainus, their mtDNA lineages have been reported to consist mainly of haplogroup Y (11/51  21.6% according to Tanaka et al. 2004, or 10/51  19.6% according to Adachi et al. 2009, who have cited Tajima et al. 2004), haplogroup D (9/51  17.6%, particularly D4(xD1)), haplogroup M7a (8/51  15.7%), and haplogroup G1 (8/51  15.7%).(()(Noboru Adachi, Ken-ichi Shinoda, Kazuo Umetsu, and Hirofumi Matsumura, Mitochondrial DNA Analysis of Jomon Skeletons From the Funadomari Site, , and Its Implication for the Origins of Native American, American Journal of Physical Anthropology 138:255265 (2009))Mitochondrial DNA haplogroup Y is otherwise found mainly among Nivkhs, and with lower frequency among peoples, Koreans, Mongols (including Kalmyks and Buryats), Chinese, Japanese, Asians, South Siberian Turkic peoples (e.g. Tuvans, Todjins, Soyots), Koryaks, Alyutors, Itelmens, aborigines, Filipinos, Indonesians, and Malaysians. MtDNA Haplogroup D is found frequently throughout East Asia and Central Asia, and is also common in some populations of North Asia, Southeast Asia, and the Americas; in addition, it has been found with low frequency in some populations of Europe and Southwest Asia. Haplogroup M7a has been found elsewhere mainly among Japanese and Ryukyuans, and with lower frequency among Udegeys, Koreans, Chinese, Filipinos, aborigines, Buryats, Asians, and Waars of the Jaintia Hills in Meghalaya, India.((Han-Jun Jin, Ki-Cheol Kim, and Wook Kim, Genetic Diversity of Two Haploid Markers in the Udegey Population From Southeastern Siberia, American Journal of Physical Anthropology (2010))(Miroslava Derenko, Boris Malyarchuk, Tomasz Grzybowski, Galina Denisova, Irina Dambueva, Maria Perkova, Choduraa Dorzhu, Faina Luzina, Hong Kyu Lee, Tomas Vanecek, Richard Villems, and Ilia Zakharov, Phylogeographic Analysis of Mitochondrial DNA in Northern Asian Populations, American Journal of Human Genetics, 2007 November; 81(5): 10251041.)(Toomas Kivisild, Helle-Viivi Tolk, Jri Parik, Yiming Wang, Surinder S. Papiha, Hans-Jrgen Bandelt and Richard Villems, The Emerging Limbs and Twigs of the East Asian mtDNA Tree, Molecular Biology and Evolution 19:17371751 (2002).)(Reddy BM, Langstieh BT, Kumar V, Nagaraja T, Reddy ANS et al. (2007), Austro-Asiatic Tribes of Northeast India Provide Hitherto Missing Genetic Link between South and Southeast Asia. PLoS ONE 2(11): e1141. doi:10.1371/journal.pone.0001141)(Yong-Gang Yao, Qing-Peng Kong, Hans-Jrgen Bandelt et al., Phylogeographic Differentiation of Mitochondrial DNA in Han Chinese, American Journal of Human Genetics 70:635651, 2002.) MtDNA Haplogroup G has been found most frequently among indigenous populations of easternmost Siberia, but it is also common among some populations of East Asia, Central Asia, the Altai-Sayan region of southern Siberia, and the sub-Himalayan region.A recent reevaluation of cranial traits suggests that the Ainu resemble the Okhotsk more than they do the Jmon.() This agrees with the reference to the Ainu culture being a merger of Okhotsk and Satsumon cultures referenced above.After a new wave of immigration, probably from the Korean Peninsula some 2,300 years ago, of the people, the Jmon were pushed into northern Japan. Genetic data suggest that modern Japanese are descended from both the Yayoi and the Jmon.GeographyThe Ainu were distributed in the northern and central islands of Japan, from Sakhalin island in the north to the Kuril islands and the island of Hokkaid and Northern Honsh, although some investigators place their former range as throughout Honsh and as far north as the southern tip of the Peninsula in what is now Lopatka. The island of Hokkaido was known to the Ainu as Ainu Moshir, and was formally annexed by the Japanese at the late date of 1868, partly as a means of preventing the intrusion of the Russians, and partly for imperialist reasons.According to the Empire Census of 1897, 1446 persons in the Russian Empire reported Ainu language as their mother tongue, 1434 of them in Sakhalin Island.(Russian Empire Census of 1897: TotalsRussian Empire Census of 1897: Sakhalin )The southern half of Sakhalin was acquired by Japan as a result of the War of 190405, but at the end of World War II in 1945, the Soviets declared war on Japan and took possession of the Kuril islands and southern Sakhalin. The Ainu population, as previously Japanese subjects, were repatriated to Japan.According to the 2002 Russian Federation census, no responders gave the ethnonym Ainu in boxes 7 or 9.2 in the K-1 form of the census,(http://www.perepis2002.ru/ct/doc/English/4-2.xls)(http://www.perepis2002.ru/ct/doc/English/4-3.xls)(http://www.perepis2002.ru/index.html?id87) though some still might exist.The only Ainu speakers remaining (besides perhaps a few partial speakers) live solely in Japan. There, they are concentrated primarily on the southern and eastern coasts of the island of Hokkaid.Due to intermarriage with the Japanese and ongoing absorption into the predominant culture, there are no truly Ainu settlements existing in Japan today. The town of Nibutani (Ainu: Niputay) in Hidaka area (Hokkaido prefecture) has a number of Ainu households and a visit to some of the Ainu owned craft shops close to the Ainu museums (there are two of them in Nibutani) is an opportunity to interact with the Ainu people. Many authentic Ainu villages advertised in Hokkaido such as Akan and Shiraoi are tourist attractions and provide an opportunity to see and meet Ainu people.LanguageToday, it is estimated that fewer than 100 speakers of the language remain,(Hohmann, S. 2008, The Ainus modern struggle in World Watch, Vol 21., No. 6, pp. 2024.) while other research places the number at fewer than 15 speakers  the language has been regarded as endangered.(Vovin, A. 1993, A Reconstruction of Proto-Ainu, Brill, p. 3)  As a result of this the study of the Ainu language is limited and is based largely on historical research.The Ainu language is significantly different from the Japanese language in its syntax, phonology, morphology, and vocabulary. Although there have been attempts to show that they are related, modern scholars have rejected that the relationship goes beyond contact, such as the mutual borrowing of words between Japanese and Ainu.(Shibatani, M. 1990, The Languages of Japan, Cambridge University Press, London, p. 3)  In fact, no attempt to show a relationship with Ainu to any other language has gained wide acceptance, and Ainu is currently considered to be a isolate.(Shibatani, M. 1990, The Languages of Japan, Cambridge university Press, London, p. 5)Words used as prepositions in English (such as to, from, by, in, and at) are postpositional in Ainu; they come after the word that they modify. A single sentence in Ainu can be made up of many added or agglutinated sounds or morphemes that represent nouns or ideas.The Ainu language has had no system of writing, and has historically been transliterated by the Japanese kana or the Russian Cyrillic.  Today, it is typically written in either katakana or Latin alphabet. The unwieldy nature of the Japanese kana with its inability to accurately represent consonants has contributed to the degradation of the original Ainu.  For example, some words, such as Kor (meaning to hold), are now pronounced with a terminal vowel sound, as in Koro.Many of the Ainu dialects, even from one end of Hokkaido to the other, were not mutually intelligible; however, the classic Ainu language of the Yukar, or Ainu epic stories, was understood by all. Without a writing system, the Ainu were masters of narration, with the Yukar and other forms of narration such as the Uepeker (Uwepeker) tales, being committed to memory and related at gatherings, often lasting many hours or even days.(Omniglot, 2009, Ainu, retrieved August 2, 2009, http://www.omniglot.com/writing/ainu.htm)CultureFile:Ainu ceremonial dress.jpg|thumb|Ainu ceremonial dress. Museum.Traditional Ainu culture was quite different from Japanese culture. Never shaving after a certain age, the men had full beards and moustaches. Men and women alike cut their hair level with the shoulders at the sides of the head, trimmed semicircularly behind. The women tattooed their mouths, and sometimes the forearms. The mouth tattoos were started at a young age with a small spot on the upper lip, gradually increasing with size. The soot deposited on a pot hung over a fire of birch bark was used for color. Their traditional dress was a robe spun from the inner bark of the elm tree, called attusi or attush. Various styles of clothing were made, and consisted generally of a simple short robe with straight sleeves, which was folded around the body, and tied with a band about the waist. The sleeves ended at the wrist or forearm and the length generally was to the calves. Women also wore an undergarment of Japanese cloth.Modern craftswomen weave and embroider traditional garments that command very high prices. In winter the skins of animals were worn, with leggings of deerskin and in Sakhalin, boots were made from the skin of dogs or salmon. Both sexes are fond of earrings, which are said to have been made of grapevine in former times, as also are bead necklaces called tamasay, which the women prized highly.Their traditional cuisine consists of the flesh of bear, fox, wolf, badger, ox or horse, as well as fish, fowl, millet, vegetables, herbs, and roots. They never ate raw fish or flesh; it was always boiled or roasted.Their traditional habitations were reed-thatched huts, the largest  square, without partitions and having a fireplace in the center. There was no chimney, only a hole at the angle of the roof; there was one window on the eastern side and there were two doors. The house of the village head was used as a public meeting place when one was needed.Instead of using furniture, they sat on the floor, which was covered with two layers of mats, one of rush, the other of a water plant with long sword shaped leaves (iris pseudacorus, whose English names include water-flag); and for beds they spread planks, hanging mats around them on poles, and employing skins for coverlets. The men used chopsticks when eating; the women had wooden spoons. cuisine is not commonly eaten outside Ainu communities; there are only a few Ainu-run restaurants in Japan, all located in Tokyo or Hokkaid, serving primarily Japanese fare.The functions of judgeship were not entrusted to chiefs; an indefinite number of a communitys members sat in judgment upon its criminals. Capital punishment did not exist, nor did the community resort to imprisonment. Beating was considered a sufficient and final penalty. However, in the case of murder, the nose and ears of the culprit were cut off or the tendons of his feet severed.HuntingThe Ainu hunted from late autumn to early summer. The reasons for this were, among others, that in late autumn, gathering, salmon fishing and other activities of securing food came to an end, and hunters readily found game in fields and mountains in which plants had withered. A village possessed a hunting ground of its own or several villages used a joint hunting territory (iwor) . Heavy penalties were imposed on any outsiders trespassing on such hunting grounds or joint hunting territory. The Ainu hunted bear, Ezo deer (a subspecies of deer), rabbit, fox, dog and other animals. Ezo deer were a particularly important food resource for the Ainu as were salmon. They also hunted eagles such as sea eagles, raven and other birds. The Ainu hunted eagles to obtain their tail feathers, which they used in trade with the Japanese. The Ainu hunted with arrows and spears with poison-coated points. They obtained the poison, called surku, from the roots and stalks of aconites. The recipe for this poison was a household secret that differed from family to family. They enhanced the poison with mixtures of roots and stalks of dogs bane, boiled juice of Mekuragumo, Matsumomushi, tobacco, and other ingredients. They also used stingray stingers or skin covering stingers. They hunted in groups with dogs. Before the Ainu went hunting, for animals like bear in particular, they prayed to the god of fire and the house guardian god to convey their wishes for a large catch, and safe hunting to the god of mountains.The Ainu usually hunted bear during the time of the spring thaw. At that time bears were weak because they had not fed at all during long hibernation. Ainu hunters caught hibernating bears or bears that had just left hibernation dens. When they hunted bear in summer, they used a spring trap loaded with an arrow, called an amappo.The Ainu usually used arrows to hunt deer. Also they often used traps, including spring traps loaded with arrows. Also, they drove deer into a river or sea and shot them with arrows. For a large catch, a whole village would drive a herd of deer off a cliff and club them to death.ReligionThe Ainu are traditionally animists, believing that everything in nature has a kamuy (spirit or god) on the inside. There is a hierarchy of the kamui.The most important is grandmother earth (fire), then kamui of the mountain (animals), then kamui of the sea (sea animals), lastly everything else. They have no priests by profession.The village chief performs whatever religious ceremonies are necessary; ceremonies are confined to making libations of rice beer, uttering prayers, and offering willow sticks with wooden shavings attached to them. These sticks are called inaw (singular) and nusa (plural).They are placed on an altar used to send back the spirits of killed animals. Ainu ceremonies for sending back bears are called Iomante. The Ainu people give thanks to the gods before eating and pray to the deity of fire in time of sickness. They believe their spirits are immortal, and that their spirits will be rewarded hereafter by ascending to kamui mosir (Land of the Gods).The Ainu believe the bear is very special because they think the bear is the mountain kamuys way of delivering the gift of bear hide and meat to the humans.Some Ainu in the north are members of the Orthodox Church.OrnamentsMen wore a crown called sapanpe for important ceremonies. Sapanpe was made from wood fiber with bundles of partially-shaved wood. This crown had wooden figures of animal gods and other ornaments on its center. Men carried an emush (sword) secured by an emush at strap to their shoulders.Women wore a matanpushi (embroidered headband) and ninkari (earrings).Ninkari was a metal ring with a ball. Women wore it through a hole in the ear. Matanpushi and ninkari were originally worn by men. However, women wear them now. Furthermore, aprons called maidari now are a part of womens formal clothes. However, some old documents say that men wore maidari. Women sometimes wore a bracelet called tekunkani.Women wore a necklace called rekutunpe, a long, narrow strip of cloth with metal plaques. They wore a necklace that reached the breast called a tamasay or shitoki, usually made from glass balls. Some glass balls came from trade with the Asian continent. The Ainu also obtained glass balls secretly made by the Matsumae Clan.HousingA village is called a kotan in the Ainu language. Kotan were located in river basins and seashores where food was readily available, particularly in the basins of rivers through which salmon went upstream. A village consisted basically of a paternal clan. The average number of families was four to seven, rarely reaching more than ten. In the early modern times, the Ainu people were forced to labor at the fishing grounds of the Japanese. Ainu kotan were also forced to move near fishing grounds so that the Japanese could secure a labor force. When the Japanese moved to other fishing grounds, Ainu kotan were also forced to accompany them. As a result, the traditional kotan disappeared and large villages of several dozen families were formed around the fishing grounds.Kotan houses were made of grasses, grass, barks, etc. The length lay east to west or parallel to a river. A house was about seven meters by five with an entrance at the west end that also served as a storeroom. The house had three windows, including the rorun-puyar, a window located on the side facing the entrance (at the east side), through which gods entered and left and ceremonial tools were taken in and out. The Ainu have regarded this window as sacred and have been told never to look in through it. A house had a fireplace near the entrance. The husband and wife sat on the fireplaces left side (called shiso) . Children and guests sat facing them on the fireplaces right side (called harkiso). The house had a platform for valuables called iyoykir behind the shiso. The Ainu placed shintoko(hokai) and ikayop (quivers) there.Outbuildings included separate lavatories for men called ashinru and for women called menokoru, a pu (storehouse) for food, a heper set (cage for young bear), and drying-racks for fish and wild plants. An altar nusasan faced the east side of the house (rorunpuyar). The Ainu held such ceremonies there as lyomante, a ceremony to send the spirit of a bear to the gods.Life of AinuThe Ainu people had various types of marriage. A child was promised in marriage by arrangement between his or her parents and the parents of his or her betrothed or by a go-between. When the betrothed reached a marriageable age, they were told who their spouse was to be. There were also marriages based on mutual consent of both sexes. In some areas, when a daughter reached a marriageable age, her parents let her live in a small room called tunpu annexed to the southern wall of her house. The parents chose her spouse from men who visited her.The age of marriage was 1718 years old for men and 1516 years for women, who were tattooed. At these ages, both sexes were regarded as adults.When a man proposed to a woman, he visited her house, ate half a full bowl of rice handed to him by her, and returned the rest to her. If the woman ate the rest, she accepted his proposal. If she did not and put it beside her, she rejected his proposal. When a man became engaged to a woman or they learned that their engagement had been arranged, they exchanged gifts with each other. He sent her a small engraved knife, a workbox, a spool and other gifts. She sent him embroidered clothes, coverings for the back of the hand, Ieggings, and other handmade clothes. According to some books, many yomeiri marriages, in which a bride went to the house of a bridegroom with her belongings to become a member of his family, were conducted in the old days.For a yomeiri marriage, a man and his father would bring betrothal gifts to the house of a woman, including a sword, a treasured sword, an ornamental quiver, a sword guard, and a woven basket (hokai). If the man and woman agreed to marry, the man and his father would bring her to their house or the man would stay at her house for a while and then bring her to his house. At the wedding ceremony, participants prayed to the god of fire. Bride and bridegroom respectively ate half of the rice served in a bowl, and other participants were entertained.The worn-out fabric of old clothing was used for baby clothes because soft cloth was good for the skin of babies and worn-out material protected babies from gods of illness and demons due to these gods abhorrence of dirty things. Before a baby was breast-fed, he/she was given a decoction of the endodermis of alder and the roots of butterburs to discharge impurities. Children were raised almost naked until about the ages of four to five. Even when they wore clothes, they did not wear belts and left the front of their clothes open. Subsequently they wore bark clothes without patterns, such as attush, until coming of age.Newborn babies were named ayay (a babys crying), shipo, poyshi (small excrement), shion (old excrement), etc. Children were called by these temporary names until the ages of two to three. They were not given permanent names when they were born. Their tentative names had a portion meaning excrement or old things to ward off the demon of ill-health. Some children were named based on their behavior or habits. Other children were named after impressive events or after parents wishes for the future of the children. When children were named, they were never given the same names as others.Men wore loincloths and had their hair dressed properly for the first time at age 1516. Women were also considered adults at the age of 1516. They wore underclothes called mour and had their hair dressed properly and wound waistcloths called raunkut, ponkut, etc. around their bodies. When women reached age 1213, the lips, hands and arms were tattooed. When they reached age 1516, their tattoos were completed. Thus were they qualified for marriage.American continent connection theoryIn the late 20th century, speculation arose that people of the group related to the Jmon may have been one of the first to settle America. This theory is based largely on skeletal and cultural evidence among tribes living in the western part of North America and certain parts  of America.It is possible that North America had several peoples among its early settlersthese relatives of the Jmon being one of them. The best known evidence that may support this theory is probably Man.(Kennewick Man Skeletal Find May Revolutionalize Continents History, Science Daily, April 2006.)(ANTHROPOLOGY: Kennewick Mans Contemporaries, Science.)Genetic mapping studies by Cavalli-Sforza have shown a sharp gradient in gene frequencies centered in the area around the of Japan, and particularly in the Archipelago, that distinguishes these populations from others in the rest of eastern Asia and most of the American continent. This gradient appears as the third most important genetic movement (in other words, the third principal component of genetic variation) in Eurasia (after the Great expansion from Africa, which has a cline centered in Arabia and adjacent parts of the East, and a second cline that distinguishes the northern regions of Eurasia and particularly Siberia from regions to the south), which would make it consistent with the early Jmon period, or possibly even the pre-Jmon period.(Cavalli-Sforza. The History and Geography of Human Genes p.253, ISBN 0-691-08750-4: The synthetic maps suggest a previously unsuspected center of expansion from the Sea of Japan but cannot indicate dates. This development could be tied to the Jmon period, but one cannot entirely exclude the pre-Jmon period and that it might be responsible for a migration to the Americas. A major source of food in those pre-agricultural times came from fishing, then as now, and this would have limited for ecological reasons the area of expansion to the coastline, perhaps that of the Sea of Japan, but also father along the Pacific Coast.)InstitutionsFile:Ainu promotion center, Sapporo.JPG|thumb|Ainu cultural promotion center and museum, in Sapporo  (Sapporo Pirka Kotan)Most Hokkaido Ainu and some other Ainu are members of an umbrella group called the Utari Association. It was originally controlled by the government to speed Ainu assimilation and integration into the Japanese nation-state. It now is run exclusively by Ainu and operates mostly independently of the government.Other key institutions include The Foundation for Research and Promotion of Ainu Culture (FRPAC), set up by the Japanese Government after enactment of the Ainu Culture Law in 1997, the Hokkaido University Center for Ainu and Indigenous Studies established in 2007, as well as museums and cultural centers.  Ainu people living in Tokyo have also developed a vibrant political and cultural community.(Links to these organizations needed, also Tokyo Ainu documentary, http://www.2kamuymintara.com/film/top.htm, and http://www.2kamuymintara.com/film/groups.htm has links to Tokyo area Ainu groups.)Current affairsLitigationOn March 27, 1997, the Sapporo District Court decided a landmark case that, for the first time in Japanese history, recognized the right of the Ainu people to enjoy their distinct culture and traditions. The case arose because of a 1978 government plan to build two dams in the River watershed in southern Hokkaido. The dams were part of a series of development projects under the Second National Development Plan that were intended to industrialize the north of Japan.(Mark A. Levin, Essential Commodities and Racial Justice: Using Constitutional Protection of Japans Indigenous Ainu People to Inform Understandings of the United States and Japan, New York University Journal of International Law and Politics, Vol. 33, pp. 445-46, 2001)  The planned location for one of the dams was across the valley floor close to Nibutani village,(Levin, Mark (trans.), Kayano et al. v. Hokkaido Expropriation Committee: The Nibutani Dam Decision (1999). International Legal Materials, Vol. 38, p. 394, 1999. Available at SSRN: http://ssrn.com/abstract1635447 p. 11) the home of a large community of Ainu people and an important center of Ainu culture and history.(Mark A. Levin, Essential Commodities p. 447)  In the early 1980s when the government commenced construction on the dam, two Ainu landowners refused to agree to the expropriation of their land. These landowners were Kaizawa Tadashi and Kayano Shigeruwell-known and important leaders in the Ainu community.(Idem., p. 443)  After Kaizawa and Kayano declined to sell their land, the Hokkaido Development Bureau applied for and was subsequently granted a Project Authorization, which required the men to vacate their land. When their appeal of the Authorization was denied, Kayano and Kaizawas son Koichii (Kaizawa died in 1992), filed suit against the Hokkaido Development Bureau.The final decision denied the relief sought by the plaintiffs for pragmatic reasonsthe dam was already standingbut the decision was nonetheless heralded as a giant victory for the Ainu people. In short, nearly all of the plaintiffs claims were recognized. Moreover, the decision marked the first time Japanese case law acknowledged the Ainu as an indigenous people and contemplated the responsibility of the Japanese nation to the indigenous people within its borders.(Nibutani Dam Decision (Levin trans.); see also Idem., p. 442)  The decision included broad fact-finding that underscored the long history of the oppression of the Ainu people by Japans majority, referred to as Wajin in the case and discussions about the case.(Nibutani Dam Decision (Levin trans.); see also Mark A. Levin, The Wajins Whiteness: Law and Race Privilege in Japan, Horitsu Jiho, Vol. 80, No. 2, 2008)  The legal roots of the decision can be found in Article 13 of Japans Constitution, which protects the rights of the individual, and in the International Covenant on Civil and Political Rights.(postscript )(postscript )  The decision was issued on March 27, 1997, and because of the broad implications for Ainu rights, the plaintiffs decided not to appeal the decision, which became final two week later. After the decision was issued, on May 8, 1997, the Diet passed the Ainu Culture Law and repealed the Ainu Protection Actthe 1899 law that had been the vehicle of Ainu oppression for almost one hundred years.(Act for the Promotion of Ainu Culture & Dissemination of Knowledge Regarding Ainu Traditions (Hitchingham trans.); see also, Mark A. Levin, Essential Commodities p. 467)  While the Ainu Culture Law has been widely criticized for its shortcomings, the shift that it represents in Japans view of the Ainu people is a testament to the importance of the Nibutani decision. In 2007 the Cultural Landscape along the Sarugawa River resulting from Ainu Tradition and Modern Settlement was designated an Important Cultural Landscape.() A later action seeking restoration of Ainu assets held in trust by the Japanese Government was dismissed in 2008.(Citation to Levin and Tsunemoto in Oklahoma Law Review)Governmental advisory boardsMuch national policy in Japan has been developed out of the action of governmental advisory boards, known as shingikai/ in Japanese.  One such committee operated in the late 1990s,(Citation to Siddles book) and its work resulted in the 1997 Ainu Culture Law.(Act for the Promotion of Ainu Culture & Dissemination of Knowledge Regarding Ainu Traditions (Hitchingham trans.))  This panels circumstances were criticized for including not even a single Ainu person among its members.(More recently, a panel was established in 2006, which notably was the first time an Ainu person was included.  It completed its work in 2008 issuing a major report that included an extensive historical record and called for substantial government policy changes towards the Ainu.SubgroupsFile:Sakhalin ainu men II.jpg|thumb|Sakhalin Ainu men, photographed by Pisudski.Ainu dwelling.jpg|thumb|Kuril Ainu people in front of the traditional dwelling.*Hokkaido Ainu (the predominant community of Ainu in the world today)  A Japanese census in 1916 returned 13,557 pure blooded Ainu in addition to 4,550 multiracial individuals.()*Tokyo Ainu (a modern age migration of Hokkaido Ainu highlighted in a documentary film released in 2010, http://www.2kamuymintara.com/film/top.htm)*Tohoku Ainu (from Honsh, no officially-acknowledged population exists)  43 Ainu households scattered throughout the Tohoku region were reported during the 17th century.(Honda, Katsuichi (2000). Harukor: an Ainu womans tale. of California Press via Books. p. 7.) There are people who consider themselves descendants of Shimokita Ainu on the Peninsula, while the people on the Peninsula are generally considered as Yamato people but may be descendants of Tsugaru Ainu after cultural assimilation.()*Sakhalin Ainu  Pure blooded individuals may be surviving in Hokkaido. From both Northern and Southern Sakhalin, a total of 841 Ainu were relocated to Hokkaido in 1875 by Japan. Only a few in remote interior areas remained, as the island was turned over to Russia. Even when Japan was granted Southern Sakhalin in 1905, only a handful returned. Japanese census of 1905 counted only 120 Sakhalin Ainu (down from 841 in 1875, 93 in Karafuto and 27 in Hokkaido). Russian census of 1926 counted 5 Ainu, while several of their multiracial children were recorded as ethnic Nivkh, Slav or Uilta.** North Sakhalin  Only 5 pure blooded individuals were recorded during the 1926 Russian Census in Northern Sakhalin. Most of the Sakhalin Ainu (mainly from coastal areas) were relocated to Hokkaido in 1875 by Japan. The few remained (mainly from remote interior) were mostly married to Russians as can be seen from the works of Pisudski.(Howell, David L. (2005). Geographies of identity in nineteenth-century Japan. of California Press via Books. p. 187.)** Southern Sakhalin (Karafuto)  Japanese rule until 1945. Japan evacuated almost all the Ainus to Hokkaido after the WW2. Isolated individuals might have remained in Sakhalin.(http://demoscope.ru/weekly/ssp/rus_nac_26.php?reg1420) In 1949, there were about 100 Ainu living in Russian Sakhalin.(Wurm, Stephen Adolphe; Mhlhusler, Peter; Tryon, Darrell T. (1996). Atlas of languages of intercultural communication in the Pacific, Asia and the Americas. de Gruyter via Books. p. 1010.)*Northern Kuril Ainu (no known living population)  Also known as Kurile in Russian records. Were under Russian rule till 1875. First came under Japanese rule after the of Saint Petersburg (1875). Major population was on the island of Shumshu, with a few others in islands like Paramushir. Altogether they numbered 221 in 1860. They had Russian names, spoke Russian fluently and were Orthodox in religion. As the islands were gifted to the Japanese, more than a hundred Ainu fled to Kamchatka along with their Russian employers (where they were assimilated in to the Kamchadal population).((Minichiello, Sharon (1998). Japans competing modernities: issues in culture and democracy, 1900-1930. of Hawaii Press via Books. p. 163.) Only about half remained under Japanese rule. In order to derussify the Kurile, the entire population of 97 individuals were relocated to Shikotan in 1884, given Japanese names and children were enrolled in to Japanese schools. Unlike the other Ainu groups, the Kurile failed to adjust to their new surroundings and by 1933 only 10 individuals were alive (plus another 34 multiracial individuals). The last group of 20 individuals (including a few pure bloods) were evacuated to Hokkaido in 1941, where they vanished as a separate ethnic group soon after.(*Southern Kuril Ainu (no known living population)  Numbered almost 2,000 people (mainly in Kunashir, Iturup and Urup) during the 18th century. In 1884, their population had decreased to 500. Around 50 individuals (mostly multiracial) who remained in 1941 were evacuated to Hokkaido by the Japanese soon after WW2.( The last of the tribe, Tanaka Kinu died in Hokkaido in 1973.(http://uwspace.uwaterloo.ca/bitstream/10012/2765/1/Scott%20Harrison_GSO_Thesis.pdf)*Kamchatka Ainu (no known living population)  Known as Kamchatka Kurile in Russian records. Ceased to exist as a separate ethnic group after their defeat in 1706 by the Russians. Individuals were assimilated in to the Kurile and Kamchadal ethnic groups. Last recorded in 18th century by Russian explorers.(Shibatani, Masayoshi (1990). The languages of Japan. University Press via Books. p. 3.)*Amur Valley Ainu (probably none remain)  a few individuals married to ethnic Russians and ethnic Ulchi reported by Bronisaw Pisudski in early 20th century.(Pisudski, Bronisaw; Majewicz, Alfred F. (2004). The collected works of Bronisaw Pisudski Volume 3. de Gruyter via Books. p. 816.) Only 26 pure blooded individuals were recorded during the 1926 Russian Census in Nikolaevski Okrug (present day   Nikolaevskij Region/District).(http://demoscope.ru/weekly/ssp/rus_nac_26.php?reg1410) Probably assimilated in to the Slavic rural population. Although no one identifies as Ainu nowadays in Krai, there are a large number of ethnic Ulch with partial Ainu ancestry.(Shaman: an international journal for Shamanistic research, Volumes 4-5 p.155)(Pisudski, Bronisaw; Majewicz, Alfred F. (2004). The collected works of Bronisaw Pisudski Volume 3. de Gruyter via Books. p. 37.)See also  *music*Ainu-ken*Aterui*Pisudski*Burakumin*of Japan*on the Rights of Indigenous Peoples*Emishi*issues in Japan*Ethnocide*M. Hiller, Jr.*Human rights in Japan*peoples*Man*of ethnic groups*Matagi*Dam*Nivkhs*independence movement*people*Kayano Shigeru*Shogun*people*YukarNotesReferences and further reading*******Hitchingham, Masako Yoshida (trans.),Act for the Promotion of Ainu Culture & Dissemination of Knowledge Regarding Ainu Traditions, Asian-Pacific Law & Policy Journal, vol. 1, no. 1 (2000).*Kayano, Shigeru (1994). Our Land Was A Forest: An Ainu Memoir. Westview Press. ISBN 0-8133-1880-7. ISBN 978-0-8133-1880-6.**Levin, Mark, Essential Commodities and Racial Justice: Using Constitutional Protection of Japans Indigenous Ainu People to Inform Understandings of the United States and Japan (2001). New York University of International Law and Politics, Vol. 33, p, 419, 2001 . Available at SSRN: http://ssrn.com/abstract1635451*Levin, Mark (trans.), Kayano et al. v. Hokkaido Expropriation Committee: The Nibutani Dam Decision (1999). International Legal Materials, Vol. 38, p. 394, 1999. Available at SSRN: http://ssrn.com/abstract1635447****Article on the Ainu in Japans Minorities: The Illusion of Homogeneity. External links *Rare Japanese Video Featuring Ainu*The Ainu Museum at Shiraoi*Smithsonian Institution*Hokkaido Utari Kyokai*Sapporo Pirka Kotan Ainu Cultural Center*Institute for the Study of Languages and Cultures of Ainu in Hokkaido*Ainu-North American cultural similarities*Foundation for Research and Promotion of Ainu Culture (centers located in Sapporo and Tokyo)*Hokkaido University Center for Ainu and Indigenous Studies*Ainu Lineage*The Boone Collection*Nibutani Ainu Cultural Museum (in Japanese)*Ainu Komonjo (18th & 19th century records)  Ohnuki Collection*Article in The Christian Science Monitor, June 9, 2008*Aino Folk-Tales, Chamberlain, B. H. Folk-Lore Society, 1888. (Members edition, without expurgation)Ainuar:(etnia)br:Ainouedbg:ca:Ainuscs:Ainuda:Ainude:Ainuet:Ainudel:es:Ainueo:Ajnuoj(ethnie du Japon)fy:Ainga:Aidhnichhy:Ainu(popolazione)he:ku:Ainlt:Ainai(np)Ainu(volk)ja:no:Ainuernn:Ainuarnds:Ainupl:Ajnowiept:Ainus(populaie)ru:peoplesl:Ainush:Ainufi:Ainutsv:Ainuth:tr:Aynularuk:Ainuzh:
1548
Alexander_Emanuel_Agassiz
 children  L. AgassizAlexander Emmanuel Rodolphe Agassiz (December 17, 1835  March 27, 1910), son of Agassiz and stepson of Cabot Agassiz, was an American scientist and engineer.()BiographyAgassiz was born in Neuchtel, Switzerland and emigrated to the States with his father in 1849. He graduated from University in 1855, subsequently studying engineering and chemistry, and taking the degree of of science at the scientific school of the same institution in 1857; and in 1859 became an assistant in the States Coast Survey.Thenceforward he became a specialist in marine ichthyology, but devoted much time to the investigation, superintendence and exploitation of mines. J. Hulbert, a friend of Agassizs brother-in-law, Adams Shaw, had discovered a rich copper lode known as the conglomerate on the Peninsula Superior in Michigan. He persuaded them, along with a group of friends, to purchase a controlling interest in the mines, which later became known as the and Hecla Mining Company based in Michigan. He was elected a Fellow of the Academy of Arts and Sciences in 1862.() Up until the summer of 1866, Agassiz worked as an assistant in the museum of natural history that his father founded at Harvard. That summer, he took a trip to see the mines for himself and he afterwards became treasurer of the enterprise. Over the winter of 1866 and early 1867, mining operations began to falter due to the difficulty of extracting copper from the conglomerate. Hulbert had sold his interests in the mines and had moved on to other ventures. But Agassiz refused to give up hope for the mines, and he returned to the mines in March 1867 with his wife and young son. At that time, Calumet was a remote settlement, virtually inaccessible during the winter and very far removed from civilization even during the summer. With insufficient supplies at the mines, Agassiz struggled to maintain order, while back in Boston, Shaw was saddled with debt and the collapse of their interests. Shaw obtained financial assistance from John Simpkins, the selling agent for the enterprise to continue operations. Agassiz continued to live at Calumet, making gradual progress in stabilising the mining operations, such that he was able to leave the mines under the control of a general manager and return to Boston in 1868 before winter closed navigation.The mines continued to prosper and in May 1871, several mines were consolidated to form the and Hecla Mining Company with Shaw as its first president. In August, 1871, Shaw retired to the board of directors and Agassiz became president, a position he held until his death.Agassiz was a major factor in the mines continued success and visited the mines twice a year. He innovated by installing a giant engine, known as the Superior, which was able to lift 24 tons of rock from a depth of 1,200 metres (4,000 ft). He also built a railroad and dredged a channel to navigable waters. However, after a time the mines did not require his full-time year-round attention and he returned to his interests in natural history at Harvard.Out of his copper fortune, he gave some US$500,000 to Harvard for the museum of comparative zoology and other purposes.In 1875 he surveyed Titicaca, Peru, examined the copper mines of Peru and Chile, and made a collection of Peruvian antiquities for the of Comparative Zoology, of which he was curator from 1874 to 1885.  He assisted Wyville Thomson in the examination and classification of the collections of the 1872 Challenger Expedition, and wrote the Review of the Echini (2 vols., 18721874) in the reports.Between 1877 and 1880 he took part in the three dredging expeditions of the steamer Blake of the Coast Survey, and presented a full account of them in two volumes (1888). In 1896 Agassiz visited Fiji and Queensland and inspected the Barrier Reef, publishing a paper on the subject in 1898.Of Agassizs other writings on marine zoology, most are contained in the bulletins and memoirs of the museum of comparative zoology; but he published in 1865, with Cary Agassiz, his stepmother, Seaside Studies in Natural History, a work at once exact and stimulating, and in 1871 Marine Animals of Massachusetts Bay.Agassiz served as a president of the National Academy of Sciences, which since 1913 has awarded the Agassiz Medal in his memory. He died in 1910 on board the RMS Adriatic en route to New York from Southampton. Publications * * * * * * * * * * * See also*familyReferences* *External links* National Mining Hall of Fame:  Alexander Agassiz* AgassizAgassizAgassizEmanuel AgassizEmanuel AgassizEmanuel Agassizja:AgassizEmanuel AgassizAgassiz
1841
Economy_of_Alberta
File:Alberta oil field.JPG|thumb|Aerial photo of oilfield roads and drill sites in the Oil Field, 2008. Albertas economy is one of the strongest in Canada, supported by the petroleum industry and, to a lesser extent, agriculture and technology. The per capita GDP in 2007 was by far the highest of any province in Canada at C$74,825 (approx. US$74,000). In 2006 Albertas per capita GDP was higher than all US states, and one the highest figures in the world . Albertas per capita GDP in 2007 was 61% higher than the Canadian average of C$46,441 and more than twice that of all the provinces. In 2006, the deviation from the national average was the largest for any province in Canadian history.()According to the Institute, Alberta has very high levels of freedom and rates Alberta as the most free economy in Canada,() and second most free economy amongst U.S. states and Canadian provinces.()Economic geographyAlberta has a small market and is relatively distant from major markets, despite good transportation links to the rest of Canada and to the United States to the south. Alberta is located in the northwestern quadrant of America, in a region of low density called the Plains (and referred to by one author as North Americas Empty Quarter). Alberta is landlocked, and separated by a series of mountain ranges from the nearest outlets to the Pacific Ocean, and by the Shield from ports on the Lakehead or Bay. From these ports to major populations centres and markets in Europe or Asia is several thousands of kilometers. The largest population clusters of North America (the Boston  Washington, San Francisco - San Diego, Chicago  Pittsburgh, and City  Windsor Corridors) are all thousands of kilometers away from Alberta. Partly for this reason, Alberta has never developed a large presence in the industries that have traditionally started industrialization in other places (notably the original Revolution in Great Britain) but which require large forces, and large internal markets or easy transportation to export markets, namely textiles, metallurgy, or transportation-related manufacturing (automotives, ships, or train cars).Agriculture has the been a key industry since the 1870s. The climate is dry, temperate, and continental, with extreme variations between seasons. Productive soils are found in most of the southern half of the province (excluding the mountains), and in certain parts of the north. Agriculture on a large scale is practiced further north in Alberta that anywhere else in North America, extending into the River country above the parallel north. Generally, however, Alberta (and areas along the Rockies) is forested land and logging is more important than agriculture there. Agriculture is divided into primarily crops in the east, livestock in the west, and a mixture in between and in the parkland belt in the near north.Conventional oil and gas fields are found throughout the province on an axis running from the northwest to the southeast. Oil sands are found in the northeast, especially around McMurray (the Oil Sands).Because of its (relatively) economically isolated location, Alberta relies heavily on transportation links with the rest of the world. Albertas historical development has been largely influenced by the development of new infrastructure, (see trends below). Alberta is now served by two major railways (CN and CP), by three major highway connections to the Pacific (the Trans-Canada via Horse Pass, the Yellowhead via Pass and the Crowsnest via Pass), and one to the United States (15), as well as two international airports (Calgary and Edmonton).Calgary-Edmonton CorridorThe Corridor is the most urbanized region in the province and one of the densest in Canada. Measured from north to south, the region covers a distance of roughly 400 kilometres. In 2001, the population of the Calgary-Edmonton Corridor was 2.15 million (72% of Albertas population).() It is also one of the fastest growing regions in the country. A 2003 study by Bank Financial Group  found the corridor is the only Canadian urban centre to amass a U.S. level of wealth while maintaining a Canadian-style quality of life, offering universal health care benefits. The study found GDP per capita in the corridor was 10% above average U.S. metropolitan areas and 40 above other Canadian cities at that time.CalgaryEdmonton rivalrySeeing Calgary and Edmonton are part of a single economic region as the TD study did in 2003 was novel. The more traditional view had been to see the two cities are economic rivals. For example, in the 1980 both cities claimed to be the Oil Capital of Canada. Calgary is home to most oil company head offices. Edmonton, and more so its surrounding region (Nisku, Leduc, Fort Saskatchewan), is the site of most oil-and-gas related industry including refining and manufacturing.TrendsFile:Leduc oil.jpg|thumb|left|The No. 1 well, which blew in 1947, marked the beginning of series of petroleum-related booms.Alberta has always been an economy. In line with Innis thesis, the economy has changed substantially as different export commodities have risen or fallen in importance. In sequence, the most important products have been: fur, wheat and beef, and oil and gas.The development of in Alberta has been crucial to its historical economic development. The American fur trade relied on canoes, boats, and River carts on trails to move furs out and Europe good in to the region. Immigration into the province was eased tremendously by the arrival of the Pacific Railways line in 1880s. Commercial farming became viable in the area once the trade had developed technologies to handle the bulk export of grain, especially cars and elevators. Oil and gas exports have been possible because of increasing pipeline technology.Prior to the 1950s, Alberta was a primarily agricultural economy, based on the export of wheat, beef, and a few other commodities. The health of economy was closely bound up with the of wheat.In 1947 a major field was discovered near Edmonton. It was not the first petroleum find in Alberta, but it was large enough to significantly alter the economy of the province (and coincided with growing American demand for energy). Since that time, Albertas economic fortunes have largely tracked the of oil, and increasingly gas prices. When oil prices spiked during the Oil Embargo, oil crisis, and energy crisis, Albertas economy boomed. However, during the oil glut Albertas economy suffered. Alberta boomed once again during the 2003-2008 oil price spike. In July 2008 the price of oil peaked and began to decline and Albertas economy soon followed suit, with unemployment doubling within a year.   with natural gas prices at a long-term low, Albertas economy is in poor health compared to before, although still relatively better than many other comparable jurisdictions.The spin-offs from petroleum have allowed Alberta to develop many other industries. Oilpatch-related manufacturing is an obvious example, but financial services and government services have also benefited from oil money.A comparison of the development of Albertas less oil and gas-endowed neighbours, Saskatchewan and Manitoba, reveals the role petroleum has played. Alberta was once the smallest of the three Provinces by population in the early 20th century, but by 2009, Albertas population was 3,632,483 or approximately three times as much as either Saskatchewan (1,023,810) or Manitoba (1,213,815).EmploymentAlbertas economy is a highly developed one in which most people work in services such as healthcare, government, or retail. Primary industries are also of great importance, however.Employment in extraction industriesAs of 2007:(http://www.energy.alberta.ca/About_Us/1527.asp)* Mining and Oil and Gas Extraction Sector   146,900* Oil and Gas Extraction industry  69,900* Support Activities for Mining & Oil & Gas Extraction (primarily oil and gas exploration and drilling)  71,700* Mining other than oil and gas (mainly coal and mineral mining & quarrying)  5,100Largest employersAccording to Venture magazines list of the 50 largest employers in the province, the largest employers are:SectorsIndustryAlberta is the largest producer of conventional crude oil, crude, gas and gas products in the country. Alberta is the worlds 2nd largest exporter of natural gas and the 4th largest producer.(State of Alaska - Trade Report on Alberta) Two of the largest producers of petrochemicals in North America are located in central and north central Alberta. In both Red Deer and Edmonton, world class polyethylene and vinyl manufacturers produce products shipped all over the world, and Edmontons oil refineries provide the raw materials for a large petrochemical industry to the east of Edmonton.The Oil Sands (sometimes known as the Athabasca sands) have estimated oil reserves approximately equal to the oil reserves of the rest of the world, estimated to be . With the development of new extraction methods such as assisted gravity drainage (SAGD), which was developed in Alberta, bitumen and synthetic crude oil can be produced at costs close to those of conventional crude. Many companies employ both conventional strip mining and non-conventional situ methods to extract the bitumen from the oil sands. With current technology and at current prices, about  of bitumen are recoverable. McMurray, one of Canadas fastest growing cities, has grown enormously in recent years because of the large corporations which have taken on the task of oil production. As of late 2006 there were over $100 billion in oil sands projects under construction or in the planning stages in northeastern Alberta.Another factor determining the viability of oil extraction from the Tar Sands is the price of oil. The price increases since 2003 have made it more than profitable to extract this oil, which in the past would give little profit or even a loss.With concerted effort and support from the provincial government, several high-tech industries have found their birth in Alberta, notably patents related to interactive crystal display systems.(Interactive display system - US Patent U.S. Patent No. 5,448,263; U.S. Patent for Touch Sensitive Technology - SMART Technologies) With a growing economy, Alberta has several financial institutions dealing with civil and private funds.EnergyOil and gasthumb|Drilling rig in Alberta.Since the early 1940s, Alberta had supplied oil and gas to the rest of Canada and the States. The River region produces oil for internal and external use. The Oil Sands contain the largest proven reserves of oil in the world outside Arabia. gas has been found at several points, and in 1999, the production of natural gas liquids (ethane, propane, and butanes) totalled , valued at $2.27 billion. Alberta also provides 13% of all the natural gas used in the United States.Notable gas reserves were discovered in the 1883 near Medicine Hat.(Alberta Energy: Energy Facts)  The town of Medicine Hat began using gas for lighting the town, and supplying light and fuel for the people, and a number of industries using the gas for manufacturing. In fact a large glassworks was established at Redcliff. When Kipling visited Medicine Hat he described it as the city with all hell for a basement.Basic statistics* In 2003, Alberta produced  of conventional light, medium, and heavy crude, plus an additional  of pentanes plus used for blending with heavy crude oil and bitumen to facilitate its transportation through pipelines.(Government of Alberta. Energy Overview)* Alberta exports over  of oil to US markets accounting for 10 per cent of US oil imports.* The conventional oil resource is estimated to have approximately  of remaining established reserves.*Conventional crude oil production (not including oil sands and plus) represented 38.6% of Alberta s total crude oil and equivalent production and 25.5% of Canadas total crude oil and equivalent production.*Albertas oil sands reserve is considered to be one of the largest in the world, containing  of bitumen initially in place. Of this total,  are considered to be remaining established reserves, recoverable using current technology under present and anticipated economic conditions. To date, about 2% of the initial established resource has been produced.* In 2003, total crude bitumen production in Alberta averaged .* Disposition of Alberta s total crude oil and equivalent production in 2003 was approximately::* 62% to the United States:* 24% within Alberta:* 14% to the rest of Canada* In 2003, Alberta produced  of marketable natural gas.* The average Albertan household uses  of natural gas a year.* Over 80 per cent of Canadas natural gas production is from Alberta.* In 2006, Alberta consumed  of natural gas. The rest was exported across Canada and to the United States.* Royalties to Alberta from natural gas and its byproducts are larger than royalties from crude oil and bitumen.* In 2006, there were 13,473 successful natural gas wells drilled in Alberta: 12,029 conventional gas wells and 1,444 methane wells* There may be up to  of coalbed methane in Alberta, although it is unknown how much of this gas might be recoverable.* Alberta has one of the most extensive natural gas systems in the world as part of its energy infrastructure, with  of energy related pipelines.CoalCoal has been mined in Alberta since the late 19th century. Over 1800 mines have operated in Alberta since then.(The coal industry was vital to the early development of several communities, especially those in the foothills and along deep river valleys where coal was close to the surface.Alberta is still a major coal producer, every two weeks Alberta produces enough coal to fill the Dome in Toronto.(Much of that coal is burned in Alberta for electricity generation. Alberta uses over 25 million tonnes of coal annually to generate electricity.(Alberta has vast coal resources and 70 per cent of Canadas coal reserves are located in Alberta. This amounts to 33.6 Gigatonnes.(Vast beds of coal are found extending for hundreds of miles, a short distance below the surface of the plains. The coal belongs to the Cretaceous beds, and while not so heavy as that of the Measures in England is of excellent quality. In the valley of the River, alongside the Pacific Railway, valuable beds of anthracite coal are still worked. The usual coal deposits of the area of bituminous or semi-bituminous coal. These are largely worked at Lethbridge in southern Alberta and Edmonton in the centre of the province. Many other parts of the province have pits for private use.Electricity, Albertas generating capacity was 11,919 MW, and Alberta has about  of transmission lines.Alberta has over 490 megawatts of power capacity.Alberta has added 4400 MW of new supply since 1998  that is equal to all the power generated in Saskatchewan.Winter peak for power use in one day was in November 2006  9,661 MW.Summer peak for power use in one day was set on July 18, 2007  9,192 MW.(Mineral miningBuilding stones mined in Alberta include stone, and sandstone.Diamonds were first found in Alberta in 1958, and many stones have been found since, although to date no large-scale mines have been developed.(ManufacturingThe Edmonton area, and in particular Nisku is a major centre for manufacturing oil and gas related equipment. As well Edmontons Refinery Row is home to a petrochemical industry.BiotechnologySeveral companies and services in the biotech sector are clustered around the University of Alberta, for example ColdFX.Food processingOwing to the strength of agriculture, food processing was one a major part of the economies of Edmonton and Calgary, but this sector has increasingly moved to smaller centres such as Brooks, the home of Packers.TransportationFile:WestJetHQ.jpg|thumb|400px|Headquarters of the airline WestJet, in Calgary.Edmonton is a major distribution centre for northern communities, hence the nickname Gateway to the North. Edmonton is one Rails most important hubs. Since 1996, Pacific Railway has its headquarters in downtown Calgary.WestJet, Canadas second largest air carrier, is headquartered in Calgary, by International Airport, which serves as the airlines primary hub.(Contact Us. WestJet. Retrieved on May 20, 2009.) Prior to its dissolution, Airlines was headquartered in Calgary by the airport.(Investor & Financial Information. Airlines. March 3, 2000. Retrieved on May 20, 2009.) Prior to its dissolution, Canada subsidiary Zip was headquartered in Calgary.(Pigg, Susan. Zip, WestJet in fare war that could hurt them both; Move follows competition bureau ruling Battle could intensify when Zip flies eastward. Star. January 22, 2003. Business C01. Retrieved on September 30, 2009.)Agriculture and forestryIn the past, cattle, horses, and sheep were reared in the southern prairie region on ranches or smaller holdings. Currently Alberta produces cattle valued at over $3.3 billion, as well as other livestock in lesser quantities. In this region irrigation is widely used.  Wheat, accounting for almost half of the $2 billion agricultural economy, is supplemented by canola, barley, rye, beets, and other mixed farming.Agriculture has a significant position in the provinces economy. Over three million cattle are residents of the province at one time or another,(Alberta Livestock Inspections - August 2006 - Alberta Government, Department of Agriculture) and Albertan beef has a healthy worldwide market. Nearly one half of all Canadian beef is produced in Alberta. Alberta is one of the prime producers of plains buffalo (bison) for the consumer market. Sheep for wool and lamb are also raised.Image:Grain Elevator 047.jpg|thumb|200px|left|Grain elevator in AlbertaWheat and canola are primary farm crops, with Alberta leading the provinces in spring wheat production, with other grains also prominent. Much of the farming is dryland farming, often with fallow seasons interspersed with cultivation. Continuous cropping (in which there is no fallow season) is gradually becoming a more common mode of production because of increased profits and a reduction of soil erosion. Across the province, the once common elevator is slowly being lost as rail lines are decreased and farmers now truck the grain to central points.Alberta is the leading beekeeping province of Canada, with some beekeepers wintering hives indoors in specially designed barns in southern Alberta, then migrating north during the summer into the Peace River valley where the season is short but the working days are long for honeybees to produce honey from clover and fireweed. Hybrid canola also requires bee pollination, and some beekeepers service this need.The vast northern forest reserves of softwood allow Alberta to produce large quantities of lumber, oriented strand board (OSB) and plywood, and several plants in northern Alberta supply North America and the Rim nations with bleached pulp and newsprint.In 1999, lumber products from Alberta were valued at $4.1 billion of which 72% were exported around the world. Since forests cover approximately 59% of the provinces land area, the government allows about  to be harvested annually from the forests on public lands.ServicesDespite the high profile of the extractive industries, Alberta has a mature economy and most people work in services.FinanceCalgary is head office for many major oil and gas related companies, and many financial service business have grown up around them.Edmonton is the headquarters of the only major Canadian banks west of Toronto: Western Bank, and Financial.GovernmentDespite Albertas reputation as a small government province, many health care and education professionals are lured to Alberta from other provinces by the higher wages the Alberta government is able to offer because of oil revenues.See also* of Lethbridge* Oil Patch, for the petroleum industry* of the petroleum industry in CanadaReferencesExternal links* CBC Digital Archives - Striking Oil in Alberta
1942
Airline
File:Fedex-md11-N525FE-051109-21-16.jpg|thumb|A Express Douglas MD-11. FedEx Express is the worlds largest airline in terms of freight tons flown.()File:Ryanair.b737-800.aftertakeoff.arp.jpg|thumb|Ryanair Boeing 737-800 shortly after take-off. Ryanair is the worlds largest airline in terms of number of international passengers carried.()An airline provides air transport services for traveling passengers and/or freight. Airlines lease or own their aircraft with which to supply these services and may form partnerships or alliances with other airlines for mutual benefit. Generally, airline companies are recognized with an air operating certificate or license issued by a governmental aviation body.Airlines vary from those with a single aircraft carrying mail or cargo, through full-service international airlines operating hundreds of aircraft. Airline services can be categorized as being intercontinental, intra-continental, domestic, regional, or international, and may be operated as scheduled services or charters.HistoryThe first airlinesAmerican aviation pioneers, such as Porter and Marriott, attempted to start airlines using airships in the mid-19th century, focusing on the New YorkCalifornia route. Those attempts floundered due to such mishaps as the airships catching fire and the aircraft being ripped apart by spectators. DELAG, Deutsche Luftschiffahrts-Aktiengesellschaft was the worlds first airline.() It was founded on November 16, 1909 with government assistance, and operated airships manufactured by The Zeppelin Corporation. Its headquarters were in Frankfurt.  The four oldest non-dirigible airlines that still exist are Netherlands KLM,  Colombias Avianca, Australias Qantas, and the Czech Republics Airlines. KLM first flew in May 1920, while Qantas (which stands for Queensland and Northern Territory Aerial Services Limited) was founded in Queensland, Australia, in late 1920.U.S. airline industryEarly developmentFile:TWA 1940.jpg|thumb|TWA DC-3 in 1940. The DC-3, often regarded as one of the most influential aircraft in the history of commercial aviation, revolutionized the aviation industry.()Jannus conducted the United States first scheduled commercial airline flight on 1 January 1914 for the St. Petersburg-Tampa Airboat Line.() The 23-minute flight traveled between Petersburg, Florida and Florida, passing some  above Tampa Bay in Jannus XIV biplane flying boat. International Airlines began service between Miami and Bimini in the Bahamas in February 1919. Based in Lauderdale, Chalks claimed to be the oldest continuously operating airline in the United States until its closure in 2008.()Following War I, the United States found itself swamped with aviators. Many decided to take their war-surplus aircraft on barnstorming campaigns, performing aerobatic maneuvers to woo crowds. In 1918, the States Postal Service won the financial backing of Congress to begin experimenting with mail service, initially using Jenny aircraft that had been procured by the States Army Air Service. Private operators were the first to fly the mail but due to numerous accidents the US Army was tasked with mail delivery. During the course of the Armys involvement they proved to be too unreliable and lost their air mail duties. By the mid-1920s, the Postal Service had developed its own air mail network, based on a transcontinental backbone between New York and San Francisco. To supplant this service, they offered twelve contracts for spur routes to independent bidders. Some of the carriers that won these routes would, through time and mergers, evolve into Am, Air Lines, Airways, Airlines, Airlines (originally a division of Boeing), World Airlines, Airlines, and Air Lines.Service during the early 1920s was sporadic: most airlines at the time were focused on carrying bags of mail. In 1925, however, the Motor Company bought out the Stout Aircraft Company and began construction of the all-metal Trimotor, which became the first successful American airliner. With a 12-passenger capacity, the Trimotor made passenger service potentially profitable. Air service was seen as a supplement to rail service in the American transportation network.At the same time, Trippe began a crusade to create an air network that would link America to the world, and he achieved this goal through his airline, American World Airways, with a fleet of flying boats that linked Los Angeles to Shanghai and Boston to London. Pan Am and Northwest Airways (which began flights to Canada in the 1920s) were the only U.S. airlines to go international before the 1940s.With the introduction of the 247 and DC-3 in the 1930s, the U.S. airline industry was generally profitable, even during the Depression. This trend continued until the beginning of War II.Development since 1945File:Boeing 377 Stratocruiser (B-29) American Overseas 1949-50.jpg|thumb|In October 1945, the Export Airlines became the first airline to offer regular commercial flights between North America and Europe.() Shown here is Am Ex 377 Stratocruiser in 1949.As governments met to set the standards and scope for an emergent civil air industry toward the end of the war, the U.S. took a position of maximum operating freedom; U.S. airline companies were not as hard-hit as European and the few Asian ones had been. This preference for open skies operating regimes continues, within limitations, to this day.World War II, like World War I, brought new life to the airline industry. Many airlines in the Allied countries were flush from lease contracts to the military, and foresaw a future explosive demand for civil air transport, for both passengers and cargo. They were eager to invest in the newly emerging flagships of air travel such as the Stratocruiser, Constellation, and DC-6. Most of these new aircraft were based on American bombers such as the B-29, which had spearheaded research into new technologies such as pressurization. Most offered increased efficiency from both added speed and greater payload.In the 1950s, the Havilland Comet, 707, DC-8, and Aviation Caravelle became the first flagships of the Jet Age in the West, while the Eastern bloc had Tu-104 and Tu-124 in the fleets of state-owned carriers such as Czechoslovak SA, Soviet Aeroflot and East-German Interflug. The Viscount and L-188 Electra inaugurated turboprop transport.The next big boost for the airlines would come in the 1970s, when the 747, Douglas DC-10, and L-1011 inaugurated widebody (jumbo jet) service, which is still the standard in international travel. The Tu-144 and its Western counterpart, Concorde, made supersonic travel a reality. Concorde first flew in 1969 and operated through 2003. In 1972, Airbus began producing Europes most commercially successful line of airliners to date. The added efficiencies for these aircraft were often not in speed, but in passenger capacity, payload, and range. Airbus also features modern electronic cockpits that were common across their aircraft to enable pilots to fly multiple models with minimal cross-training.Travel Concepts, Inc., founded by J. Tobin in 1971, developed the first travel kits to be distributed in Class and Class cabins, and also provided in-flight educational games for children. The travel kits and the educational game programs have been utilized by most major airlines for 25 years.()()()File:Pan Am Boeing 747 at Zurich Airport in May 1985.jpg|thumb|left|Am 747 Clipper Neptunes Car in 1985. The deregulation of the American airline industry increased the financial troubles of the iconic airline which ultimately filed for bankruptcy in December 1991.()1978s U.S. airline industry deregulation lowered barriers for new airlines just as a downturn occurred. New start-ups entered during the downturn, during which time they found aircraft and funding, contracted hangar and maintenance services, trained new employees, and recruited laid off staff from other airlines.As the business cycle returned to normalcy, major airlines dominated their routes through aggressive pricing and additional capacity offerings, often swamping new startups. Only West Airlines (which has since merged with US Airways) remained a significant survivor from this new entrant era, as dozens, even hundreds, have gone under.In many ways, the biggest winner in the deregulated environment was the air passenger. Indeed, the U.S. witnessed an explosive growth in demand for air travel, as many millions who had never or rarely flown before became regular fliers, even joining flyer loyalty programs and receiving free flights and other benefits from their flying. New services and higher frequencies meant that business fliers could fly to another city, do business, and return the same day, for almost any point in the country. Air travels advantages put intercity bus lines under pressure, and most have withered away.By the 1980s, almost half of the total flying in the world took place in the U.S., and today the domestic industry operates over 10,000 daily departures nationwide.Toward the end of the century, a new style of low cost airline emerged, offering a no-frills product at a lower price. Airlines, JetBlue, Airways, Airlines and other low-cost carriers began to represent a serious challenge to the so-called legacy airlines, as did their low-cost counterparts in many other countries. Their commercial viability represented a serious competitive threat to the legacy carriers. However, of these, ATA and Skybus have since ceased operations.Increasingly since 1978, US airlines have been reincorporated and spun off by newly created and interally led manangement companies, and thus becoming nothing more than operating units and subsidiaries with limited financially decisive control. Among some of these holding companies and parent companies that are the relatively well known, are the Corporation, along with the Corporation, among a long of airline holding companies sometime recognized world wide.  Less recognized are the equity firms which often seize managerial, financial, and of directors control of distressed airline companies by temporarily investing large sums of capital in air carriers, so as to rescheme an airlines assets into a profitable organization or liquidating an air carrier of their profitable and worthwhile routes and business operations.Thus the last 50 years of the airline industry have varied from reasonably profitable, to devastatingly depressed. As the first major market to deregulate the industry in 1978, U.S. airlines have experienced more turbulence than almost any other country or region. Today, American Airlines is the only U.S. carrier to survive bankruptcy-free.The Airline Industry BailoutCongress passed the Air Transportation Safety and System Stabilization Act (P.L. 107-42) in response to a severe liquidity crisis facing the already-troubled airline industry in the aftermath of the September 11th terrorist attacks. Congress sought to provide cash infusions to carriers for both the cost of the four-day federal shutdown of the airlines and the incremental losses incurred through December 31, 2001 as a result of the terrorist attacks. This resulted in the first government bailout of the 21st century.(http://ostpxweb.ost.dot.gov/aviation/Data/stabilizationact.pdf) Between 2000 and 2005 US airlines lost $30 billion with wage cuts of over $15 billion and 100,000 employees laid off.()In recognition of the essential national economic role of a healthy aviation system, Congress authorized partial compensation of up to $5 billion in cash subject to review by the of Transportation and up to $10 billion in loan guarantees subject to review by a newly created Transportation Stabilization Board (ATSB). The applications to DOT for reimbursements were subjected to rigorous multi-year reviews not only by DOT program personnel but also by the Accountability Office (http://www.gao.gov/new.items/d04725r.pdf) and the DOT Inspector General.()()Ultimately, the federal government provided $4.6 billion in one-time, subject-to-income-tax cash payments to 427 U.S. air carriers, with no provision for repayment, essentially a gift from the taxpayers. (Passenger carriers operating scheduled service received approximately $4 billion, subject to tax.) () In addition, the ATSB approved loan guarantees to six airlines totaling approximately $1.6 billion. Data from the Treasury Department show that the government recouped the $1.6 billion and a profit of $339 million from the fees, interest and purchase of discounted airline stock associated with loan guarantees.()European airline industryFile:National Audit Office - Victoria - London - 020504.jpg|thumb|The Imperial Airways Empire Terminal, Victoria, London. Trains ran from here to boats in Southampton, and to Airport.The first countries in Europe to embrace air transport were Austria, Belgium, Finland, France, Germany, the Netherlands and the Kingdom.Austria initiated the first regularly scheduled airmail service on March 31, 1918 in the midst of World War I. The route provided airmail service spanning Vienna to Krakw (now in Poland) to Lviv (now in Ukraine), as was often also extended to Kiev and Odessa.(Landmarks of airmail history: whos on first?)(http://books.google.co.uk/books?idfPLm9omt_YIC&pgPA37&lpgPA37&dqlemberg+vienna+post+1918&sourcebl&ots0NBTBZharm&sigpuyZDmv7oZOViiUstnvY6CwB-4s&hlen&eizW75TKeJEtWAhAfwkOWGCQ&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum2&ved0CCEQ6AEwATgK#vonepage&qlemberg%20vienna%20post%201918&ffalse )KLM, the oldest carrier still operating under its original name, was founded in 1919. The first flight (operated on behalf of KLM by Transport and Travel) transported two English passengers to Schiphol, Amsterdam from London in 1920. Like other major European airlines of the time (see France and the UK below), KLMs early growth depended heavily on the needs to service links with far-flung colonial possessions (Indies). It is only after the loss of the Empire that KLM found itself based at a small country with few potential passengers, depending heavily on transfer traffic, and was one of the first to introduce the hub-system to facilitate easy connections.France began an air mail service to Morocco in 1919 that was bought out in 1927, renamed Aropostale, and injected with capital to become a major international carrier. In 1933, Aropostale went bankrupt, was nationalized and merged with several other airlines into what became France.In Finland, the charter establishing Aero O/Y (now Finnair) was signed in the city of Helsinki on September 12, 1923. F.13 D-335 became the first aircraft of the company, when Aero took delivery of it on March 14, 1924. The first flight was between Helsinki and Tallinn, capital of Estonia, and it took place on March 20, 1924, one week later.Germanys Luft Hansa was created in 1926 by merger of two airlines, one of them Luftverkehr. Luft Hansa, due to the Junkers heritage and unlike most other airlines at the time, became a major investor in airlines outside of Europe, providing capital to Varig and Avianca. German airliners built by Junkers, Dornier, and Fokker were among the most advanced in the world at the time.  In 1931, the airship Graf Zeppelin began offering regular scheduled passenger service between Germany and South America, usually every two weeks, which continued until 1937.()  In 1936, the airship Hindenburg entered passenger service and successfully crossed the Atlantic 36 times before crashing at Lakehurst, New Jersey on May 6, 1937.()The British company Aircraft Transport and Travel commenced a London to Paris service on August 25, 1919, this was the worlds first regular international flight. The United Kingdoms carrier during this period was Airways, which became BOAC (British Overseas Airways Co.) in 1939. Imperial Airways used huge Handley-Page biplanes for routes between London, the East, and India: images of Imperial aircraft in the middle of the Khali, being maintained by Bedouins, are among the most famous pictures from the heyday of the Empire.In Union the Chief Administration of the Civil Air Fleet was established in 1921. One of its first acts was to help found Deutsch-Russische Luftverkehrs A.G. (Deruluft), a German-Russian joint venture to provide air transport from Russia to the West. Domestic air service began around the same time, when Dobrolyot started operations on 15 July 1923 between Moscow and Nizhni Novgorod. Since 1932 all operations had been carried under the name Aeroflot. By the end of the 1930s Aeroflot had become the worlds largest airline, employing more than 4,000 pilots and 60,000 other service personnel and operating around 3,000 aircraft (of which 75% were considered obsolete by its own standards). During the Soviet era Aeroflot was synonymous with Russian civil aviation, as it was the only air carrier. It became the first airline in the world to operate sustained regular jet services on 15 September 1956 with the Tu-104.DeregulationDeregulation of the Union airspace in the early 1990s has had substantial effect on structure of the industry there. The shift towards budget airlines on shorter routes has been significant. Airlines such as EasyJet and Ryanair have grown at the expense of the traditional national airlines.There has also been a trend for these national airlines themselves to be privatised such as has occurred for Lingus and Airways. Other national airlines, including Italys Alitalia, have suffered - particularly with the rapid increase of oil prices in early 2008.Asian airline industryAlthough Airlines (PAL) was officially founded on February 26, 1941, its license to operate as an airliner was derived from merged Philippine Aerial Taxi Company (PATCO) established by mining magnate Emmanuel N. Bachrach on December 3, 1930, making it Asias oldest scheduled carrier still in operation.() Commercial air service commenced three weeks later from Manila to Baguio, making it Asias first airline route. Bachrachs death in 1937 paved the way for its eventual merger with Philippine Airlines in March 1941 and made it Asias oldest airline. It is also the oldest airline in Asia still operating under its current name.(Jane,  Janes airlines & airliners By Jeremy Flack, First Edition, 2003, ISBN 978-0-00-715174-5) Bachrachs majority share in PATCO was bought by beer magnate Andres R. Soriano in 1939 upon the advice of General McArthur and later merged with newly formed Philippine Airlines with PAL as the surviving entity. Soriano has controlling interest in both airlines before the merger. PAL restarted service on March 15, 1941 with a single Model 18 NPC-54 aircraft, which started its daily services between Manila (from Field) and Baguio, later to expand with larger aircraft such as the DC-3 and Vickers Viscount.India was also one of the first countries to embrace civil aviation.() One of the first West Asian airline companies was India, which had its beginning as Airlines in 1932, a division of Tata Sons Ltd. (now Group). The airline was founded by Indias leading industrialist, Tata. On October 15, 1932, J. R. D. Tata himself flew a single engined Havilland Puss Moth carrying air mail (postal mail of Airways) from Karachi to Bombay via Ahmedabad. The aircraft continued to Madras via Bellary piloted by Air Force pilot Vintcent . Tata Airlines was also one of the worlds first major airlines which began its operations without any support from the Government.()With the outbreak of War II, the airline presence in Asia came to a relative halt, with many new flag carriers donating their aircraft for military aid and other uses. Following the end of the war in 1945, regular commercial service was restored in India and Tata Airlines became a public limited company on July 29, 1946 under the name Air India. After the of India, 49% of the airline was acquired by the of India. In return, the airline was granted status to operate international services from India as the designated flag carrier under the name India International.On July 31, 1946, a chartered Philippine Airlines (PAL) DC-4 ferried 40 American servicemen to Oakland, California from Nielson Airport in City with stops in Guam, Island, Atoll and Honolulu, Hawaii, making PAL the first Asian airline to cross the Ocean. A regular service between Manila and Francisco was started in December. It was during this year that the airline was designated as the flag carrier of Philippines.During the era of decolonization, newly-born Asian countries started to embrace air transport. Among the first Asian carriers during the era were Pacific of Kong (founded in September 1946), Airways (later International Airlines; founded in October 1946), Malayan Airlines (later Singapore and Airlines; founded in 1947), Al in Israel in 1948, Indonesia in 1949, Airlines in 1951,Airways International in 1960, and Air in 1962.Latin American airline industryFile:Tam.a330-200.pt-mvl.arp.jpg|thumb|Airlines is the largest airline in Latin America in terms of number of annual passengers flown.()Among the first countries to have regular airlines in Latin America were Bolivia with Areo Boliviano, Cuba with de Aviacin, Colombia with Avianca, Brazil with Varig, Chile with Chile (today Airlines), Republic with de Aviacin, Mexico with de Aviacin, and TACA as a brand of several airlines of Central American countries (Honduras, El Salvador, Costa Rica, Guatemala and Nicaragua). All the previous airlines started regular operations before World War II.The air travel market has evolved rapidly over recent years in America. Some industry estimations over 2000 new aircraft will begin service over the next five years in this region.These airlines serve domestic flights within their countries, as well as connections within Latin America and also overseas flights to North America, Europe, Australia, and Asia.Just three airlines: LAN (Latin American Networks), Oceanair and TAM Airlines have international subsidiaries with Chile as the central operation along with Peru, Ecuador, Argentina and some operations in the Republic and TAM with TAM Mercosur have a base in Asuncion, Paraguay. Avianca have the control of Oceanair, VIP Airlines and also have an estrategic alliance with TACA.Regulatory considerationsNationalFile:Garuda Indonesia Air Lines at Narita 200507.jpg|thumb|left|Indonesia 747-400 parked at International Airport. This Indonesian carrier is wholly owned by the Indonesian GovernmentMany countries have airlines that the government owns and operates. Fully private airlines are subject to a great deal of government regulation for economic, political, and safety concerns. For instance, governments often intervene to halt airline labor actions in order to protect the free flow of people, communications, and goods between different regions without compromising safety.The United States, Australia, and to a lesser extent Brazil, Mexico, India, the United Kingdom and Japan have deregulated their airlines. In the past, these governments dictated airfares, route networks, and other operational requirements for each airline. Since deregulation, airlines have been largely free to negotiate their own operating arrangements with different airports, enter and exit routes easily, and to levy airfares and supply flights according to market demand.File:Cyprus airways a330.jpg|thumb|Airways national airline of CyprusThe entry barriers for new airlines are lower in a deregulated market, and so the U.S. has seen hundreds of airlines start up (sometimes for only a brief operating period). This has produced far greater competition than before deregulation in most markets, and average fares tend to drop 20% or more. The added competition, together with pricing freedom, means that new entrants often take market share with highly reduced rates that, to a limited degree, full service airlines must match. This is a major constraint on profitability for established carriers, which tend to have a higher cost base.As a result, profitability in a deregulated market is uneven for most airlines. These forces have caused some major airlines to go out of business, in addition to most of the poorly established new entrants.InternationalFile:SIA Airbus A380, 9V-SKA, SIN 8.jpg|thumb|Airlines A380 lands at Changi Airport. Singapore Airlines was the first international airline to operate the A380, the worlds largest passenger airliner.(Singapore Airlines - News Releases)Groups such as the Civil Aviation Organization establish worldwide standards for safety and other vital concerns. Most international air traffic is regulated by bilateral agreements between countries, which designate specific carriers to operate on specific routes. The model of such an agreement was the Agreement between the US and UK following World War II, which designated airports to be used for transatlantic flights and gave each government the authority to nominate carriers to operate routes.Bilateral agreements are based on the of the air, a group of generalized traffic rights ranging from the freedom to overfly a country to the freedom to provide domestic flights within a country (a very rarely granted right known as cabotage). Most agreements permit airlines to fly from their home country to designated airports in the other country: some also extend the freedom to provide continuing service to a third country, or to another destination in the other country while carrying passengers from overseas.In the 1990s, skies agreements became more common. These agreements take many of these regulatory powers from state governments and open up international routes to further competition. Open skies agreements have met some criticism, particularly within the European Union, whose airlines would be at a comparative disadvantage with the United States because of cabotage restrictions.Economic considerationsFile:Tran12G7.jpg|thumb|Trippe, the founder of American World Airways, surveying his globe. The collapse of Pan Am, an airline often credited for shaping the international airline industry, in December 1991 highlighted the financial complexities faced by major airline companies.Historically, air travel has survived largely through state support, whether in the form of equity or subsidies. The airline industry as a whole has made a cumulative loss during its 100-year history, once the costs include subsidies for aircraft development and airport construction.(Wings of Desire, Guardian, Thursday February 23, 2006)(Airlines and the canine features of unprofitable industries, Financial Times, September 27, 2005)One argument is that externalities, such as higher growth due to global mobility, outweigh the microeconomic losses and justify continuing government intervention. A historically high level of government intervention in the airline industry can be seen as part of a wider political consensus on strategic forms of transport, such as highways and railways, both of which receive public funding in most parts of the world. Profitability is likely to improve in the future as privatization continues and more competitive low-cost carriers proliferate.Although many countries continue to operate state-owned or parastatal airlines, many large airlines today are privately owned and are therefore governed by microeconomic principles in order to maximize shareholder profit. Top Airline Groups by Revenue for 2010, source : Airline Business August 2011, Flightglobal Data ResearchTicket revenueAirlines assign prices to their services in an attempt to maximize profitability. The pricing of airline tickets has become increasingly complicated over the years and is now largely determined by computerized management systems.Because of the complications in scheduling flights and maintaining profitability, airlines have many loopholes that can be used by the knowledgeable traveler. Many of these airfare secrets are becoming more and more known to the general public, so airlines are forced to make constant adjustments.Most airlines use differentiated pricing, a form of discrimination, in order to sell air services at varying prices simultaneously to different segments. Factors influencing the price include the days remaining until departure, the booked load factor, the forecast of total demand by price point, competitive pricing in force, and variations by day of week of departure and by time of day. Carriers often accomplish this by dividing each cabin of the aircraft (first, business and economy) into a number of classes for pricing purposes.A complicating factor is that of origin-destination control (O&D control). Someone purchasing a ticket from Melbourne to Sydney (as an example) for AU$200 is competing with someone else who wants to fly Melbourne to Los Angeles through Sydney on the same flight, and who is willing to pay AU$1400. Should the airline prefer the $1400 passenger, or the $200 passenger plus a possible Sydney-Los Angeles passenger willing to pay $1300? Airlines have to make hundreds of thousands of similar pricing decisions daily.File:Flughafen Frankfurt am Main.JPG|thumb|Lufthansa Boeing 747-400.The advent of advanced computerized reservations systems in the late 1970s, most notably Sabre, allowed airlines to easily perform cost-benefit analyses on different pricing structures, leading to almost perfect price discrimination in some cases (that is, filling each seat on an aircraft at the highest price that can be charged without driving the consumer elsewhere).The intense nature of airfare pricing has led to the term war to describe efforts by airlines to undercut other airlines on competitive routes. Through computers, new airfares can be published quickly and efficiently to the airlines sales channels. For this purpose the airlines use the Tariff Publishing Company (ATPCO), who distribute latest fares for more than 500 airlines to Reservation Systems across the world.The extent of these pricing phenomena is strongest in legacy carriers. In contrast, low fare carriers usually offer preannounced and simplified price structure, and sometimes quote prices for each leg of a trip separately.Computers also allow airlines to predict, with some accuracy, how many passengers will actually fly after making a reservation to fly. This allows airlines to overbook their flights enough to fill the aircraft while accounting for no-shows, but not enough (in most cases) to force paying passengers off the aircraft for lack of seats. Since an average of  of all seats are flown empty, stimulative pricing for low demand flights coupled with overbooking on high demand flights can help reduce this figure. This is especially crucial during tough economic times as airlines undertake massive cuts to ticket prices in order to retain demand.()Operating costsFile:virgin atlantic a340-600 g-vyou arp.jpg|thumb|An A340-600 of Atlantic Airways. In October 2008, Virgin Atlantic offered to combine its operations with BMI in an effort to reduce operating costs.()Full-service airlines have a high level of fixed and operating costs in order to establish and maintain air services: labor, fuel, airplanes, engines, spares and parts, IT services and networks, airport equipment, airport handling services, sales distribution, catering, training, insurance and other costs. Thus all but a small percentage of the income from ticket sales is paid out to a wide variety of external providers or internal cost centers.Moreover, the industry is structured so that airlines often act as tax collectors. Airline fuel is untaxed because of a series of treaties existing between countries. Ticket prices include a number of fees, taxes and surcharges beyond the control of airlines. Airlines are also responsible for enforcing government regulations. If airlines carry passengers without proper documentation on an international flight, they are responsible for returning them back to the original country.Analysis of the 19921996 period shows that every player in the air transport chain is far more profitable than the airlines, who collect and pass through fees and revenues to them from ticket sales. While airlines as a whole earned 6% return on capital employed (2-3.5% less than the cost of capital), airports earned 10%, catering companies 10-13%, handling companies 11-14%, aircraft lessors 15%, aircraft manufacturers 16%, and global distribution companies more than 30%. (Source: Spinetta, 2000, quoted in Doganis, 2002)The widespread entrance of a new breed of low cost airlines beginning at the turn of the century has accelerated the demand that full service carriers control costs. Many of these low cost companies emulate Southwest Airlines in various respects, and like Southwest, they are able to eke out a consistent profit throughout all phases of the business cycle.As a result, a shakeout of airlines is occurring in the U.S. and elsewhere. Airlines, Airlines (twice), Airways (twice), Delta Air Lines, and Airlines have all declared 11 bankruptcy. Some argue that it would be far better for the industry as a whole if a wave of actual closures were to reduce the number of undead airlines competing with healthy airlines while being artificially protected from creditors via bankruptcy law. On the other hand, some have pointed out that the reduction in capacity would be short lived given that there would be large quantities of relatively new aircraft that bankruptcies would want to get rid of and would re-enter the market either as increased fleets for the survivors or the basis of cheap planes for new startups.Where an airline has established an engineering base at an airport then there may be considerable economic advantages in using that same airport as a preferred focus (or hub) for its scheduled flights.Assets and financingFile:Maslounge.jpg|thumb|The Golden Lounge of Airlines at Lumpur International Airport (KLIA). The airline has ownership of special slots at KLIA giving it a competitive edge over other airlines operating at the airport.Airline financing is quite complex, since airlines are highly leveraged operations. Not only must they purchase (or lease) new airliner bodies and engines regularly, they must make major long-term fleet decisions with the goal of meeting the demands of their markets while producing a fleet that is relatively economical to operate and maintain. Compare Southwest Airlines and their reliance on a single airplane type (the 737 and derivatives), with the now defunct Air Lines which operated 17 different aircraft types, each with varying pilot, engine, maintenance, and support needs.A second financial issue is that of hedging oil and fuel purchases, which are usually second only to labor in its relative cost to the company. However, with the current high fuel prices it has become the largest cost to an airline. Legacy airlines, compared with new entrants, have been hit harder by rising fuel prices partly due to the running of older, less fuel efficient aircraft.( While hedging instruments can be expensive, they can easily pay for themselves many times over in periods of increasing fuel costs, such as in the 20002005 period.In view of the congestion apparent at many international airports, the ownership of slots at certain airports (the right to take-off or land an aircraft at a particular time of day or night) has become a significant tradable asset for many airlines. Clearly take-off slots at popular times of the day can be critical in attracting the more profitable business traveler to a given airlines flight and in establishing a competitive advantage against a competing airline.If a particular city has two or more airports, market forces will tend to attract the less profitable routes, or those on which competition is weakest, to the less congested airport, where slots are likely to be more available and therefore cheaper. For example, National Airport attracts profitable routes due partly to its congestion, leaving less-profitable routes to International Airport and International Airport.Other factors, such as surface transport facilities and onward connections, will also affect the relative appeal of different airports and some long distance flights may need to operate from the one with the longest runway. For example, Airport is the preferred airport for most of Manhattan due to its proximity, while long-distance routes must use F. Kennedy International Airports longer runways. Liberty International Airport has the worst surface transport options to most of Manhattan, so most of its use is due to the connections offered by its dominant tenant carrier.Airline partnershipsFile:JA8941-oneworld-01.jpg|thumb|A Airlines Boeing 777-300 with special Oneworld livery. Oneworld is the third largest airline alliance after Alliance and SkyTeam.Codesharing is the most common type of airline partnership; it involves one airline selling tickets for another airlines flights under its own airline code. An early example of this was Japan Airlines (JAL) codesharing partnership with Aeroflot in the 1960s on TokyoMoscow flights; Aeroflot operated the flights using Aeroflot aircraft, but JAL sold tickets for the flights as if they were JAL flights. This practice allows airlines to expand their operations, at least on paper, into parts of the world where they cannot afford to establish bases or purchase aircraft. Another example was the Austrian Sabena partnership on the ViennaBrusselsNew York/JFK route during the late 60s, using a Sabena 707 with Austrian livery.Since airline reservation requests are often made by city-pair (such as show me flights from Chicago to Dsseldorf), an airline who is able to codeshare with another airline for a variety of routes might be able to be listed as indeed offering a ChicagoDsseldorf flight. The passenger is advised however, that airline no. 1 operates the flight from say Chicago to Amsterdam, and airline no. 2 operates the continuing flight (on a different airplane, sometimes from another terminal) to Dsseldorf. Thus the primary rationale for code sharing is to expand ones service offerings in city-pair terms so as to increase sales.A more recent development is the alliance, which became prevalent in late 1990s. These alliances can act as virtual mergers to get around government restrictions. Groups of airlines such as the Alliance, Oneworld and SkyTeam coordinate their passenger service programs (such as lounges and programs), offer special interline tickets, and often engage in extensive codesharing (sometimes systemwide). These are increasingly integrated business combinationssometimes including cross-equity arrangementsin which products, service standards, schedules, and airport facilities are standardized and combined for higher efficiency. One of the first airlines to start an alliance with another airline was KLM, who partnered with Airlines. Both airlines later entered the SkyTeam alliance after the fusion of KLM and Air France in 2004.Often the companies combine IT operations, or purchase fuel and aircraft as a bloc in order to achieve higher bargaining power. However, the alliances have been most successful at purchasing invisible supplies and services, such as fuel. Airlines usually prefer to purchase items visible to their passengers to differentiate themselves from local competitors. If an airlines main domestic competitor flies Boeing airliners, then the airline may prefer to use Airbus aircraft regardless of what the rest of the alliance chooses.Fuel hedgingSouthwest is credited with maintaining strong business profits between 1999 and the early 2000s due to its fuel hedging policy.  Looking at the annual reports many other airlines are replicating Southwests hedging policy to control their fuel costs.Environmental impactsFile:Contrails southeast lrg.gif|thumb|MODIS tracking of contrails generated by air traffic over the southeastern United States on January 29, 2004.Aircraft engines emit pollution, gases and particulate emissions, and contribute to warming()() and dimming.()Modern turbofan and turboprop engines are considerably more fuel-efficient and less polluting than earlier models. However, despite this, the rapid growth of travel in recent years contributes to an increase in total pollution attributable to aviation, offsetting some of the reductions achieved by automobiles. In the EU gas emissions from aviation increased by 87% between 1990 and 2006.()CO2 emissions from the jet fuel burned per passenger on an average  airline flight is about 353 kilograms (776 pounds).() Loss of natural habitat potential associated with the jet fuel burned per passenger on a  airline flight is estimated to be 250 square meters (2700 square feet).()In the context of purported climate change and oil, there is a debate about possible taxation of air travel and the inclusion of aviation in an trading scheme, with a view to ensuring that the total costs of aviation are taken into account.(Including Aviation into the EU ETS: Impact on EU allowance prices ICF Consulting for DEFRA February 2006)The airline industry is responsible for about 11 percent of gases emitted by the U.S. transportation sector. Boeing estimates that biofuels could reduce flight-related greenhouse-gas emissions by 60 to 80 percent. The solution would be blending algae fuels with existing jet fuel:()* Boeing and New Zealand are collaborating with leading Brazilian biofuels maker Tecbio and Bionomic of New Zealand and other jet biofuel developers around the world.* Atlantic and Green Fund are looking into the technology as part of a biofuels initiative.()* KLM has made the first commercial flight with bio-fuel in 2009.Call signsEach operator of a scheduled or charter flight uses an airline call sign when communicating with airports or air traffic control centres. Most of these call-signs are derived from the airlines trade name, but for reasons of history, marketing, or the need to reduce ambiguity in spoken English (so that pilots do not mistakenly make navigational decisions based on instructions issued to a different aircraft), some airlines and air forces use call-signs less obviously connected with their trading name. For example, British Airways uses a Speedbird call-sign, named after the logo of its predecessor, BOAC, while SkyEurope used Relax.Airline personnelFile:Elal.b777-200.4x-ecd.arp.jpg|thumb|An Al 777 landing at London Airport. (2005)The various types of airline personnel include:Flight operations personnel including flight safety personnel.* crew, responsible for the operation of the aircraft. Flight crew members include:** Pilots (Captain and First Officer: some older aircraft also required a Engineer and or a Navigator)** attendants, (led by a purser on larger aircraft)** in-flight security personnel on some airlines (most notably Al)* Groundcrew, responsible for operations at airports. Ground crew members include:** Aerospace and avionics engineers responsible for certifying the aircraft for flight and management of aircraft maintenance*** Aerospace engineers, responsible for airframe, powerplant and electrical systems maintenance*** Avionics engineers responsible for avionics and instruments maintenance** Airframe and powerplant technicians** Electric System technicians, responsible for maintenance of electrical systems** Avionics technicians, responsible for maintenance of avionics** dispatchers** handlers** Ramp Agents** agents** Ticket agents** Passenger service agents (such as lounge employees)** Reservation agents, usually (but not always) at facilities outside the airport.Airlines follow a corporate structure where each broad area of operations (such as maintenance, flight operations(including flight safety),and passenger service) is supervised by a vice president. Larger airlines often appoint vice presidents to oversee each of theairlines hubs as well. Airlines employ lawyers to deal with regulatory procedures and other administrative tasks.Industry trendsThe pattern of ownership has been privatized in the recent years, that is, the ownership has gradually changed from governments to private and individual sectors or organizations. This occurs as regulators permit greater freedom and non-government ownership, in steps that are usually decades apart. This pattern is not seen for all airlines in all regions. The overall trend of demand has been consistently increasing. In the 1950s and 1960s, annual growth rates of 15% or more were common. Annual growth of 5-6% persisted through the 1980s and 1990s. Growth rates are not consistent in all regions, but countries with a de-regulated airline industry have more competition and greater pricing freedom. This results in lower fares and sometimes dramatic spurts in traffic growth. The U.S., Australia, Canada, Japan, Brazil, Mexico, India and other markets exhibit this trend.  The industry has been observed to be cyclical in its financial performance. Four or five years of poor earnings precede five or six years of improvement. But profitability even in the good years is generally low, in the range of 2-3% net profit after interest and tax. In times of profit, airlines lease new generations of airplanes and upgrade services in response to higher demand. Since 1980, the industry has not earned back the cost of capital during the best of times. Conversely, in bad times losses can be dramatically worse.  Buffett once said that despite all the money that has been invested in all airlines, the net profit is less than zero. He believes it is one of the hardest businesses to manage.()As in many mature industries, consolidation is a trend. Airline groupings may consist of limited bilateral partnerships, long-term, multi-faceted alliances between carriers, equity arrangements, mergers, or takeovers. Since governments often restrict ownership and merger between companies in different countries, most consolidation takes place within a country. In the U.S., over 200 airlines have merged, been taken over, or gone out of business since deregulation in 1978. Many international airline managers are lobbying their governments to permit greater consolidation to achieve higher economy and efficiency.See also* ferry* safety* complaints* timetable* Airliners.net* of North America (book)* security* rights* airline* airline* impact of aviation* Aviation Administration* planning* FlightAware* contract flight* Hyper-mobile travel* IATA  industry standards organization* carrier* flight* airline* Security AdministrationAirline related lists* codes* liveries and logos* of airlines* of accidents and incidents on commercial airliners* of airline holding companies* of airline mergers and acquisitions* of defunct airlines* of hub airports* of largest airlines* of low-cost airlines* List of national airlines* of regional airlines* of airline bankruptcies* Service Request (SSR) CodesNotesReferences# A history of the worlds airlines, R.E.G. Davies, Oxford U.P, 1964# The airline encyclopedia, 19092000. Myron J. Smith, Scarecrow Press, 2002# Flying Off Course: The Economics of International Airlines, 3rd edition. Rigas Doganis, Routledge, New York, 2002.# The Airline Business in the 21st Century. Rigas Doganis, Routledge, New York, 2001.External links* Chasing the Sun - History of commercial aviation, from PBS* Global Aviation Markets Whitepaper on global markets for airlines* Full list of Airlines of the worldaf:Lugrederybg:ca:Aerolniaspolenostda:Flyselskaberde:Fluggesellschaftes:Aerolneaeo:Flugkompanioariennegl:AeroliaKng-sko:penerbanganis:Flugflagaerealinij bendrovhu:Lgitrsasgpenerbangannl:Luchtvaartmaatschappijja:no:Flyselskapnn:Flyselskaplotniczeareaksh:Vluchjesellschaffru:simple:Airlinesr:-penerbanganfi:Lentoyhtisv:Flygfretagth:tr:Havayoluuk:ur:hng khngyi:zh:
1990
August_5
 Events* 642 &ndash; of Maserfield &ndash; of Mercia defeats and kills of Northumbria.* 910 &ndash; The last major Danish army to raid England is defeated at the of Tettenhall by the allied forces of Mercia and Wessex, led by King the Elder and Aethelred of Mercia.*1071 &ndash; wars: Italo-Normans begin a nearly-three-year siege of Bari.*1100 &ndash; Henry I is crowned King of England in Abbey.*1305 &ndash; Wallace, who led the Scottish resistance against England, is captured by the English near Glasgow and transported to London where he is put on trial and executed.*1388 &ndash; The of Otterburn, a border skirmish between the Scottish and the English in Northern England, is fought near Otterburn.*1583 &ndash; Sir Gilbert establishes the first English colony in America, at what is now Johns, Newfoundland.*1600 &ndash; The Gowrie Conspiracy against King James VI of Scotland (later to become King I of England) takes place.*1620 &ndash; The Mayflower departs from England on its first attempt to reach America.*1689 &ndash; 1,500 Iroquois attack the village of Lachine in France.*1716 &ndash; The of Petrovaradin takes place.*1735 &ndash; of the press: New York Weekly Journal writer Peter Zenger is acquitted of libel against the royal governor of New York, on the basis that what he had published was true.*1763 &ndash; War: of Bushy Run &ndash; British forces led by Bouquet defeat Pontiacs Indians at Run.*1772 &ndash; The Partition of Poland begins.*1781 &ndash; The Battle of Dogger Bank takes place.*1824 &ndash; War of Independence: Kanaris leads a Greek fleet to victory against Ottoman and Egyptian ships in the Battle of Samos.*1858 &ndash; West Field and others complete the first telegraph cable after several unsuccessful attempts. It will operate for less than a month.*1860 &ndash; XV of Sweden of Sweden-Norway is crowned king of Norway in Trondheim.*1861 &ndash; Civil War: in order to help pay for the war effort, the States government levies the first tax as part of the Act of 1861 (3% of all incomes over US $800; rescinded in 1872).*  1861   &ndash; The States Army abolishes flogging.*1862 &ndash; American Civil War: Battle of Baton Rouge &ndash; along the River near Rouge, Louisiana, Confederate troops drive Union forces back into the city.*1864 &ndash; American Civil War: the of Mobile Bay begins &ndash; at Bay near Alabama, Admiral Farragut leads a Union flotilla through Confederate defenses and seals one of the last major Southern ports.*1870 &ndash; War: the of Spicheren is fought, resulting in a Prussian victory.*1874 &ndash; Japan launches its savings system, modeled after a similar system in the Kingdom.*1882 &ndash; The Oil of New Jersey is established.*1884 &ndash; The cornerstone for the of Liberty is laid on Bedloes Island (now Liberty Island) in York Harbor.*1888 &ndash; Benz drives from Mannheim to Pforzheim and back in the first long distance automobile trip, commemorated as the Benz Memorial Route since 2008.*1901 &ndash; OConnor sets the first IAAF recognised jump world record of  The record will stand for 20 years.*1906 &ndash; Constitutional Revolution: ad-Din Shah Qajar, King of Iran, agrees to convert the government to a monarchy.*1914 &ndash; War I: the German minelayer Knigin Luise lays a minefield about  of the Estuary (Lowestoft). She is intercepted and sunk by the British light-cruiser HMS Amphion.*  1914   &ndash; In Ohio, the first electric light is installed.*1916 &ndash; World War I: of Romani &ndash; Allied forces, under the command of Murray, defeat an attacking Ottoman army under the command of Freiherr Kress von Kressenstein, securing the Canal and beginning the Ottoman retreat from the Peninsula.*1925 &ndash; Cymru is formed with the aim of disseminating knowledge of the language that is at the time in danger of dying out.*1940 &ndash; War II: the Union formally annexes Latvia.*1944 &ndash; World War II: possibly the biggest prison breakout in history occurs as 545 Japanese POWs attempt to escape outside the town of Cowra, South Wales, Australia.*  1944   &ndash; World War II: Polish insurgents liberate a German camp in Warsaw, freeing 348 Jewish prisoners.*  1944   &ndash; World War II: The Nazis begin a three-day massacre of anywhere between 40,000 and 100,000 civilians and prisoners of war in Wola, Poland.*1949 &ndash; In Ecuador, an earthquake destroys 50 towns and kills more than 6,000.*  1949   &ndash; The Gulch fire kills 13 firefighters in Montana.*1957 &ndash; Bandstand, a show dedicated to the teenage baby-boomers by playing the songs and showing popular dances of the time, debuts on the ABC television network.*1960 &ndash; Faso, then known as Upper Volta, becomes independent from France.*1962 &ndash; Mandela is jailed. He would not be released until 1990.*1963 &ndash; The States, the Kingdom, and the Union sign a nuclear test ban treaty.*1964 &ndash; War: Pierce Arrow &ndash; American aircraft from carriers  and  bomb Vietnam in retaliation for strikes against U.S. destroyers in the of Tonkin.*1965 &ndash; The War of 1965 begins as Pakistani soldiers cross the of Control dressed as locals.*1969 &ndash; program: 7 makes its closest fly-by of Mars (3,524 kilometers).*1971 &ndash; The first Islands Forum (then known as the South Pacific Forum) is held in Wellington, Zealand, with the aim of enhancing cooperation between the independent countries of the Pacific Ocean.*1974 &ndash; War: the U.S. Congress places a $1 billion dollar limit on military aid to Vietnam.*1979 &ndash; In Afghanistan, Maoists undertake an attempted military uprising.*1981 &ndash; Reagan fires 11,359 striking air-traffic controllers who ignored his order for them to return to work.*1989 &ndash; General elections are held in Nicaragua with the Front winning a majority.*1995 &ndash; The city of Knin, a significant Serb stronghold, is captured by Croatian forces during Storm. The date is celebrated in Croatia as Victory Day.*2003 &ndash; A car bomb explodes in the Indonesian capital of Jakarta outside the Hotel killing 12 and injuring 150.*2010 &ndash; Copiap mining accident occurs, trapping 33 Chilean miners approximately  below the ground.Births*1301 &ndash; of Woodstock, 1st Earl of Kent, English politician (d. 1330)*1397 &ndash; Dufay, Franco-Flemish composer and theorist (d. 1474)*1461 &ndash; King Jagiellon of Poland (d. 1506)*1540 &ndash; Justus Scaliger, French philologist and historian (d. 1609) *1623 &ndash; Cesti, Italian composer (d. 1669)*1641 &ndash; Hathorne, American magistrate (d. 1717)*1662 &ndash; James Anderson, Scottish historian (d. 1728)*1694 &ndash; Leo, Italian composer (d. 1744)*1749 &ndash; Lynch, Jr., American congressman (d. 1779)*1797 &ndash; August Kummer, German composer (d. 1879)*1802 &ndash; Henrik Abel, Norwegian mathematician (d. 1829)*1811 &ndash; Thomas, French opera composer (d. 1896)*1813 &ndash; Aasen, Norwegian poet and linguist (d. 1896)*1815 &ndash; John Eyre, English explorer (d. 1901)*1827 &ndash; da Fonseca, Brazilian statesman (d. 1892)*1828 &ndash; Queen of the Netherlands, Dutch consort of XV of Sweden (d. 1871)*1833 &ndash; Queen of Vasa, Austrian consort of of Saxony (d. 1907)*1843 &ndash; Scott Skinner, Scottish composer (d. 1927)*1844 &ndash; Yefimovich Repin, Russian painter and sculptor (d. 1930)*1850 &ndash; de Maupassant, French writer (d. 1893)*1862 &ndash; Merrick, English sideshow performer (d. 1890)*1866 &ndash; Harries, German chemist (d. 1923)*  1866   &ndash; Trott, Australian cricketer (d. 1917)*1868 &ndash; Merikanto, Finnish composer (d. 1924)*1872 &ndash; Cruz, Brazilian physician (d. 1917)*1874 &ndash; Clair Mitchell, American economist (d. 1948)*1876 &ndash; Ritter Beard, American historian (d. 1958)*1877 &ndash; Thomson, Canadian painter (d. 1917)*1880 &ndash; Rush, African-American lawyer (d. 1962)*1887 &ndash; Owen, English actor (d. 1972)*1888 &ndash; Francen, Belgian-born French actor (d. 1977)*1889 &ndash; Aiken, American writer (d. 1973)*1890 &ndash; Kleiber, Austrian conductor (d. 1956)*  1890   &ndash; Gabo, Russian sculptor (d. 1977)*1897 &ndash; Larsen, Danish politician (d. 1972)*1901 &ndash; Autant-Lara, French film director (d. 2000)*1904 &ndash; Vivian Thimann, English-born American botanist and microbiologist (d. 1997)*1906 &ndash; Huston, American director (d. 1987)*  1906   &ndash; Leontief, Russian economist, Nobel laureate (d. 1999)*  1906   &ndash; Hickson, English actress (d. 1998)*1908 &ndash; Holt, 17th Minister of Australia (d. 1967)*1910 &ndash; Coquatrix, French songwriter and music impresario (d. 1979)*1911 &ndash; Robert Taylor, American actor (d. 1969)*1912 &ndash; Pierre, French Catholic priest (d. 2007)*1914 &ndash; Baer, American actor d, 2002*  1914   &ndash; Brian, American actor (d. 1993)*  1914   &ndash; ulek, Croatian composer and conductor(d. 1986)*1918 &ndash; Drake, American actor (d. 1982)*  1918   &ndash; Oliphant, Canadian ballerina (d. 2004)*1920 &ndash; Diamond, Canadian-born American actress (d. 1985)*1922 &ndash; Tom Perry, American religious figure*1923 &ndash; Nair, Singaporean statesman (d. 2005)*1926 &ndash; Jolas, French composer*1927 &ndash; Bucht, Swedish composer and musicologist*1929 &ndash; Boros, Hungarian water polo player (d. 1988)*1930 &ndash; Armstrong, American astronaut*  1930   &ndash; Kov, Slovakian politician*  1932   &ndash; de Marez Oyens, Dutch composer (d. 1996)*1934 &ndash; Berry, American poet, writer and farmer*1934 &ndash; Gosdin, American country music singer (d. 2009)*  1934   &ndash; Johan strm, Control engineer and theorist*  1934   &ndash; Byrne, Irish broadcaster*1935 &ndash; John Saxon, American actor*1937 &ndash; Brooks, American ice hockey coach (d. 2003)*  1937   &ndash; G. Marsden, British astronomer (d. 2010)*1939 &ndash; Irene of the Netherlands*1940 &ndash; Gabriel, American football player*1941 &ndash; Clark, American film director (d. 2007)*  1941   &ndash; Moreira, Brazilian percussionist*  1941   &ndash; Kizim, Soviet cosmonaut (d. 2010)*1943 &ndash; Briles, American baseball player (d. 2005)*  1943   &ndash; Smith, American country singer and songwriter (d. 2005)*1945 &ndash; Giczy, Hungarian sprint canoer *1946 &ndash; Anderson, American actress*  1946   &ndash; Coslet, American football player and coach*  1946   &ndash; Silliman, American poet*  1946   &ndash; Slezak, American actress*  1946   &ndash; van der Linden, Dutch composer and keyboardist*1947 &ndash; Anderson, Australian entertainer (Tattoo)*  1947   &ndash; Carbo, American baseball player*  1947   &ndash; Derringer, American guitarist and vocalist*1948 &ndash; Laure, French-Canadian actress*  1948   &ndash; Clemence, English footballer*1951 &ndash; Jarratt, Australian actor*1952 &ndash; Walsh, Irish music manager*  1952   &ndash; Farag, Hungarian water polo player*1953 &ndash; Mahler, American baseball player (d. 2005)*  1953   &ndash; Sang, Australian singer*1955 &ndash; Ojeda, guitarist for Sister*1956 &ndash; Ciccoritti, Canadian film director*  1956   &ndash; McCormick, American actress*1957 &ndash; Prince, American actress*  1957   &ndash; Rohner, American actor*  1957   &ndash; David Gill, chief executive of United*1959 &ndash; Burns, English singer (Dead or Alive)*  1959   &ndash; Smear, American guitarist (Nirvana, Fighters)*1960 &ndash; Swirsky, American songwriter*1961 &ndash; Kitaen, American actress*  1961   &ndash; OConnor, American violinist*  1961   &ndash; Samarasekera, Sri Lankan cricketer*1962 &ndash; Ewing, Jamacian-born American basketball player*  1962   &ndash; de Groen, New Zealand cricketer*  1962   &ndash; Thorpe, American basketball player*1964 &ndash; Adam Yauch, American rapper (Boys)*1965 &ndash; Sakuraba, Japanese composer*1965 &ndash; Coffin, American jazz and alternative rock musician*  1965   &ndash; William Winters, American actor*1966 &ndash; Finch, American photographer and musician*1966 &ndash; Silverman, American actor*1967 &ndash; Caws, American singer (Surf)*  1967   &ndash; Lang, Austrian drummer*1968 &ndash; Clark, Canadian country singer*  1968   &ndash; Flex, American hip hop DJ*  1968   &ndash; Ishizawa, Japanese professional wrestler*  1968   &ndash; Le Pen, French politician*  1968   &ndash; Luzhny, Ukrainian footballer*  1968   &ndash; McRae, Scottish rally driver (d. 2007)*  1968   &ndash; Olerud, American baseball player*1969 &ndash; Drakes, Barbadian cricketer*  1969   &ndash; Prasad, Indian cricketer*  1969   &ndash; Volpato, Chilean actress*  1969   &ndash; Robert Scott, Australian rower*1970 &ndash; James Gunn, American filmmaker*1971 &ndash; Evil Hasselhoff, American bassist (Bloodhound Gang)*1972 &ndash; Olde Wolbers, Belgian guitarist and bassist (Factory)*  1972   &ndash; Javed, Pakistani cricketer*  1972   &ndash; Hidaka, Japanese professional wrestler*  1972   &ndash; Whitmore, Jamaican footballer*1973 &ndash; Sherk, American mixed martial artist*  1973   &ndash; Hossain, Bangladeshi cricketer*1974 &ndash; Ceccoli, Australian soccer player*  1974   &ndash; Kullinger, Swedish footballer*  1974   &ndash; Sibierski, French footballer*1975 &ndash; Cotton, English actor*  1975   &ndash; Foster, American actress*  1975   &ndash; Goldenberg, Israeli/Canadian mentalist (GoldMind)*  1975   &ndash; Goldberg, Israeli/British actor*  1975   &ndash; Mukherjee, Indian actress*  1975   &ndash; Toppinen, Finnish cellist (Apocalyptica)*  1975   &ndash; Hipgrave, British musician, freelance journalist, and businessman*1976 &ndash; Friesen, Canadian ice hockey player*  1976   &ndash; Sang-woo, South Korean actor*  1976   &ndash; Pahars, Latvian footballer*1977 &ndash; Hinske, American baseball player*  1977   &ndash; Michael Walsh, English footballer*  1977   &ndash; Mulder, American baseball player*1978 &ndash; Gevaert, Belgian sprinter*  1978   &ndash; Karantzi, Greek singer*  1978   &ndash; Faltoyano, Hungarian pornographic actress*1979 &ndash; David Healy, Northern Irish footballer*1980 &ndash; Bridge, English footballer*  1980   &ndash; Cabaas, Paraguayan footballer*  1980   &ndash; ulina, Australian footballer*  1980   &ndash; Lei, Singaporean/American pornographic actress*  1980   &ndash; Seth, Indian actor*  1980   &ndash; Umar, Maldivian footballer*  1980   &ndash; Winkleman, English actress*1981 &ndash; David Clarke, British ice hockey player*  1981   &ndash; Crawford, American baseball player*  1981   &ndash; Guay, Canadian alpine skier*  1981   &ndash; Maregwede, Zimbabwean cricketer*  1981   &ndash; Scott, American murder victim (d. 1999)*  1981   &ndash; K Shibasaki, Japanese singer*  1981   &ndash; Zion, Puerto Rican singer*  1981   &ndash; Williams, American internet celebrity*1982 &ndash; Houston, English/German rugby player*  1982   &ndash; Jones, American track and field athlete*  1982   &ndash; Pazienza, Italian footballer*  1982   &ndash; Regner, German singer*  1982   &ndash; Sell, American mixed martial artist*  1982   &ndash; Seung Min, Korean table tennis player*1983 &ndash; Hall, American football player*  1983   &ndash; Dawn Richard, American singer (Kane, Dirty Money)*1985 &ndash; Ciman, Belgian footballer*  1985   &ndash; Joy Corkrey, American singer*  1985   &ndash; Kalou, Ivorian footballer*1986 &ndash; Creamer, American golfer*  1986   &ndash; Davis, Australian singer*1987 &ndash; Belle, American pornographic actress*  1987   &ndash; DSouza, Indian actress*  1987   &ndash; Tchoumitcheva, Swiss model *1988 &ndash; Pellegrini, Italian swimmer*  1988   &ndash; McKenzie, American wrestler*1989 &ndash; Manset, French footballer*1993 &ndash; Ohgo, Japanese actress*2000 &ndash; Bond, Japanese/American singer-songwriter and drummerDeaths* 882 &ndash; King III of France (b. 863)*1063 &ndash; ap Llywelyn, of Gwynedd (b. 1007)*1364 &ndash; Kgon of Japan (b. 1313)*1572 &ndash; Luria, Palestinian Kabbalist (b. 1534)*1579 &ndash; Hosius, Polish Catholic cardinal (b. 1504)*1610 &ndash; Garca de Ramn, Spanish soldier and twice Governor of Chile (b. 1552)*1633 &ndash; George Abbot, of Canterbury (b. 1562)*1678 &ndash; Garca de Zspedes, Mexican viol player, tenor and composer (b. 1619)*1729 &ndash; Newcomen, English engineer (b. 1664)*1743 &ndash; Hervey, 2nd Baron Hervey, English statesman and writer (b. 1696)*1778 &ndash; Clmencet, French historian (b. 1703)*1792 &ndash; North, Lord North, Minister of the United Kingdom (b. 1732)*1799 &ndash; Howe, 1st Earl Howe, Navy admiral of the fleet (b. 1726)*1868 &ndash; Boucher de Crvecur de Perthes, French archaeologist (b. 1788)*1877 &ndash; Crown Prince of Sweden (b. 1799)*1880 &ndash; Ritter von Hebra, Austrian physician (b. 1816)*1895 &ndash; Engels, German philosopher (b. 1820)*1901 &ndash; Princess Royal of Great Britain and German Empress (b. 1840)*1911 &ndash; Caruthers, American baseball player (b. 1864)*1921 &ndash; Rallis, Greek politician, five times Prime Minister of Greece (b. 1844)*1923 &ndash; Jagi, Croatian Slavist (b. 1835)*1925 &ndash; Jennie Lee, American actress (b. 1848)*1929 &ndash; Fawcett, British suffragist (b. 1847)*1939 &ndash; Jankovich, Hungarian politician (b. 1865)*1944 &ndash; Turnbull, English cricketer (b. 1906)*1946 &ndash; Marx, Chancellor of Germany (b. 1863)*1952 &ndash; Moussa, Egyptian nuclear scientist (b. 1917)*1955 &ndash; Miranda, Portuguese actress and singer (b. 1909)*1957 &ndash; Otto Wieland, German chemist, Nobel Laureate (b. 1877)*1959 &ndash; Guest, English poet (b. 1881)*1960 &ndash; Meighen, 9th Minister of Canada (b. 1874)*1962 &ndash; Monroe, American actress (b. 1926)*1963 &ndash; Bacarisse, Spanish composer (b. 1898)*1964 &ndash; Ross, Canadian hockey player and executive (b. 1886)*1967 &ndash; Brdy, Hungarian water polo player (b. 1908)*1968 &ndash; Perkins American guitarist (b. 1928)*1972 &ndash; Hylton-Foster, of the British House of Commons (b. 1905)*1978 &ndash; Haines, American baseball player (b. 1893)*1980 &ndash; L. Runnels, American politician (b. 1924)*1983 &ndash; Canova, American actress (b. 1913)*  1983   &ndash; Violet Robinson, English economist (b. 1903)*1984 &ndash; Burton, Welsh actor (b. 1925)*1987 &ndash; Gamann, German politician (b. 1910)*1991 &ndash; Brown, American football coach (b. 1908)*  1991   &ndash; Honda, Japanese automotive executive (b. 1906)*1992 &ndash; Porcaro, American drummer (Toto) (b. 1954)*1994 &ndash; Avidom, Israeli composer (b. 1908)*  1994   &ndash; de Changy, Belgian racing driver (b. 1922)*1998 &ndash; Kretschmer, German U-boat commander (b. 1912)*  1998   &ndash; Zhivkov, Bulgarian dictator (b. 1911)*2000 &ndash; Buchsbaum, Austrian-born Brazilian writer and ecological activist (b. 1920)*  2000   &ndash; Crali, Italian artist associated with Futurism (b. 1910)*  2000   &ndash; Guinness, British actor (b. 1914)*2001 &ndash; Allimadi, Prime Minister of Uganda (b. 1929)*  2001   &ndash; Skase, Australian fugitive businessman (b. 1948)*2002 &ndash; Ryan Evans, American actor (b. 1982)*  2002   &ndash; Hearn, American basketball announcer (b. 1916)*  2002   &ndash; Lucentini, Italian writer (b. 1920)*  2002   &ndash; Matt Robinson, American actor (b. 1937)*2005 &ndash; Astakhova, Russian gymnast (b. 1936)*  2005   &ndash; OHora, American football coach (b. 1915)*  2005   &ndash; Roco, Philippine senator (b. 1941)*2006 &ndash; Butcher, American sled dog champion (b. 1954)*2007 &ndash; Lustiger, French Catholic Cardinal (b. 1926)*  2007   &ndash; Pitti, Romanian actor, singer and producer (b. 1943)*2008 &ndash; Neil Bartlett, English chemist, produced hexafluoroplatinate (b. 1932)*  2008   &ndash; Lindsay, Australian country and western singer-songwriter (b. 1929)*2009 &ndash; Schulberg, American screenwriter and novelist (b. 1914)*2011 &ndash; Lepper, former Polish Deputy Prime Minister (b. 1954)*  2011   &ndash; Shavershian, Australian body-builder (b. 1989) Holidays and observances* Barsi Bhagat Puran Singh (Sikhism)* Christian Day:** of Reims** Addai** Afra** of Autun** of Saint Mary Major (Catholic Church)** Emygdius** Memnius** of Northumbria** 5 (Eastern Orthodox liturgics)* Day, celebrates the independence of Faso from France in 1960.* Beer Day * The beginning of Carnival (Bogot)* Victory and Homeland Thanksgiving Day and the Day of Croatian defenders (Croatia)External links* BBC: On This Day* * On This Day in Canada----AugustusdagostoAvgustuotdagostuavqustgoeh 5 jit5augustEostdagost55srpendaostuAwstaugustAugust5august5 de agostode agusto5Augustaugustaotaugustusdi AvostLnasaLuanistynan Lnasdalde agostogan:85 555kolovozadi agosto5Agustusde augustoaugustgstagostoAgustus55zlnika5AgostioutgelawjAugustiaugustsAugust5augustus085.5Ogos 55augustusaugustusja:85e astoaugustaugustAotde augustedagostuz:5-avgust5Augustsierpniade agostoAujuaugustiqin chakra yapuy killapi 55.AugustGushtdi austu5augustavgust8.Agustuselokuutaaugusti55uct5AustosawgustAgustusde agostothng 85pimukuu pivd awousseogustus5Augustzh-yue:85Tebaxe5zh:85
2142
List_of_artificial_intelligence_projects
The following is a list of current and past notable intelligence projects.Specialized projectsBrain simulation* Brain Project, an attempt to create a synthetic brain by reverse-engineering the mammalian brain down to the molecular level.* HNeT (Holographic Neural Technology), a technology by AND Corporation (Artificial Neural Devices) based on non linear phase coherence/decoherence principles.* Temporal Memory, a technology by Numenta to capture and replicate the properties of the neocortex.Cognitive architectures* CALO, a DARPA-funded, 25-institution effort to integrate numerous intelligence approaches (language processing, recognition, vision, logic, planning, reasoning, numerous forms of learning) into an AI assistant that learns to help manage your office environment.* SHIAI (Semi Human Instinctive Artificial Intelligence), an AI methodology based on the use of semi-human instincts, developed at Azad University in 2004.* Woman, the oldest continuous form of virtual life  a chatterbot, virtual reality, artificial intelligence, video game, and virtual human.* OpenCog, an open-source framework for General Intelligence designed primarily to support a particular Cognitive Architecture known as CogPrime.* LIDA, a Java framework for General Intelligence developed at the University of Memphis, implementing a cognitive architecture based on Workspace Theory.Games* Chinook, a computer program that plays draughts; the first to win the world champion title in the competition against humans.* Deep Blue, a chess-playing computer developed by IBM which beat Kasparov in 1997.* FreeHAL, a self-learning conversation simulator (Chatterbot) which uses semantic nets to organize its knowledge in order to imitate a very close human behavior within conversations.* Poki, research into computer poker by the of Alberta.* TD-Gammon, a program that learned to play world-class backgammon partly by playing against itself (difference learning with networks).Knowledge and reasoning* Cyc, an attempt to assemble an ontology and database of everyday knowledge, enabling human-like reasoning.* Eurisko, a language by Lenat for solving problems which consists of heuristics, including heuristics for how to use and change its heuristics.* Mycin, an early medical expert system.* Mind Common Sense, a project based at the Media Lab to build a large common sense base from online contributions.* Questsin, uses by Example and features a dictionary, knowledge base, repository, reference, and thesaurus.* SNePS, a simultaneously a logic-based, frame-based, and network-based knowledge representation, reasoning, and acting system.* Watson, a answering system being developed by IBM capable of playing the Jeopardy! gameshow.* P.A.N., the first publicly available text analyzer, with comprehensive intelligence currently being developed.Motion and manipulation* Cog, a robot developed by MIT to study theories of science and artificial intelligence, now discontinued.* Grand Challenge 5  Architecture of Brain and Mind, a UK attempt to understand and model natural intelligence at various levels of abstraction, demonstrating results in a succession of increasingly sophisticated working robots.Natural language processing* AIML, an XML dialect for creating language software agents.* A.L.I.C.E., an award-winning language processing chatterbot.* ELIZA, a famous 1966 computer program by Weizenbaum, which parodied therapy.* InfoTame, a text analysis search engine originally developed by the KGB for sorting  communications intercepts.* Jabberwacky, a chatterbot by Carpenter, aiming to simulate a natural human chat.* KAR-Talk, a chatterbot by I.-A.Industrie.* Intelligent Computer, an artificial intelligence software included in the CEPC 230 KARs computer from Continental Edison.* PARRY, another early famous chatterbot, written in 1972 by Kenneth Colby, attempting to simulate a paranoid schizophrenic.* Proverb, a system that can solve crossword puzzles better than most humans.(Proverb: The probabilistic cruciverbalist (AAAI99 Outstanding Paper Award). By Greg A. Keim, Noam Shazeer, Michael L. Littman, Sushant Agarwal, Catherine M. Cheves, Joseph Fitzgerald, Jason Grosland, Fan Jiang, Shannon Pollard, and Karl Weinmeister. 1999. In Proceedings of the Sixteenth National Conference on Artificial Intelligence, 710-717. Menlo Park, Calif.: AAAI Press.)* SHRDLU, an early natural language processing computer program developed by Winograd at MIT from 1968 to 1970.* START, the worlds first web-based question answering system, developed at the MIT CSAIL.* SYSTRAN, a translation technology by a company of the same name, used by Yahoo!, AltaVista and Google, among others.* Texai, an open source project to create artificial intelligence, starting with a bootstrap English dialog system that intelligently acquires knowledge and behaviors.Planning* O-Plan, a project to provide a modular and flexible planning and control system using AI, at AIAI, of Edinburgh.Other* Kreator, an optimization problem solving software by Intelligentics that uses A.I. techniques.* OpenAIR, a routing and communication protocol based on a publish-subscribe architecture, built especially for A.I. research.*SEAS (Environment for Analysis and Simulations), a model of the real world used by security and the US Defense Department that uses simulation and AI to predict and evaluate future events and courses of action.(The Register article Sentient world: war games on the grandest scale published 23 June 2007)Multipurpose projectsSoftware libraries* dANN,(dANN Homepage) a freely available AI library implemented in Java, implementing graph theory, ANN, GA, Chains, graphical models (networks, HMM), etc.* ELKI,(ELKI Homepage) a research project and software framework with numerous mining algorithms (in particular analysis and outlier detection) and index structures by the Maximilian University of Munich.* FRDCSA,(FRDCSA Homepage) an attempt to package and integrate all FOSS AI systems for GNU+Linux-based systems.* I-X, a systems integration architecture project for the creation of intelligent systems at AIAI, of Edinburgh.* RapidMiner, an environment for learning and mining, developed by the University of Technology.* Weka, a free implementation of numerous machine learning algorithms in Java.* Pogamut,(Pogamut Homepage) a free platform for Java AI development in games, developed by the University in PragueCloud services* Applied, a web based mining environment.See also* of cognitive architectures* in artificial intelligenceExternal links* SourceForge AI projectsReferences(
2147
Armour
Image:3ACRPatrol(OIF3).jpg|thumb|right|300px|U.S. Army soldiers wearing vests, accompanied by an armoured Bradley.Armour or armor (see spelling differences) is protective covering used to prevent damage from being inflicted to an object, individual or a vehicle through use of direct contact weapons or projectiles, usually during combat, or from damage caused by a potentially dangerous environment or action (e.g., cycling, sites of construction works). armour is used to protect soldiers, and animals such as horses (the application for the latter called barding). armour is used on warships and fighting vehicles.EtymologyThe word armour came into use in the Middle Ages as a borrowing from the French. It is dated from 1297, as a mail, defensive covering worn in combat from Old French armeure, itself derived from the Latin armatura arms and/or equipment with the root arma arms or gear.PersonalArmour has been used throughout history. It has been made from a variety of materials; from rudimentary leather protection, personal armour evolved to Mail and full plated suits of armour. For much of history the manufacture of metal armour in Europe has dominated the technology and employment of armour. Armour drove the development of many important technologies of the Ancient World, including wood lamination, mining, metal refining, vehicle manufacture, leather processing, and later decorative metal working. Its production was influential in the revolution, and influenced commercial development of metallurgy and engineering.  Armour was the single most influential factor in the development of firearms that revolutionised warfare.HistoryImage:Mycenaean armour 1400BC.jpg|thumb|The panoply, Mycenaean Greek armour, 1400 BCSignificant factors in the development of armour include the economic and technological necessities of armour production. For instance, plate armour first appeared in Medieval Europe when water-powered trip hammers made the formation of plates faster and cheaper. Also, modern militaries usually do not equip their forces with the best armour available, since it would be prohibitively expensive. At times the development of armour has run parallel to the development of increasingly effective weaponry on the battlefield, with armourers seeking to create better protection without sacrificing mobility.Well known armour types in history include the hamata, squamata, and the segmentata of the legions, the mail hauberk of the early medieval age, and the full steel plate harness worn by later Medieval and Renaissance knights, and breast and back plates worn by heavy cavalry in several European countries until the first year of World War I (191415). The samurai warriors of feudal Japan utilized many types of armour for hundreds of years up to the 19th century.EarlyCuirasses and helmets were manufactured in Japan as early as the 4th century.(Farris 1998, p. 75)Tank, worn by foot soldiers and keik, worn by horsemen were both pre-samurai types of early armour constructed from iron plates connected together by leather thongs. Japanese lamellar armour (keiko) passed through Korea and reached Japan around the 5th century.(Robinson 2002, p. 10) These early Japanese lamellar armours took the form of a sleeveless jacket and a helmet.(Robinson 2002, pp. 169170)Armour did not always cover all of the body; sometimes no more than a helmet and leg plates where worn. The rest of the body was generally protected by means of a large shield. Examples of armies equipping their troops in this fashion were the Aztecs (16th century DC), and the hoplites in Ancient Greece.(Fagan 2004, )In East Asia many types of armour were commonly used at different times by various cultures including, scale armour, lamellar armour, armour, mail, mail, armour and brigandine. Around the dynastic Tang, Song, and early Ming Period, cuirasses and plates (mingguangjia) were also used, with more elaborate versions for officers in war. The Chinese, during that time used partial plates for important body parts instead of covering their whole body since too much plate armour hinders their martial arts movement. The Other body parts were covered in cloth, leather, lamellar, and/or Mountain pattern. In pre-Qin dynasty times, leather armour was made out of various animals, with more exotic ones such as the rhinoceros.Mail, sometimes called chainmail, made of interlocking iron rings is believed to have first appeared some time after 300 BC. Its invention is credited to the Celts, the Romans were thought to have adopted their design.(Gabriel 2007, p. 79)Gradually, small additional plates or discs of iron were added to the mail to protect vulnerable areas. Hardened leather and splinted construction were used for arm and leg pieces. The of plates was developed, an armour made of large plates sewn inside a textile or leather coat.Early plate in Italy, and elsewhere in the 13th15th century were made of iron. Iron armour could be carburised or case hardened to give a surface of harder steel.(Williams 2003, pp. 740741.) Plate armour became cheaper than mail by the 15th century as it required much less labour and labour had become much more expensive after the Death, though it did require larger furnaces to produce larger blooms. Mail continued to be used to protect those joints which could not be adequately protected by plate, such as the armpit, crook of the elbow and groin. Another advantage of plate was that a lance rest could be fitted to the breast plate.(Williams 2003, p. 55)The small skull cap evolved into a bigger true helmet, the bascinet, as it was lengthened downward to protect the back of the neck and the sides of the head. Additionally, several new forms of fully enclosed helmets were introduced in the late 14th century.Probably the most recognised style of armour in the World became the armour associated with the knights of the European Middle Ages, but continuing to the early 17th century of Enlightenment in all European countries.By about 1400 the full harness of plate armour had been developed in armouries of Lombardy(Williams 2003, p. 53) Heavy cavalry dominated the battlefield for centuries in part because of their armour.In the early 15th century, advances in weaponry allowed infantry to defeat armoured knights on the battlefield. The quality of the metal used in armour deteriorated as armies became bigger and armour was made thicker, necessitating breeding of larger cavalry horses. If during the 1415th centuries armour seldom weighed more than 15 kg, then by the late 16th century it weighed 25 kg.(Williams 2003, p. 916) The increasing weight and thickness of late 16th century armour therefore gave substantial resistance.In the early years of low velocity firearms, full suits of armour, or breast plates actually stopped bullets fired from a modest distance. Crossbow bolts, if still used, would seldom penetrate good plate, nor would any bullet unless fired from close range. In effect, rather than making plate armour obsolete, the use of firearms stimulated the development of plate armour into its later stages. For most of that period, it allowed horsemen to fight while being the targets of defending arquebuseers without being easily killed. Full suits of armour were actually worn by generals and princely commanders right up to the second decade of the 18th century. It was the only way they could be mounted and survey the overall battlefield with safety from distant musket fire.The horse was afforded protection from lances and infantry weapons by steel plate barding. This gave the horse protection and enhanced the visual impression of a mounted knight. Late in the era, elaborate barding was used in parade armour.LaterGradually starting in the mid-16th century, one plate element after another was discarded to save weight for foot soldiers.Back and breast plates continued to be used throughout the entire period of the 18th century and through Napoleonic times, in many European (heavy) cavalry units, until the early 20th century. From their introduction, muskets could pierce plate armour, so cavalry had to be far more mindful of the fire. In Japan armour continued to be used until the end of the samurai era, with the last major fighting in which armour was used happening in 1868.(Robinson 1951, )Samurai armour had one last short lived use in 1877 during the Rebellion(Robinson 2002, p. 208)Though the age of the knight was over, armour continued to be used in many capacities. Soldiers in the American Civil War bought iron and steel vests from peddlers (both sides had considered but rejected body armour for standard issue). The effectiveness of the vests varied widely- some successfully deflected bullets and saved lives, but others were poorly made and resulted in tragedy for the soldiers. In any case the vests were abandoned by many soldiers due to their weight on long marches as well as the stigma they got for being cowards from their fellow troops.(Stewart, pp.745)At the start of World War I, thousands of the French Cuirassiers rode out to engage the German Cavalry who likewise used helmets and armour. By that period, the shiny armour plate was covered in dark paint and a canvas wrap covered their elaborate Napoleonic style helmets. Their armour was meant to protect only against sabres and light lances. The cavalry had to beware of high velocity rifles and guns like the foot soldiers, who at least had a trench to protect them.PresentToday, vests, euphemistically known as a jacket, made of ballistic cloth (e.g. kevlar, dyneema, twaron, spectra etc.) and ceramic or metal plates are common among police forces, security staff, corrections officers and some branches of the military.The US Army has adopted body armour, which uses Enhanced Small Arms Protective Inserts (E-S.A.P.I) in the chest, sides and back of the armour. Each plate is rated to stop a range of ammunition including 3 hits from a NATO AP round at a range of , though accounts in Iraq and Afghanistan tell of soldiers shot as many as seven times in the chest without penetration. Skin body armour is another ballistic vest which is currently in testing with mixed results.Despite advances in the protection offered by ballistic armour against projectiles, as the name implies, modern ballistic body armour is much less impervious to stabbing weapons unless they are augmented with anti-knife/anti-stab armour (usually a form of mail). Other types The first ships protected by iron armour were Kobuksons built in the early 15th century.The first modern production technology for armour plating was used by navies in the construction of the warship, reaching its pinnacle of development with the battleship. It was also naval engineers that constructed the first tanks during World War I, giving rise to fighting vehicles. Aerial armour has been used to protect pilots and aircraft systems since the Second World War.In modern ground forces usage, the meaning of armour has expanded to include the role of troops in combat. After the evolution of warfare, infantry were mounted in armoured fighting vehicles and replaced infantry in many situations. In modern armoured warfare, armoured units equipped with tanks and fighting vehicles serve the historic role of both the battle cavalry, cavalry and dragoons, and belong to the armoured branch. History  Ships Image:Turtle_boat.jpg|thumb|upright|Kobukson, iron armoured shipleft|thumb|Warrior during her third commission between 1867 and 1871.The first ships protected by iron armour were Kobuksons built in the early 15th century.The first ironclad battleship, with iron armour over a wooden hull, La Gloire, was launched by the Navy in 1859;(Sondhaus, pp.734) she prompted the British Navy to build a counter. The following year they launched Warrior, which was twice the size and had iron armour over an iron hull. After the first battle between two ironclads took place in 1862 during the Civil War, it became clear that the ironclad had replaced the unarmoured line-of-battle ship as the most powerful warship afloat.(Sondhaus, p. 86)Ironclads were designed for several roles, including as high seas battleships, coastal defence ships, and long-range cruisers. The rapid evolution of warship design in the late 19th century transformed the ironclad from a wooden-hulled vessel which carried sails to supplement its steam engines into the steel-built, turreted battleships and cruisers familiar in the 20th century. This change was pushed forward by the development of heavier naval guns (the ironclads of the 1880s carried some of the heaviest guns ever mounted at sea), more sophisticated steam engines, and advances in metallurgy which made steel shipbuilding possible.The rapid pace of change in the ironclad period meant that many ships were obsolete as soon as they were complete, and that naval tactics were in a state of flux. Many ironclads were built to make use of the ram or the torpedo, which a number of naval designers considered the crucial weapons of naval combat. There is no clear end to the ironclad period, but towards the end of the 1890s the term ironclad dropped out of use. New ships were increasingly constructed to a standard pattern and designated battleships or cruisers. Trains thumb|upright|An armoured train from 1915trains saw use during the 19th century in the Civil War (18611865), the War (18701871), the First and Second Boer Wars (188081 and 18991902), the First (19141918) and Second World Wars (19391945) and the Indochina War (19461954). The most intensive use of armoured trains was during the Civil War (19181920).During the Boer War on 15 November 1899, Churchill, then a war-correspondent, was travelling on board an armoured train when it was ambushed by Boer commandos. Churchill and many of the trains garrison were captured, though many others escaped, including wounded placed on the trains engine. Armoured fighting vehicles Towards the end of World War I, armies on both sides were experimenting with plate armour as protection against shrapnel and ricocheting projectiles. The first proposal for a tank was by the Austrian Oberleutenant Burstyn who, in 1911, proposed a design for motor artillery (Motorengeschtz) with a turret, but his design never progressed beyond a German patent in 1912.(DiNardo 1986, )Amoured cars were put into use by the British on the Western Front. Initially an innovation to aid the recovery of downed pilots, they were sidelined when the front became static. They continued to be used in the more open Middle East battlefields.Tank or landship development, originally conducted by the British Navy under the auspices of the Committee was sponsored by the Lord of the Admiralty, Churchill and proceeded through a number of prototypes culminating in the I tank prototype, named Mother.(Willmott 2003, ) The first tank to engage in battle was designated D1, a British Mark I, during the of Flers-Courcelette (part of the Somme Offensive) on 15 September 1916.(Regan 1993, p.12)In contrast to World War II, Germany fielded very few tanks during WWI, with only 15 of the A7V type being produced in Germany during the war.(Willmott 2003, p. 222) Most German tanks were captured British ones. The first tank versus tank action took place on 24 April 1918 at Battle of Villers-Bretonneux, when three British Mark IVs met an advance of three German A7Vs, supported by infantry. Tanks were knocked out on both sides, but the German attack failed and they retreated.Mechanical problems, poor mobility and piecemeal tactical deployment limited the military significance of the tank in World War I and the tank did not fulfil its promise of rendering trench warfare obsolete. Nonetheless, it was clear to military thinkers on both sides that tanks would play a significant role in future conflicts.( Aircraft The development of effective artillery before the Second World War meant that the pilots, once the knights of the air during the First World War were left far more vulnerable to ground fire. This not only created the requirement for the introduction of the cockpit armour plating that eventually came to be known variously as the bucket or the bathtub, but also the design of such aircraft as the Il-2 which also were heavily armoured to protect the fuel and engine, allowing much greater survivability during ground assaults. Present File:Abrams-transparent.png|thumb|right|The U.S. Militarys Abrams MBT uses composite, reactive, and armourTank armour has progressed from the Second World War armour forms, now incorporating not only harder composites, but also armour designed to defeat charges. As a result of this, the battle tank (MBT) conceived in the War era can survive multiple RPG strikes with minimal effect on the crew or the operation of the vehicle. The tanks that were the last descendants of the cavalry during the Second World War have almost completely disappeared from the worlds militaries due to increased lethality of the weapons available to the vehicle-mounted infantry.The personnel carrier (APC) is a relatively recent development, stemming from trials and experiences during the Second World War. The APC allows the safe and rapid movement of infantry in a combat zone, minimising casualties and maximising mobility. APCs are fundamentally different from the previously used armoured half-tracks in that they offer a higher level of protection from artillery burst fragments, and greater mobility in more terrain types. The basic APC design was substantially expanded to an fighting vehicle (IFV) when properties of an armoured personnel carrier and a tank were combined in one vehicle.Naval armour has fundamentally changed from the Second World War doctrine of thicker plating to defend against shells, bombs and torpedos. Passive defence naval armour for use against shells and other projectile weapons has almost completely disappeared on modern warships. It has been replaced by systems designed to detect and evade, or in the case of the missiles, to destroy threats, including extensive use of radar, sonar and warfare.Although the role of the ground attack aircraft significantly diminished after the War, it re-emerged during the War, and in the recognition of this, the US Air Force authorised the design and production of what was later to become the A-10 dedicated anti-armour and aircraft of the War.See also* vest* Battledress* Bombsuit* Cuirass* Linothorax* exoskeleton* homogeneous armour* armourNotesReferences* * * * * * * * * * * * ar:be:bg:ca:Armaduracs:Zbrojda:Rustningde:Rstung(sjandus)(combate)eo:Kirasofa:(quipement)gd:Armachdgl:Armaduraxal:ko:hr:Oklopzirahis:Herkliit:Corazzahe:lt:arvaihu:Pnclmr:nl:Harnasja:no:Rustningoc:Armadurapl:Zbrojapt:Armaduraro:Armurru:sq:Armaturasimple:Armoursl:Oklepfi:Haarniskasv:Pansartr:Zrhuk:zh:
2315
August_10
 The term the 10th of August is widely used by historians as a shorthand for the Storming of the Tuileries Palace on the 10th of August, 1792, the effective end of the French monarchy until it is restored in 1814.Events* 955 &ndash; of Lechfeld: I, Holy Roman Emperor defeats the Magyars, ending 50 years of Magyar invasion of the West. * 991 &ndash; of Maldon: the English, led by Byrhtnoth, Ealdorman of Essex, are defeated by a band of inland-raiding Vikings near Maldon in Essex.*1270 &ndash; Yekuno Amlak takes the imperial throne of Ethiopia, restoring the dynasty to power after a 100-year  Zagwe interregnum.*1316 &ndash; The Battle of Athenry takes place near Athenry during the campaign in Ireland.*1519 &ndash; Magellans five ships set sail from Seville to circumnavigate the globe. The Basque second in command Elcano will complete the expedition after Magellans death in the Philippines.*1557 &ndash; Battle of St. Quentin: Spanish victory over the French in the Habsburg-Valois Wars.*1628 &ndash; The Swedish warship  sinks in the Stockholm harbour after only about 20 minutes of her maiden voyage.*1675 &ndash; The foundation stone of the Royal Greenwich Observatory in London is laid.*1680 &ndash; The Revolt begins in Mexico.*1755 &ndash; Under the orders of Charles Lawrence, the British Army begins to forcibly deport the Acadians from Scotia to the Colonies.*1776 &ndash; Revolutionary War: word of the States Declaration of Independence reaches London.*1792 &ndash; Revolution: Storming of the Tuileries Palace &ndash; XVI of France is arrested and taken into custody as his Guards are massacred by the Parisian mob.*1793 &ndash; The du Louvre is officially opened in Paris, France.*1809 &ndash; Quito, now the capital of Ecuador, declares independence from Spain. This rebellion will be crushed on 2, 1810.*1813 &ndash; Nacional, is founded by the Chilean patriot Miguel Carrera. It is Chiles oldest and most prestigious school. Its motto is Labor Omnia Vincit, which means Work conquers all things.*1821 &ndash; Missouri is admitted as the 24th state.*1846 &ndash; The Institution is chartered by the States Congress after Smithson donates $500,000.  *1861 &ndash; Civil War: of Wilsons Creek &ndash; the war enters Missouri when a band of raw Confederate troops defeat Union forces in the southwestern part of the state. *1901 &ndash; The U.S. Steel Recognition Strike by the Association of Iron and Steel Workers begins.*1904 &ndash; War: the of the Yellow Sea between the Russian and Japanese battleship fleets takes place.*1905 &ndash; Russo-Japanese War: peace negotiations begin in New Hampshire.*1913 &ndash; Balkan War: delegates from Bulgaria, Romania, Serbia, Montenegro, and Greece sign the Treaty of Bucharest, ending the war.  *1920 &ndash; War I: Ottoman sultan VIs representatives sign the of Svres that divides up the Empire between the Allies.*1932 &ndash; A  chondrite-type meteorite breaks into at least seven pieces and lands near the town of Archie in County, Missouri. *1944 &ndash; War II: American forces defeat the last Japanese troops on Guam.  *1948 &ndash; Camera makes its television debut after being on radio for a year as Candid Microphone.  *1949 &ndash; U.S. President S. Truman signs the National Security Act Amendment, streamlining the defense agencies of the United States government, and replacing the Department of War with the States Department of Defense. *1954 &ndash; At Massena, New York, the groundbreaking ceremony for the Lawrence Seaway is held. *1961 &ndash; First use in War of the Orange by the U.S. Army.*1969 &ndash; A day after murdering Tate and four others, members of Mansons cult kill and Rosemary LaBianca.*1971  &ndash; The for American Baseball Research is founded in New York.*1977 &ndash; In New York, 24-year-old postal employee Berkowitz (Son of Sam) is arrested for a series of killings in the York City area over the period of one year. *1978 &ndash; Three members of the Ulrich family are killed in an accident. This leads to the Pinto litigation.*1981 &ndash; of Adam Walsh:  the head of Walshs son is found. This inspires the creation of the television series Most Wanted.*1988 &ndash; American internment: U.S. President Reagan signs the Liberties Act of 1988, providing $20,000 payments to Americans who were either interned in or relocated by the States during War II.*1990 &ndash; The Magellan space probe reaches Venus. *  1990   &ndash; More than 127 Muslims are killed in North East Lanka by paramilitary troops. *1993 &ndash; An earthquake measuring 7.0 on the Richter Scale hits the Island of Zealand.*1995 &ndash; City bombing: McVeigh and Nichols are indicted for the bombing. Michael Fortier pleads guilty in a plea-bargain for his testimony.*1998 &ndash; HRH Prince Billah is proclaimed the prince of Brunei with a Royal Proclamation.*2003 &ndash; The highest temperature ever recorded in the Kingdom &ndash;  in Kent. It is the first time the United Kingdom has recorded a temperature over .*  2003   &ndash; Malenchenko becomes the first person to marry in space.*2006 &ndash; Scotland Yard disrupts a major terrorist plot to destroy aircraft traveling from the Kingdom to the States.*2009 &ndash; Twenty people are killed in Handlov, Region, in the deadliest mining disaster in Slovakias history.Births*1267 &ndash; King II of Aragon (d. 1327)*1296 &ndash; King of Bohemia (d. 1346)*1360 &ndash; Zabarella, Italian jurist (d. 1417)*1397 &ndash; II of Germany, Holy Roman Emperor (d. 1439)*1489 &ndash; Sturm von Sturmeck, German statesman and reformer (d. 1553)*1520 &ndash; of Valois, French-born Queen consort of the Scots, wife of V of Scotland (d. 1537)*1560 &ndash; Praetorius, German composer (d. 1629)*1602 &ndash; de Roberval, French mathematician (d. 1675)*1645 &ndash; Kino, Italian Catholic missionary (d. 1711)*1737 &ndash; Losenko, Russian painter (d. 1773)*1744 &ndash; Le Normant dtiolles, French daughter of de Pompadour (d. 1754)*1805 &ndash; Toldy, German-Hungarian literary critic (d. 1875)*1809 &ndash; Kirk Townsend, American naturalist (d. 1851)*1810 &ndash; Count Camillo Benso di Cavour, Italian diplomat and politician (d. 1861)*1814 &ndash; Nestl, Swiss industrialist (d. 1890)*1821 &ndash; Cooke, American financier (d. 1905)*1823 &ndash; Stowell Brown, Manx preacher (d. 1886)*1827 &ndash; Toman, Slovenian politician (d. 1870)*1839 &ndash; Stoletov, Russian physicist (d. 1896)*1845 &ndash; Qunanbaiuli, Kazakh poet (d. 1904)*1856 &ndash; Willett, English saving time advocate (d. 1915)*1860 &ndash; Narayan Bhatkhande, Indian musicologist (d. 1936)*1865 &ndash; Glazunov, Russian composer  (d. 1936)*1869 &ndash; Binyon, British poet (d. 1943)*1872 &ndash; Bill Johnson, American double-bassist (d. 1972)*1874 &ndash; Hoover, 31st of the United States (d. 1964)*1877 &ndash; Frank Marshall, American chess player (d. 1944)*1878 &ndash; Dblin, German writer (d. 1957)*1880 &ndash; L. Thornton, American businessman, philanthropist, and politician (d. 1964)*1884 &ndash; Istrati, Romanian writer (d. 1935)*1889 &ndash; Darrow, American board game creator (Monopoly) (d. 1967)*1891 &ndash; ONeill, American actor  (d. 1961)*1890 &ndash; Lewis Macdonald, Canadian politician (d. 1954)*1894 &ndash; V. Giri, Indian politician (d. 1980) *1895 &ndash; Love, Australian cricketer (d. 1969) *1897 &ndash; W. Galbreath, American businessman (d. 1988)*1898 &ndash; Haley, American actor (d. 1979)*1900 &ndash; Porritt, Baron Porritt, New Zealand politician and sprinter (d. 1994) *1902 &ndash; Shearer, Canadian actress (d. 1983)*  1902   &ndash; Siodmak, German-born English novelist and screenwriter (d. 2000)*  1902   &ndash; Tiselius, Swedish chemist, Nobel laureate (d. 1971)*1903 &ndash; Moore, American novelist (d. 1978)*1905 &ndash; Bell Thompson, American journalist (d. 1986)*1907 &ndash; Yu, Chinese Communist military leader (d. 1984)*1908 &ndash; Gonsalves, American soccer player (d. 1977)*  1908   &ndash; Erickson, Australian naturalist and botanic (d. 2009)*1909 &ndash; Fender, American luthier (d. 1991)*1911 &ndash; N. Sherwin-White, English historian (d. 1993)*1912 &ndash; Amado, Brazilian novelist (d. 2001)*1913 &ndash; Paul, German physicist, Nobel laureate (d. 1993)*  1913   &ndash; Beery, Jr., American actor (d. 1994)*1914 &ndash; Corey, American actor (d. 2002)*  1914   &ndash; Menditeguy, Argentine racing driver (d. 1973)*1919 &ndash; Vierny, French cinematographer (d. 2001)*1920 &ndash; Holzman, American basketball coach (d. 1998)*1923 &ndash; Fleming, American actress*  1923   &ndash; Ridgway, English cricketer*1924 &ndash; Hyer, American actress*  1924   &ndash; Buckingham, British romance novelist*1927 &ndash; Washington, American actor (d. 1988)*1928 &ndash; Dean, American singer and businessman (d. 2010)*  1928   &ndash; Mercurio, American-born Australian actor (d. 2010)*  1928   &ndash; Eddie Fisher, American singer (d. 2010)*1932 &ndash; Rosales, Filipino cardinal and Archbishop of Manila*1933 &ndash; Brunson, American poker player*  1933   &ndash; Colavito,  American baseball player*  1933   &ndash; Duckworth, English mechanical engineer (Cosworth) (d. 2005)*1937 &ndash; Sobchak, Russian politician*1939 &ndash; OMara, British actress*1940 &ndash; Hatfield, American singer (Righteous Brothers) (d. 2003)*  1940   &ndash; Waddell, English darts commentator*1942 &ndash; Johnson, American fashion designer*1943 &ndash; Spector, American singer (Ronettes)*  1943   &ndash; Forestier, French-Canadian singer, songwriter and actress*  1943   &ndash; Griffin, American guitarist (Bread) (d. 2005)*  1943   &ndash; Mantler, American trumpeter and composer*  1943   &ndash; Rana, Pakistani cricketer  *1945 &ndash; Miers, American lawyer and House Counsel*  1945   &ndash; Spurr, American Indian tribal chair (d. 2010)*1947 &ndash; Ian Anderson, Scottish singer and flutist (Jethro Tull)*  1947   &ndash; Ibrahim, Malaysian politician, Prime Minister of Malaysia*  1947   &ndash; Ward, English cricketer*1948 &ndash; Austin, American singer*1950 &ndash; Girard, Canadian actor*1952 &ndash; Hugh Kelly, American actor*  1952   &ndash; Venora, American actress*1953 &ndash; Doty, American poet and prose writer*1954 &ndash; Endrulat, German footballer*1955 &ndash; Tiangco, Filipina television personality and broadcast journalist*1956 &ndash; Ottman, American wrestler*  1956   &ndash; Peacock, American record producer, singer-songwriter*  1956   &ndash; Peter Robbins, American actor*1958 &ndash; Richards, English cricketer*1959 &ndash; Arquette, American actress*  1959   &ndash; Mark Price, drummer/percussionist*  1959   &ndash; Vollant, Innu-Canadian singer-songwriter (Kashtin)*1960 &ndash; Banderas, Spanish actor*  1960   &ndash; Braschi, Italian actress*  1960   &ndash; Perry, American golfer*1961 &ndash; Farriss, Australian drummer (INXS)*1962 &ndash; Fordham, singer/songwriter*1963 &ndash; Sullivan, English-born American journalist *  1963   &ndash; Devi, Indian bandit (d. 2001)*1964 &ndash; Aaron Hall, American songwriter*1965 &ndash; Christian, American actress*  1965   &ndash; E. Smith, American jockey*  1965   &ndash; John Starks, American basketball player*1966 &ndash; Krsch, German singer*1967 &ndash; Albert, Belgian footballer*  1967   &ndash; Bowe, American boxer*  1967   &ndash; Gus Johnson, American sportscaster*  1967   &ndash; Sander, Estonian singer and actor*  1967   &ndash; Scholte, Dutch cricketer*  1967   &ndash; Pearson, British singer (Star)*1968 &ndash; Bivins, American singer (Edition, Biv DeVoe)*  1968   &ndash; Hawgood, Canadian ice hockey player*  1968   &ndash; Docter, American film director*1969 &ndash; Symons, Australian actress*1970 &ndash; Hedican, American ice hockey player*  1970   &ndash; Mautone, Australian footballer*  1970   &ndash; Julian, Australian cricketer*1971 &ndash; Keane, Irish footballer*  1971   &ndash; Kindeln, Cuban boxer*  1971   &ndash; Theroux, American actor*  1971   &ndash; Fasano, American baseball player*  1971   &ndash; Randleman, American mixed martial artist*  1971   &ndash; Groth, Danish-born Norwegian vocalist (Berzerk)*1972 &ndash; Dallaglio, English rugby union footballer*  1972   &ndash; Harmon, American model and actress*  1972   &ndash; Johnsson, Swedish guitarist and vocalist (Therion)*1973 &ndash; Raymond, American tennis player*  1973   &ndash; Zanetti, Argentinian footballer*1974 &ndash; Sommeil, French footballer*  1974   &ndash; Simmons, American feminist and author*  1974   &ndash; Marn, Costa Rican footballer*  1975   &ndash; Mansz, Turkish footballer*1976 &ndash; Depoli, American wrestler*1977 &ndash; Griffin, Northern Irish footballer*  1977   &ndash; Kamin, American guitarist and songwriter (Calling)*  1977   &ndash; Matt Morgan, British comedian*1978 &ndash; Allsopp, Australian footballer*  1978   &ndash; Fizer, American basketball player*  1978   &ndash; Read, English cricketer*  1978   &ndash; Yiu, Hong Kong actress*1979 &ndash; Schroeder, French racing driver*  1979   &ndash; Garca, American actress*  1979   &ndash; Geoghegan, American filmmaker and author*  1979   &ndash; Fernando, Sri Lankan cricketer*  1979   &ndash; Lyon, American baseball player*1980 &ndash; Bennett, English wrestler*1981 &ndash; Abe, Japanese singer*  1981   &ndash; Hidayat, Indonesian badminton player*  1981   &ndash; Mouath,Saudi Arabian footballer*1982 &ndash; Josh Anderson, American baseball player*  1982   &ndash; Aoki, American model and actress*1983 &ndash; Perezhogin, Russian ice hockey player*  1983   &ndash; Roy, Canadian ice hockey player*1984 &ndash; Eggold, American actor*1985 &ndash; Cortese, Italian footballer*  1985   &ndash; ODonovan, Irish footballer*1986 &ndash; Torain, American football player*1988 &ndash; Nicco, Italian footballer*1989 &ndash; Gagner, Canadian ice hockey player*  1989   &ndash; Sahar, Israeli footballer*1990 &ndash; Till, American actor*1992 &ndash; Ah-seong, South Korean actress*1993 &ndash; Nakajima, Japanese actor and singerDeaths* 258 &ndash; of Rome (Saint Lawrence), Spanish-born deacon of Rome (martyred) (b. 225)*1535 &ndash; de Medici, ruler of Florence (b. 1509)*1637 &ndash; Gerhard, German Lutheran leader (b. 1582)*1653 &ndash; Tromp, Dutch admiral (b. 1598)*1655 &ndash; de la Cueva, marqus de Bedmar, Spanish cardinal and diplomat (b. 1572)*1723 &ndash; Dubois, French cardinal and statesman (b. 1656)*1759 &ndash; King VI of Spain (b. 1713)*1784 &ndash; Allan Ramsay, Scottish painter (b. 1713)*1802 &ndash; Aepinus, German natural philosopher (b. 1724)*1806 &ndash; Haydn, Austrian composer (b. 1737)*1839 &ndash; John St Aubyn, British fossil collector (b. 1758)*1862 &ndash; Shusaku, Japanese Go player (b. 1829)*1875 &ndash; Andree, German geographer (b. 1808)*1896 &ndash; Lilienthal, German aviation pioneer (b. 1848)*1904 &ndash; Waldeck-Rousseau, French statesman (b. 1846)*1915 &ndash; Moseley, English physicist (b. 1887)*1918 &ndash; Loewenhardt, German flying ace (b. 1897)*1920 &ndash; Politzer, Hungarian-Austrian physician (b. 1835)*1928 &ndash; Cherryman, American actor (b. 1897)*1929 &ndash; Fatou, French mathematician (b. 1878) *1932 &ndash; Tin Tin, American canine film actor (b. 1918)*1945 &ndash; H. Goddard, American rocket scientist (b. 1882)*1948 &ndash; Asakawa, Japanese historian (b. 1873)*  1948   &ndash; Andrew Brown, Scottish football coach (b. 1870)*  1948   &ndash; Summers, English writer (b. 1880)*1958 &ndash; Demaree, American baseball player (b. 1910)*1963 &ndash; Kefauver, American politician (b. 1903)*  1963   &ndash; Wetter, Swiss jurist (b. 1877)*1969 &ndash; Leno LaBianca, American businessman (b. 1925)*  1969   &ndash; Rosemary LaBianca, American housewife (b. 1930)*  1969   &ndash; Kodolnyi, Hungarian writer (b. 1899)*1976 &ndash; Oldfield, Australian cricketer (b. 1894)*1979 &ndash; Gerlach, German physicist (b. 1889)*  1979   &ndash; Foran, American actor (b. 1910)*1980 &ndash; Khan, Pakistani politician (b. 1917)*1982 &ndash; Bigode Herzer, Brazilian writer and poet (b. 1962)*1985 &ndash; Barragar, American football player (b. 1906)*1986 &ndash; Rouse, British mountaineer (b. 1951)*1987 &ndash; Athanasiadis-Novas, Greek lawyer and politician (b. 1893)*1993 &ndash; Euronymous (ystein Aarseth), Norwegian guitarist (Mayhem) (b. 1968)*1997 &ndash; Nancarrow, American composer (b. 1912)*  1997   &ndash; Lauzon, Quebec film director (b. 1953)*1999 &ndash; Pait Upadhyaya, Indian Sanskrit scholar (b. 1899)*2000 &ndash; Parkhouse, English cricketer (b. 1925)*2001 &ndash; Boudreau, American baseball player and manager (b. 1917)*2002 &ndash; Houser, American guitarist (Panic) (b. 1962)*  2002   &ndash; Nygaard, Norwegian computer scientist (b. 1926)*2003 &ndash; Jimnez, Puerto Rican singer (b. c. 1944)*2007 &ndash; Cabot Lodge Bohler, American military pilot and civil rights figure (b. 1925)*  2007   &ndash; E. Faust, American religious figure (b. 1920)*  2007   &ndash; Wilson, British music personality and broadcaster (b. 1950)*  2007   &ndash; Reyka, American law enforcement official (b. 1956)*2008 &ndash; Hayes, American singer-songwriter, keyboardist and actor (b. 1942)*2010 &ndash; Stansfield, English footballer (b. 1978)Holidays and observances*Christian Day:  **Bessus**Blane (Catholic Church)**Geraint of Dumnonia**of Rome**Our Lady of Good Success of Paraaque, Patroness of Paraaque, Philippines**10 (Eastern Orthodox liturgics)*Declaration of Independence of Quito, proclaimed independence from Spain on August 10, 1809, but failed with the execution of all the conspirators of the movement on August 2, 1810. Independence finally occurred on May 24, 1822 at the of Pichincha. (Ecuador)External links* BBC: On This Day* * On This Day in Canada----Augustusdagostootdagostuavqustgoeh 10 jit10augustEostdagost1010srpendaostuAwstaugustAugust10august10 de agostode agusto10Augustaugustaotaugustusdi AvostLnasaLuanistynan Lnasdalde agostogan:810 101010kolovozadi agosto10Agustusde augustoaugustgstagostoAgustus1010zlnika10AgostioutgelawjAugustiaugustsAugust10augustus0810.Aogositra10Ogos 1010augustusaugustusja:810e astoaugustaugustAotde augustedagostuz:10-avgust10Augustsierpniade agostoaugustiqin chakra yapuy killapi 1010.AugustGushtdi austu10augustavgust8.Agustuselokuutaaugusti1010uct10Austosawgustde agostothng 810pimukuu pivd awousseogustus10Augustzh-yue:810Tebaxe10zh:810
2321
Area_51
footnotes    Area 51 is a base, and a remote detachment of Air Force Base. It is located in the southern portion of Nevada in the western States, 83 miles (133 km) north-northwest of downtown Las Vegas. Situated at its center, on the southern shore of Lake, is a large military airfield. The bases primary purpose is to support development and testing of experimental aircraft and weapons systems.(DREAMLAND: Fifty Years of Secret Flight Testing in Nevada By Peter W. Merlin)(Rich, p. 57. Rich describes Groom in 1977 as being ...a sprawling facility, bigger than some municipal airports, a test range for sensitive aviation projects)The base lies within the States Air Forces vast Test and Training Range (NTTR), formerly called the Nellis Air Force Range (NAFR). Although the facilities at the range are managed by the Air Base Wing at Air Force Base, the Groom facility appears to be run as an adjunct of the Force Flight Test Center (AFFTC) at Air Force Base in the Desert, around  southwest of Groom, and as such the base is known as Air Force Flight Test Center (Detachment 3).(Area 51 researcher Glenn Campbell claims that AFFTC Detachment 3 is located at Groom, citing the title of a leaked security manual, the mailbox in Henderson, Nevada he believes formerly served Groom, and the NASA biography of astronaut E. Walz who was formerly a manager at AFFTC-DET3: Campbell, Glenn. Area 51 is Edwards DET 3, Groom Lake Desert Rat, 17 June 1996; Biography of Carl E. Walz (Colonel, USAF, Ret.), NASA B. Johnson Space Center.)(Merlin, Peter W.Black Projects at Groom Lake: Into the 21st Century.)Though the name Area 51 is used in official CIA documentation,( other names used for the facility include Dreamland, Paradise Ranch,(Rich, p. 56. Rich writes Kelly the U2s designer had jokingly nicknamed this Godforsaken place Paradise Ranch, hoping to lure young and innocent flight crews)( Home Base, Watertown Strip, Groom Lake,(Patton, p. 3, lists Paradise Ranch, Watertown, Groom Lake, and Home Base as nicknames) and most recently Homey Airport.(Researcher offers clues on new Area 51 name, Force Times, 23 January 2008.) The area is part of the Nellis Operations Area, and the airspace around the field is referred to as (R-4808N),(FAA aviation chart for the Groom area) known by the military pilots in the area as The Box or the Container.(R-4808N Fixes and Janet Routes Dreamland Resort)The facility is not a conventional airbase, as frontline operational units are not normally deployed there. It instead appears to be used for highly classified military/defense Access Programs (SAP), which are unacknowledged publicly by the government, military personnel, and defense contractors.   Its mission may be to support the development, testing, and training phases for new aircraft weapons systems or research projects.  Once these projects have been approved by the States Air Force or other agencies such as the CIA, and are ready to be announced to the public, operations of the aircraft are then moved to a normal air force base.The intense secrecy surrounding the base, the very existence of which the U.S. government did not even acknowledge until July 14, 2003,() has made it the frequent subject of conspiracy theories and a central component to flying object (UFO) folklore.((U.S. governments positions on Area 51The federal government explicitly concedes (in various court filings and government directives) that the USAF has an operating location near Groom Lake, but does not provide any further information.Unlike much of the Nellis range, the area surrounding the lake is permanently off-limits both to civilian and normal military air traffic. Radar stations protect the area, and unauthorized personnel are quickly expelled. Even military pilots training in the NAFR risk disciplinary action if they stray into the exclusionary box surrounding Grooms airspace.(Lacitis, Erik. Area 51 vets break silence: Sorry, but no space aliens or UFOs The Seattle Times, 27 March 2010.)(Hall, George. Skinner, Michael. Red Flag, Motorbooks International, 1993, ISBN 978-0-87938-759-4, p.49: It is an understatement to say that overflying Dreamland is forbidden...)File:Wfm x51 area51 warningsign.jpg|thumb|Area 51 border and warning sign stating that photography is prohibited and that use of deadly force is authorized under the terms of the 1950 Internal Security Act. A government vehicle is parked on the hilltop; from there, security agents observe the approach to Groom Lake.Perimeter security is provided by uniformed private security guards working for EG&Gs security subcontractor Wackenhut,(Patton, p. 10.) who patrol in Humvees, SUVs, and trucks. The guards are armed with M16s, but no violent encounters with Area 51 observers have been reported; instead, the guards generally follow visitors near the perimeter and radio for the Lincoln County Sheriff. Deadly force is authorized if violators who attempt to breach the secured area fail to heed warnings to halt. Fines of around $600 seem to be the normal course of action, although some visitors and journalists report receiving follow-up visits from FBI agents. Some observers have been detained on public land for pointing camera equipment at the base. Surveillance is supplemented using buried motion sensors.(Poulsen, Kevin. Area 51 hackers dig up trouble, Security Focus, 25 May 2004.)The base does not appear on public U.S. government maps;(USGS 1:24K/25K Topo map for location UTM 11 605181E 4124095N (NAD27) (map via TopoQuest.com)) the USGS topographic map for the area only shows the long-disused Groom Mine.(USGS 1:24K/25K Topo map for geopoint GROOM MINE, NV (map via TopoQuest.com)) A civil aviation chart published by the Department of Transportation shows a large restricted area,(Airports and Landing strips, 2002, Department of Transportation, cf section R-4808N) but defines it as part of the Nellis restricted airspace. The official aeronautical navigation charts for the area show Groom Lake but omit the airport facilities.(Las Vegas Sectional Aeronautical Chart, National Aeronautical Chart Office, Federal Aviation Administration (last checked 26 September 2008)) Similarly the National Atlas page showing federal lands in Nevada(Federal lands and Indian reservations, The National atlas of the United States of America, States Department of the Interior, document ID: pagefed_nv7.pdf INTERIOR-GEOLOGICAL SURVEY, RESTON, VIRGINIA-2003) does not distinguish between the Groom block and other parts of the Nellis range. Although officially declassified, the original film taken by U.S. Corona spy satellite in the 1960s has been altered prior to declassification; in answer to freedom of information queries, the government responds that these exposures (which map to Groom and the entire NAFR) appear to have been destroyed.() Terra satellite images (which were publicly available) were removed from web servers (including Microsofts Terraserver) in 2004,(Terraserver image ) and from the monochrome 1 m resolution USGS data dump made publicly available. NASA 7 images are still available (these are used in the World Wind). Higher resolution (and more recent) images from other satellite imagery providers (including Russian providers and the IKONOS) are commercially available. These show, in considerable detail, the runway marking, base facilities, aircraft, and vehicles.Although federal property within the base is exempt from state and local taxes, facilities owned by private contractors are not. Area 51 researcher Glenn Campbell claimed in 1994 that the base only declares a taxable value of $2 million to the Lincoln County tax assessor, who is unable to enter the area to perform an assessment.() When documents that mention the NTS and operations at Groom are declassified, mentions of Area 51 and Groom Lake are routinely redacted. One notable exception is a 1967 memo from CIA director Helms regarding the deployment of three OXCART aircraft from Groom to Air Base to perform reconnaissance over Vietnam. Although most mentions of OXCARTs home base are redacted in this document, as is a map showing the aircrafts route from there to Okinawa, the redactor appears to have missed one mention: p15 section #2 ends Three OXCART aircraft and the necessary task force personnel will be deployed from Area 51 to Kadena.(OXCART reconnaissance of North Vietnam, Memo to the Deputy Secretary of Defence from the office of CIA Director Richard Helms, 15th May 1967, p15 (the full declassified document is mirrored at Commons))FacilitiesSoviet spy satellites obtained photographs of the Groom Lake area during the height of the War, and later civilian satellites have produced detailed images of the base and its surroundings. Aerial imagery shows the airfield of Area 51 having seven runways including one that now appears to be closed. The closed runway, 14R/32L, is also by far the longest with a total length of approximately , not including stopway. The other runways are two asphalt runways, the 14L/32R with a length of  and 12/30 with a length of , and four runways located on the salt lake. These four runways are 09L/27R and 09R/27L, which are both approximately , and 03L/21R and 03R/21L, which are both approximately . The base also has a helipad.(Measurements, runway state and alignment information based upon Google Earth / Digital Globe images as retrieved on 21 December 2007.)()In December 2007, airline pilots noticed that the base had appeared in their aircraft navigation systems latest Jeppesen database revision with the ICAO airport identifier code of KXTA and listed as Homey Airport.(Marsh, Alton K. (10 January 2008).Dont ask, dont tell: Area 51 gets airport identifier, AOPA On Line.) The probably inadvertent release of the airport data led to advice by the Owners and Pilots Association (AOPA) that student pilots should be explicitly warned about KXTA, not to consider it as a waypoint or destination for any flight even though it now appears in public navigation databases.(Road access to the facility is with State Route 375 at  where an access road connects to the public highway system.   The security gate and a parking facility is at   about 10 miles west-southwest of the road turnoff.   The gate is approximately 25 miles from the main support base along a winding road.The support base has a series of what appears to be supply warehouses, dormitories, a fire station, some water towers and a number of support buildings that are common on military air bases. A very tall tower, perhaps used as the aircraft control tower is also visible.   Open storage warehouses, and what appears to be a reclamation yard is also visible.  Recreation facilities include baseball diamonds and tennis courts.  Several large satellite dishes, presumably for communications are also visible.  A large number of white-painted, presumably government  vehicles are visible in parking lots, mostly being pickup trucks, SUVs and vans.   Several Boeing 737 aircraft are parked on an open ramp, presumably for transportation of workers to the base.   One military aircraft, appearing to be a black-painted F-16 is parked on another ramp; the black paint commonly used by the Air Force for aircraft engaged in night operations.  Several black-painted helicopters are also parked on an open ramp.   The base also has a large number of hangars, more than what is commonly found on a normal air base, presumably to insure operational aircraft are kept out of view by orbiting reconnaissance satellites as well as out of the intense desert heat.Approximately 15.5 miles north-northeast of the base, on a peak known as Baldy Mountain, are a series of radar radomes ,  at approximately 9,400 elevation.   The types of radar at these sites is unknown, although they may be the ARSR-4 Route Surveillance Radar which is used by the Air Force and FAA Surveillance System throughout the United States.  Another series of radars of a different type are located on a ridge at 4,300 just to the north of Groom Lake at .  All of the radar sites appear to be automated and unattended.Background informationWorld War IIThe first known use of the area was the construction in 1941 of an auxiliary airfield for the Coast Air Corps Training Center at Vegas Air Field.  Known as Indian Springs Airfield Auxiliary #1, it consisted of two dirt 5000 runways aligned NE/SW, NW/SE.  The airfield was also used for bombing and artillery practice, as bomb craters are still visible in the vicinity of the runways.   It was abandoned after the gunnery school at Las Vegas closed in June 1946.(Military Airfields in WW2)(Mueller, Robert (1989). Active Air Force Bases Within the United States of America on 17 September 1982. USAF Reference Series, Maxwell AFB, Alabama: Office of Air Force History. ISBN 0-912799-53-6)U-2 programThe Groom Lake test facility was established by the Intelligence Agency (CIA) for Project Aquatone, the development of the U-2 strategic reconnaissance aircraft in April 1955.   As part of the project the director,  Richard M. Bissell Jr., understood that the extreme secrecy enveloping the project, the flight test and pilottraining programs could not be conducted at Air Force Base or Lockheeds Palmdale facility.  A search for a suitable testing site for the U-2 was conducted under the same extreme security as the rest of the project.(Peebles, Curtis, (1999), Dark Eagles, Presidio Press; Revised edition, ISBN 089141696X)   Bissell recalled a little X-shaped field in southern Nevada that he had flown over many times during his involvement with the nuclear  weapons test program.  The airfield was the abandoned Indian Springs Airfield Auxiliary #1 field, which by 1955 had reverted to sand and was unusable, but the adjacent Groom Dry Lake to the northwest met the requirements for a site that was remote, but not too remote.(He notified Lockheed who sent a inspection team out to Groom Lake.  According to Kelly Johnson, ... We flew over it and within thirty seconds, you knew that was the place ... it was right by a dry lake. Man alive, we looked at that lake, andwe all looked at each other. It was another Edwards, so we wheeled around, landed on that lake, taxied up to one end of it.   It was a perfect natural landing field ... as smooth as a billiard table without anything being done to it.  Johnson used a compass to lay out the direction of the first runway. The place was called Groom Lake.((  The lakebed made an ideal strip from which they could operate the troublesome test aircraft, and the Emigrant Valleys mountain ranges and the NTS perimeter protected the test site from prying eyes and outside interference about 100 miles north of Las Vegas.(Peebles, Curtis (2000). Shadow Flights: Americas Secret Air War Against the Soviet Union. Novato, CA: Presidio Press. ISBN 978-0-89141-700-2)(Rich, pp. 141144, details U2 test pilot LeVier scouting the remote area near Death Valley for locations, saying of Groom I gave it a ten plus score... a dry lake bed around three and a half miles around, and describes LeVier showing the lake to U-2 designer Kelly Johnson and CIA official Richard Bissell, and Johnson deciding to locate the runway at south end of lake)On 4 May 1955 a survey team arrived at Groom Lake and laid out a , north-south runway on thesouthwest corner of the lakebed and designated a site for a base support facility.  The new airfield, then known as Site II or The Ranch, initially consisted of little more than a few shelters, workshops and trailer homes in which to house its small team.(   In a little over three months, the base consisted of a single, paved runway, three hangars, a control  tower, and rudimentary accommodations for test personnel. The bases few amenities  included a movie theatre and volleyball court. Additionally, there was a mess hall, several  water wells, and fuel storage tanks. By July 1955.  CIA, Air Force, and Lockheed personnel began arriving.(  The Ranch received its first U-2 delivery on 24 July 1955 from Burbank on a Globemaster II cargo plane, accompanied by Lockheed technicians on a DC-3.( The first U-2 lifted off from Groom on 4 August 1955. A U-2 fleet under the control of the CIA began overflights of Soviet territory by mid-1956.The Groom Lake airfield soon acquired a name: Watertown.  According to some accounts, the site was named after CIA director Dulles birthplace: New York.  Upon its activation, the testing facility was used with increasing frequency for U-2 testing, however that changed in 1957 when the Atomic Energy Commission began testing nuclear weapons at the nearby Flat facility.( Once the AEC Plumbbob series of tests began with the Boltzmann blast in  May 1957, the Watertown airfield personnel were required to evacuate the base prior to each detonation. The AEC, in turn, tried to ensure that expected fallout from any given shot would be limited so as to permit re-entry of personnel within three to four weeks.  All personnel at the base were required to wear radiation badges to measure their exposure to fallout.  Once the atomic testing began, the CIA U-2 testing operations were interrrupted constantly due to the explosions at Yucca Flat, which were scheduled and re-scheduled frequently.( The CIA facilities at Groom Lake were always considered by the Agency as a temporary facility, to accmodate the U-2 testing.   As the project began to wind down, and CIA pilot classes finished their training, Watertown became a virtual ghost town.   By June 1957,  most U-2 testing has moved to AFB and the first operational USAF unit to receive the U-2, the Strategic Reconnaissance Wing, was active at AFB, Texas. For two years following the departure of the U-2s from Groom Lake, the base was fairly quiet, although it remained under CIA jurisdiction.(X-15 programIn July 1959 USAF personnel from Edwards AFB embarked on a two-day survey trip to investigate potential emergency landing sites for the American X-15 rocket plane.  The survey crew received permission to land on the then unused CIA facility at Groom Lake.   The crew tested the hardness of the lakebed surface by dropping a 10-pound  steel ball from a height of six feet and measuring  the diameter of the resulting imprint.  The result was that the Groom Lake surface was considered excellent for emergency use.(In September 1960, NASA and Air Force Flight Test Center personnel at Edwards reviewed the results of the survey trip to Groom Lake, as well as other sites visited by the survey crew.   The use of Groom Lake meant a reduction in support requirements as there was an airfield with emergency equipment and personnel at the site.  Ultimately, they agreed to remove Groom from consideration as an emergency landing site due to difficulty obtaining clearance into the area.(The OXCART programEven before U-2 development was complete, Lockheed began work on its successor as part of the CIAs OXCART project, involving the A-12, a Mach-3 high-altitude reconnaissance aircraft  a later variant of which became the famed USAF Blackbird. As with the previous U-2 program, security requirements of the Oxcart project necessitated an obscure, secret location for A-12 testing. Despite the success of the U-2 flight tests and the OXCART mock-up radar tests, Groom Lake was not initially considered. It was a Wild West outpost, with primitive facilities for only 150 people. The A-l2 test program would require more than ten times that number. Groom Lakes five-thousand foot asphalt runway was both too short and unable to support theweight of the Oxcart. The fuel supply, hangar space, and shop space were all inadequate.(Ten Air Force bases programmed for closure were considered, but all were rejected. The site had to be away from any cities and military or civilian airways to prevent sightings. It also had to have good weather, the necessary housing and fuel supplies, and an eighty-five-hundred-foot runway. None of the air force bases met the security requirements, although, for a time, Edwards Air Force Base was considered. In the end, Groom Lake was the only possibility, however its short runway, austere facilities and other shortcomings meant a major overhaul was necessry prior for Oxcart A-12 testing could commence.( Groom Lake had also, by this time, received a new official name. The Nevada nuclear test site was divided into several numbered areas. To blend in, Groom Lake became Area 51.(This aircraft flight characteristics and maintenance requirements forced a massive expansion of facilities and runways at Groom Lake. On 1 October 1960, Reynolds Electrical and Engineering Company (REECo) began work on the site, referred to as Project 51. Workers engaged in double-shift construction schedules for the next four years to overhaul and upgrade base facilities, and also expand the existing runway to  as well as harden the existing runway to support the heavier A-12. In addition, a new 10,000-foot runway was constructed  (14/32) diagonally across the southwest corner of the lakebed.  An Archimedes curve approximately  two miles across was marked on the dry lake so that an A-12 pilot approaching the end of the overrun could abort to the playa instead of plunging the aircraft into the sagebrush. Area 51  pilots called it The Hook. For crosswind landings two unpaved airstrips (runways 9/27 and  03/21) were marked on the dry lakebed.((The OXCART Story, Thomas P. McIninch, CIA Studies Archive, Vol 15, No. 1, 1994, declassified)  By August 1961 construction of the essential facilities were completed. The States Navy supplied three surplus hangars which were erected on the bases north side. They were designated as Hangar 4, 5, and 6. A fourth, Hangar 7, was new construction. The original U-2 hangars were converted to maintenance and machine shops. Facilities in the main cantonment area included workshops and buildings for storage and administration, a commissary, control tower, fire station, and housing. The Navy also contributed more than 130 surplus Babbitt duplex housing units for long-term occupancy facilities. Older buildings were repaired, and additional facilities were constructed as necessary. A reservoir pond, surrounded by trees, served as a recreational area one mile north of the base. Other recreational facilities included a gymnasium, movie theatre, and a baseball diamond.((  A permanent aircraft fuel tank farm was constructed by early 1962 for the special JP-7 fuel required by the A-12.  Seven tanks were constructed, with a total capacity of 1,320,000-gallons.(   Preparations began for the arrival of OXCART; security was greatly enhanced, and the small civilian mine in the Groom basin was closed. In January 1962, the Federal Aviation Administration (FAA) expanded the restricted airspace in the vicinity of Groom Lake. The lakebed became the center of a 600-square-mile addition to restricted area R-4808N. Restricted continuously at all altitudes, the airspace occupies the center of the Nellis Air Force Range.((Althugh remaining under the jurisdiction of the CIA, the facility received eight USAF Voodoos for training, two Shooting Star trainers for proficiency flying, a Hercules for cargo transport, a U-3A for administrative purposes, a helicopter for search and rescue, and a 180 for liaison use; and Lockheed provided an Starfighter for use as a plane.( The first OXCART was covertly trucked to the base in February 1962, assembled, and it made its first flight 26 April 1962. At the time, the base boasted a complement of over 1,000 personnel. It had fueling tanks, a control tower, and a baseball diamond. The A-12 was a large, loud, and distinctive-looking aircraft. During the early test flights, the CIA tried to limit the number of people who saw the aircraft. All those at Groom Lake not connected with the Oxcart program were herded into the mess hall before each takeoff. This was soon dropped as it disrupted activities and was impractical with the large number of flights.(Although the airspace above Groom Lake was closed, it was near busy Air Force Base. Inevitably, there were sightings. Some Nellis pilots saw the A-12 several times. At least one NASA test pilot from AFB saw an A-12. He radioed the Edwards tower and asked what it was. He was curtly told to halt transmissions. After landing, he was told what he had seen was vital to U.S. security. He also signed a secrecy agreement. The major source of A-12 sightings was airline pilots. It is believed that twenty to thirty airline sightings were made. One American Airlines pilot saw an A-12 twice. During one sighting, a pilot saw an A-12 and two chase planes; he radioed, I see a goose and two goslings.(Groom saw the first flight of most major Blackbird variants: A-12, the abortive YF-12A interceptor variant designed to intercept Soviet manned bombers, and the D-21 Blackbird-based drone project. By the end of 1963, nine A-12s were at Area 51.  A mock-up of the Reconnaissance Strike-71 (RS-71) was inspected by the Air Force on 4 June 1962. The concept of a strike A-12 with strategic bombing capabilities ran into political problems from both the Air Force, which was involved with the Valkyrie program at the time and a lack of enthusiasm from Defense Secretary S. McNamara. McNamara and his whiz kids saw no need for additional manned bombers in the age of ICBMs.  In addition  McNamara was phasing down Defense Command and saw no use for the YF-12A Interceptor.  Accordingly, only the reconnaissance version of the RS-71 remained (it kept the strike part of the name, however). Where the A-12 was deiigned for clandestine overflights of Soviet territory, the RS-71 carried additional side-looking cameras and other sensors which gave it a much greater capabiity. On December 2728, 1962, a contract was issued to Lockheed to build six test RS-71s.(According to legend, President B. Johnson asked an aide soon upon taking office after the Kennedy Assassination what the RS-71 was for. The aide responded, strategic reconnaissance. Thus, when Johnson announced the existence of a new reconnaissance aircraft, on 24 July 1964, President Johnson called it the SR-71. President Johnsons announcements created an unusual security situation. Whle the USAF SR-71 project was a White or open project, the CIAs A-12 was not. Its existence would remain a secret until 1981. To maintain the secret, all those involved were told of the coming SR-71 announcement and warned to keep the A-12 separate.(The SR-71 first flew at the Lockheed facilities at Palmdale, California in December 1964, and Palmdale and AFB served as the primary operation sites for that model. The 4200th Strategic Reconnaissance Wing activated at Beale AFB on 1 January 1965, however the first SR-71 did not arrive until 7 January 1966.   Starting in November 1965, even as the A-12 was declared operational for use by the CIA and planning was made for its use, doubts were expressed about the cost of operating the two separate groups of A-12s and SR-71s. After a year or more of debate, it was decided on 10 January 1967, to phase out the CIA A-12 program. Although the Oxcart was gone, its USAF descendant, the SR-71, would continue to fly intelligence missions for the next twenty-two years. Finally, in 1990, the SR-71 was retired.(The A-12s would remain at Groom Lake until 1968 and occasionally were deployed to other United States bases overseas.() The CIAs nine remaining A-12s were placed in storage at Palmdale in June 1968. All surviving aircraft remained there for nearly 20 years before being sent to museums around the United States.D-21 TagboardFollowing the loss of Powerss U-2 over the Soviet Union, there were several discussions about using the A-12 OXCART as an unpiloted drone aircraft. Although Kelly Johnson had come to support the idea of drone reconnaissance, he opposed the development of an A-12 drone, contending that the aircraft was too large and complex for such a conversion.  However, the Air Force agreed to fund the study of a high-speed, high-altitude drone aircraft in October 1962. The air force interest seems to have moved the CIA to take action, the project designated Q-12.  By October 1963, the drones design had been finalized.At the same time, the Q-12 underwent a name change. To separate it from the other A-12-based projects, it was renamed the D-21. (The 12 was reversed to 21).  Tagboard was the projects code name.(The first D-21 was completed in the spring of 1964 by Lockheed. After four more months of checkouts and static tests, the aircraft was shipped to Groom Lake and reassembled.  It was to be carried by a two-seat derivative of the A-12, designated the M-21.  When the D-21/M-21 reached the launch point, The first step would be to blow off the D-21s inlet and exhaust covers.   With the D-21/M-21 at the correct speed and altitude, the LCO would start the ramjet and the other systems of the D-21.  With the D-21s systems activated and running, and the launch aircraft at the correct point, the M-21 would begin a slight pushover, the LCO would push a final button, and the D-21 would come off the pylon.(Difficulties were addressed throughout 1964 and 1965 at Groom Lake with various technical issues.  Captive flights showed unforeseen aerodynamic difficulties.  By late January 1966, more than a year after the first captive flight, everything seemed ready.  The first D-21 launch was made on 5 March 1966 with a successful flight, with the D-21 flying 120 miles with limited fuel.  A second D-12 flight was successful in April 1966 with the drone flying 1,200 miles, reaching Mach 3.3 and 90,000 feet.  An accident on 30 July 1966 with a fully fueled D-21, on a planned checkout flight suffered from a non-start of the drone after its separation, causing it to collide with the M-21 launch aircraft.  The two crewmen ejected and landed in the ocean 150 miles offshore. One crew member was picked up by a helicopter, but the other, having survived the aircraft breakup and ejection, drowned when sea water entered his pressure suit.   Kelly Johnson personally cancelled the entire program, having had serious doubts from the start of the feasibility.  A number of D-21s had already been produced, and rather than scrapping the whole effort, Johnson again proposed to the Air Force that they be launched from a B-52H bomber.(By late summer of 1967, the modification work to both the D-21 (now designated D-21B) and the B-52Hs were complete. The test program could now resume.  The test missions were flown out of Groom Lake, with the actual launches over the Pacific. The first D-21B to be flown was Article 501, the prototype. The first attempt was made on September 28, 1967, and ended in complete failure.   As the B-52 was flying toward the launch point, the D-21B fell off the pylon. The B-52H gave a sharp lurch as the drone fell free. The booster fired and was quite a sight from the ground. The failure was traced to a stripped nut on the forward right attachment point on the pylon.  Several more tests were made, none of which met with success.  However, the fact is that the resumptions of D-21 tests took place against a changing reconnaissance background. The A-12 had finally been allowed to deploy, and the SR-71 was soon to replace it.  At the same time, new developments in reconnaissance satellite technology were nearing operation. Up to this point, the limited number of satellites available restricted coverage to the Soviet Union. A new generation of reconnaissance satellites could soon cover targets anywhere in the world. The satellites resolution would be comparable to that of aircraft, but without the slightest political risk.  Time was running out for the Tagboard.(Several more test flights, made from AFB, California, including two over China were made in 1969 and 1970 to varying degrees of success.  On July 15, 1971, Kelly Johnson received a wire canceling the D-21B program. The remaining drones were transferred by a C-5A and placed in dead storage. The tooling used to build the D-21Bs was ordered destroyed.  Like the A-12 Oxcart, the D-21B Tagboard drones remained a Black airplane, even in retirement. Their existence was not suspected until August 1976, when the first group was placed in storage at the AFB Storage and Disposition Center. A second group arrived in 1977.  They were labeled GTD-21Bs (GT stood for ground training).(Davis-Monthan is an open base, with public tours of the storage area at the time, so the odd-looking drones were soon spotted and photos began appearing in magazines.  Speculation about the D-21Bs circulated within aviation circles for years, and it was not until 1982 that details of the Tagboard program were released.  However, it was not until 1993 that the B-52/D-21B program was made public.  That same year, the surviving D-21Bs were released to museums.(Foreign Technology EvaluationFile:Mig-17-usaf.jpg|thumb|HAVE FERRY, the second of two MiG-17F Frescos loaned to the United States by Israel in 1969.File:Mig21-usaf.jpg|thumb|HAVE DOUGHNUT, (MiG-21F-13) flown by States Navy and Force Systems Command during its 1968 exploitation.During the War, one of the missions carried out by the United States was the test and evaluation of captured Soviet fighter aircraft.(   Beginning in the late 1960s, and for several decades, Area 51 played host to an assortment of Soviet-built aircraft. Under the HAVE DOUGHNUT, HAVE DRILL and HAVE FERRY programs, the first MiGs flown in the States, were used to evaluate the aircraft in performance and technical capabilities, as well as in operational capability, pitting the types against U.S. fighters.(Steve Davies: Red Eagles. Americas Secret MiGs, Osprey Publishing, 2008)This was not a new mission, as testing of foreign technology by the USAF began during War II.  After the war, testing of acquired foreign technology was performed by the Air Technical Intelligence Center (ATIC, which became very influential during the Korean War), under the direct command of the Air Materiel Control Department.   In 1961 ATIC became the Foreign Technology Division (FTD), and was reassigned to Force Systems Command. ATIC personnel were sent anywhere where foreign aircraft could be found. The focus of Force Systems Command limited the use of the fighter as a tool with which to train the line tactical fighter pilots.( Air Force Systems Command recruited its pilots from the Force Flight Test Center at Air Force Base, California, who were usually graduates from various test pilot schools. Air Command selected its pilots primarily from the ranks of the Weapons School graduates.(In August 1966, Air Force fighter pilot Captain Redfa defected, flying his MiG-21 to Israel after being ordered to attack Iraqi Kurd villages with napalm. His aircraft was transferred to Nevada within a month.  In 1968 the US Air Force and Navy jointly formed a project known as Have Donut in which Air Force Systems Command, Tactical Air Command, and the U.S. Navys Air Test and Evaluation Squadron Four (VX-4) flew this acquired Soviet made aircraft in simulated air combat training.((  Because U.S. possession of the MiG-21 was, itself, secret, it was tested at Groom Lake. A joint air force-navy team was assembled for a series of dogfight tests.(Comparisons between the F-4 and the MiG-21 indicated that, on the surface, they were evenly matched.  But air combat was not just about technology. In the final analysis, it was the skill of the man in the cockpit. The Have Doughnut tests showed this most strongly.  When the Navy or Air Force pilots flew the MiG-21, the results were a draw; the F-4 would win some fights, the MiG-21 would win others. There were no clear advantages. The problem was not with the planes, but with the pilots flying them. The pilots would not fly either plane to its limits.  One of the Navy pilots was Marland W. Doc Townsend, then commander of VF-121, the F-4 training squadron at NAS Miramar. He was an engineer and a Korean War veteran and had flown almost every navy aircraft. When he flew against the MiG-21, he would outmaneuver it everytime. The Air Force pilots would not go vertical in the MiG-21. The Have Doughnut project officer was Tom Cassidy, a pilot with VX-4, the Navys Air Development Squadron at Point Mugu.   He had been watching as Townsend waxed the air force MiG 21 pilots. Cassidyclimbed into the MiG 21 and went up against Townsends F-4. This time the result was far different. Cassidy was willing to fight in the vertical, flying the plane to the point where it was buffeting, just above the stall. Cassidy was able to get on the F-4s tail. After the flight, they realized the MiG-21 turned better than the F-4 at lower speeds. The key was for the F-4 to keep its speed up.  What had happened in the sky above Groom Lake was remarkable. An F-4 had defeated the MiG 21; the weakness of the Soviet plane had been found. Further test flights confirmed what was learned.  It was also clear that the MiG-21 was a formidable enemy. United States pilots would have to fly much better than they had been to beat it. This would require aspecial school to teach advanced air combat techniques.(On August 12, 1968, two Syrian air force lieutenants, Walid Adham and Radfan Rifai, took off in a pair of MiG-17Fs on a training mission. They lost their way and, believing they were over Lebanon, landed at the Beset Landing Field in northern Israel. (One version has it that they were led astray by an Arabic-speaking Israeli).(  In 1968 these ex-Iraqi MiG-17s were transferred from Israeli stocks were added to the operation. These aircraft were given USAF designations and fake serial numbers so that they may be identified in DOD standard flight logs. As in the earlier program, a small group of Air Force and Navy pilots conducted mock dogfights with the MiG-17s. Selected instructors from the Navys Top Gun school at Miramar, California, were chosen to fly against the MiGs for familiarization purposes.(  Very soon, the MiG-17s shortcomings became clear. It had an extremely simple, even crude, control system which lacked the power-boosted controls of American aircraft.  The F-4s twin engines were so powerful it could accelerate out of range of the MiG-17s guns in thirty seconds. It was important for the F-4 to keep its distance from the MiG 17. As long as the F-4 was one and a half miles fromthe MiG-17, it was outside the reach of the Soviet fighters guns, but the MiG was within reach of the F-4s missiles.(The data from the Have Doughnut and Have Drill tests were provided to the newly formed Top Gun school at NASA Miramar.  By 1970, the Have Drill program was expanded; a few selected fleet F-4crews were given the chance to fight the MiGs.  The most important result of Project Have Drill is that no Navy pilot who flew in the project defeated the 17 Fresco in the first engagement  The Have Drill dogfights were by invitation only. The other pilots based at Nellis Air Force Base were not to know about the U.S.-operated MiGs.  To prevent any sightings, the airspace above the Groom Lake range was closed. On aeronautical maps, the exercise area was marked in red ink. The forbidden zone became known as Red Square.(During the remainder of the Vietnam War, the Navy kill ratio climbed to 8.33 to 1. In contrast, the Air Force rate improved only slightly to 2.83 to 1. The reason for this difference was Top Gun. The navy had revitalized its air combat training, while the Air Force had stayed stagnant. Most of the Navy MiG kills were by Top Gun graduates,In May 1973, Project Have Idea was formed which took over from the older Have Donut, Have Ferry and Have Drill projects and the project was transferred to the Test Range Airport. At Tonopah testing of foreign technology aircraft continued and expanded throughout the 1970s and 1980s.(Area 51 also hosted another foreign materiel evaluation program called HAVE GLIB. This involved testing Soviet tracking and missile control radar systems. A complex of actual and replica Soviet-type threat systems began to grow around Slater Lake, a mile northwest of the main base, along with an acquired Soviet Barlock search radar placed at Air Force Station. They were arranged to simulate a Soviet-style air defense complex.( The Air Force began funding improvements to Area 51 in 1977 under project SCORE EVENT.  In 1979, the CIA transferred jurisdiction of the Area 51 site to the Air Force Flight Test Center at Edwards AFB, California.  Mr. Sam Mitchell, the last CIA commander of Area 51, relinquished command to USAF Lt. Col. Larry D. McClain.(Have Blue/F-117 programThe Have Blue prototype stealth fighter (a smaller proof-of-concept model of the Nighthawk) first flew at Groom in December 1977.(Rich, pp. 5660) In 1978, the Air Force awarded a full-scale development contract for the F-117 to Lockheed Corporations Advanced Development Projects.  On 17 January 1981 the Lockheed test team at Area 51 accepted delivery of the first full Scale Development (FSD) prototype #79-780, designated YF-117A.(   At 6:05 AM on June 18, 1981 Lockheed Skunk Works test pilot Hal Farley lifted the nose of YF-117A #79-780 off the runway of Area 51.(37th TFW History and Lineage of the F-117 Stealth Fighter Organizations)  Meanwhile, Air Command (TAC) decided to set up a group-level organization to guide the F-117A to an initial operating capability. That organization became the 4450th Tactical Group (Initially designated A Unit), which officially activated on 15 October 1979 at AFB, Nevada, although the group was physically located at Area 51.   The 4450th TG also operated the A-7D Corsair II as a surrogate trainer for the F-l17A, and these operations continued until 15 October 1982 under the guise of an avionics test mission.(Flying squadrons of the 4450th TG were the 4450th Tactical Squadron (Initially designated I Unit) activated on 11 June 1981, and 4451st Tactical Squadron (Initially designated P Unit) on 15 January 1983.  The 4450th TS, stationed at Area 51, was the first F-111A squadron, while the 4451st TS was stationed at Nellis AFB and was equipped with  Corsair IIs painted in a dark motif, tail coded LV.  Lockheed test pilots put the YF-117 through its early paces.   A-7Ds was used for pilot training before any F-117As had been delivered by Lockheed to Area 51, later the A-7Ds were used for F-117A chase testing and other weapon tests at the Nellis Range.15 October 1982 is important to the program because on that date Major Alton C. Whitley, Jr. became the first USAF 4450th TG pilot to fly the F-117A.(Although ideal for testing, Area 51 was not a suitable location for an operational group, so a new covert base had to be established for F-117 operations.(Area 51)Test Range Airport was selected for operations of the first USAF F-117 unit, the Tactical Group (TG).(4450th Tactical Group)   From October 1979, the Tonopah Airport base was reconstructed and expanded. The 6,000 ft runway was lengthened to 10,000 ft. Taxiways, a concrete apron, a large maintenance hanger, and a propane storage tank were added.(Tonopah Test Range Airport) By early 1982, four more YF-117A airplanes were operating out of the southern end of the base, known as the Southend or Baja Groom Lake. After finding a large scorpion in their offices, the testing team (Designated R Unit) adopted it as their mascot and dubbed themselves the Baja Scorpions. (  Testing of a series of ultra-secret prototypes continued at Area 51 until mid-1981, when testing transitioned to the initial production of F-117 stealth fighters.  The F-117s were moved to and from Area 51 by C-5 under the cloak of darkness, in order to maintain program security. This meant that the aircraft had to be defueled, disassembled, cradled, and then loaded aboard the C-5 at night, flown to Lockheed, and unloaded at night before the real work could begin. Of course, this meant that the reverse actions had to occur at the end of the depot work before the aircraft could be reassembled, flight-tested, and redelivered, again under the cover of darkness. In addition to flight-testing, Groom performed radar profiling, F-117 weapons testing, and was the location for training of the first group of frontline USAF F-117 pilots.Production FSD airframes from Lockheed were shipped to Area 51 for acceptance testing. As the Baja Scorpions tested the aircraft with functional check flights and L.O. verification, the operational airplanes were then transferred to the 4450th TG.((Baja Scorpions)On 17 May 1982, the move of the 4450th TG from Groom Lake to Tonoaph was initiated, with the final components of the move completed in early 1983. Production FSD airframes from Lockheed were shipped to Area 51 for acceptance testing. As the Baja Scorpions tested the aircraft with functional check flights and L.O. verification, the operational airplanes were then transferred to the 4450th TG at Tonopah.((The R-Unit was inactivated on 30 May 1989.  Upon deactivated the unit was reformed as reformed as Detachment 1, Fighter Weapons Wing (FWW).  In 1990 the last F-117A (#843) was delivered from Lockheed.  After completion of acceptance flights at Area 51 of this last new F-117A aircraft, the flight test squadron continued flight test duties of refurbished aircraft after modifications by Lockheed.  In February/March 1992 the test unit moved from Area 51 to the USAF Palmdale 42 and was integrated with the Force Systems Command 6510th Test Squadron.  Some testing, especially RCS verification and other classified activity was still conducted at Area  51 throughout the operational lifetime of the F-117.  The recently inactivated (2008) Flight Test Squadron traces its roots, if not its formal lineage to the 4450th TG R-unit.(Later operationsSince the F-117 became operational in 1983, operations at Groom Lake have continued. The base and its associated runway system were expanded.(Pike, John. Area 51 Facility Overview, of American Scientists.)(Motta, Mary (23 April 2000). Images of Top-Secret U.S. Air Base Show Growth, space.com: the photos ... show that the area has significantly expanded since the first images were snapped of the infamous site over 30 years ago.) In 1995, the federal government expanded the exclusionary area around the base to include nearby mountains that had hitherto afforded the only decent overlook of the base, prohibiting access to  of land formerly administered by the of Land Management.(United States military aircraft likely have been flown against Soviet-type radar systems and the Dynamic Coherent Measurement System (DYCOMS). The airborne RCS range likely has been used to measure the L.O. characteristics of all known  stealth aircraft from the F-117A to the Spirit and Raptor.(  Ongoing projects at Area 51 may include stealth aircraft development, weapons development, unmanned aerial vehicles, and avionics testing.  Workers toil in relative isolation and inhospitable conditions at the site to prove revolutionary technologies and enhance the readiness of todays warfighter and support national requirements.(  Commuter service is provided along Groom Lake Road by a bus, catering to a small number of employees living in several small communities beyond the NTS boundary (although it is not clear whether these workers are employed at Groom or at other facilities in the NTS). The bus travels Groom Lake Road and stops at Crystal Springs, Ash Springs, and Alamo, and parks at the Alamo courthouse overnight.Geographyarea51 map en.png|thumb|left|Map showing Area 51, NAFR, and the NTS  Area 51 shares a border with the Flat region of the Test Site (NTS), the location of 739 of the 928 nuclear tests conducted by the States Department of Energy at NTS.()(NTS map showing the different areas overlaid on topographic map. State of Nevada  Division of environmental protection)(Annotated NTS map at the of American Scientists website) The Mountain nuclear waste repository is   southwest of Groom Lake.The original rectangular base of  is now part of the so-called Groom box, a rectangular area measuring , of restricted airspace. The area is connected to the internal NTS road network, with paved roads leading south to Mercury and west to Yucca Flat. Leading northeast from the lake, the wide and well-maintained Groom Lake Road runs through a pass in the Jumbled Hills. The road formerly led to mines in the Groom basin, but has been improved since their closure. Its winding course runs past a security checkpoint, but the restricted area around the base extends further east. After leaving the restricted area, Groom Lake Road descends eastward to the floor of the Tikaboo Valley, passing the dirt-road entrances to several small ranches, before converging with State Route 375, the Extraterrestrial Highway,() south of Rachel.Environmental lawsuitFile:Area51 Tikaboo Peak 07.2008.jpg|thumb|Area 51 viewed from distant PeakIn 1994, five unnamed civilian contractors and the widows of contractors Walter Kasza and Robert Frost sued the USAF and the States Environmental Protection Agency. Their suit, in which they were represented by Washington University law professor Turley, alleged they had been present when large quantities of unknown chemicals had been burned in open pits and trenches at Groom. Biopsies taken from the complainants were analyzed by University biochemists, who found high levels of dioxin, dibenzofuran, and trichloroethylene in their body fat. The complainants alleged they had sustained skin, liver, and respiratory injuries due to their work at Groom, and that this had contributed to the deaths of Frost and Kasza. The suit sought compensation for the injuries they had sustained, claiming the USAF had illegally handled toxic materials, and that the EPA had failed in its duty to enforce the Conservation and Recovery Act (which governs handling of dangerous materials.) They also sought detailed information about the chemicals to which they were allegedly exposed, hoping this would facilitate the medical treatment of survivors. Congressman H. Hamilton, former chairman of the HouseIntelligence Committee, told Minutes reporter Stahl, The Air Force is classifying all information about Area 51 in order to protect themselves from a lawsuit.(Area 51 / Catch 22 segment, 60 Minutes broadcast 17 March 1996.)Citing the Secrets Privilege, the government petitioned trial judge U.S. District Judge Philip Pro (of the States District Court for the District of Nevada in Las Vegas) to disallow disclosure of classified documents or examination of secret witnesses, alleging this would expose classified information and threaten national security.(Rogers, Keith (4 June 2002). Federal judges to hear case involving Area 51, Las Vegas Review-Journal.) When Judge Pro rejected the governments argument, President Bill Clinton issued a Determination, exempting what it called, The Air Forces Operating Location Near Groom Lake, Nevada from environmental disclosure laws. Consequently, Pro dismissed the suit due to lack of evidence. Turley appealed to the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit, on the grounds that the government was abusing its power to classify material. Secretary of the Air Force E. Widnall filed a brief that stated that disclosures of the materials present in the air and water near Groom can reveal military operational capabilities or the nature and scope of classified operations. The Ninth Circuit rejected Turleys appeal,(US 9th Circuit ruling on Kasza V Browner and related case Frost V Perry, Lake, Widnall) and the U.S. Supreme Court refused to hear it, putting an end to the complainants case.The President continues to annually issue a determination continuing the Groom exception.()()() This, and similarly tacit wording used in other government communications, is the only formal recognition the U.S. Government has ever given that Groom Lake is more than simply another part of the Nellis complex.An unclassified memo on the safe handling of Nighthawk material was posted on an Air Force website in 2005. This discussed the same materials for which the complainants had requested information (information the government had claimed was classified). The memo was removed shortly after journalists became aware of it.(Rogers, Keith (21 May 2006). Warnings for emergency responders kept from Area 51 workers, Las Vegas Review-Journal.)1974 Skylab photographyFile:Groom Lake and Papoose Lake.jpg|thumb|Lake and Lake (lower right)In January 2006, space historian A. Day published an article in online aerospace magazine Space Review titled Astronauts and Area 51: the Skylab Incident. The article was based on a memo written in 1974 to CIA director Colby by an unknown CIA official. The memo reported that astronauts on board 4 had, as part of a larger program, inadvertently photographed a location of which the memo said:Although the name of the location was obscured, the context led Day to believe that the subject was Groom Lake. As Day noted:In other words, the CIA considered no other spot on Earth to be as sensitive as Groom Lake.()()The memo details debate between federal agencies regarding whether the images should be classified, with Department of Defense agencies arguing that it should, and NASA and the State Department arguing against classification. The memo itself questions the legality of unclassified images to be retroactively classified.Remarks on the memo,() handwritten apparently by DCI (of Central Intelligence) Colby himself, read:The declassified documents do not disclose the outcome of discussions regarding the Skylab imagery. The behind-the-scenes debate proved moot as the photograph appeared in the federal governments archive of satellite imagery along with the remaining Skylab 4 photographs, with no record of anyone noticing until Day identified it in 2007.()UFO and other conspiracy theories concerning Area 51Its secretive nature and undoubted connection to classified aircraft research, together with reports of unusual phenomena, have led Area 51 to become a focus of modern UFO and conspiracy theories. Some of the activities mentioned in such theories at Area 51 include:* The storage, examination, and engineering of crashed alien spacecraft (including material supposedly recovered at Roswell), the study of their occupants (living and dead), and the manufacture of aircraft based on alien technology.* Meetings or joint undertakings with extraterrestrials.* The development of exotic weapons for the Defense Initiative (SDI) or other weapons programs.* The development of means of control.* The development of travel and teleportation technology.* The development of unusual and exotic propulsion systems related to the Aurora Program.* Activities related to a supposed shadowy one world government or the 12 organization.Many of the hypotheses concern underground facilities at Groom or at Lake,  south, and include claims of a transcontinental underground railroad system, a disappearing airstrip (nicknamed the Cheshire Airstrip, after Carrolls cat) which briefly appears when water is sprayed onto its camouflaged asphalt,() and engineering based on alien technology. Publicly available satellite imagery, however, reveals clearly visible landing strips at Groom Dry Lake, but not at Papoose Lake.Veterans of experimental projects such as OXCART and NERVA at Area 51 agree that their work (including 2,850 OXCART test flights alone) inadvertently prompted many of the UFO sightings and other rumors:(They believe that the rumors helped maintain secrecy over Area 51s actual operations.( While the veterans deny the existence of a vast underground railroad system, many of Area 51s operations did (and presumably still do) occur underground.(Several people have claimed knowledge of events supporting Area 51 conspiracy theories. These have included Lazar, who claimed in 1989 that he had worked at Area 51s S-4 (a facility at Papoose Lake), where he was contracted to work with alien spacecraft that the U.S. government had in its possession.() Similarly, the 1996 documentary Dreamland directed by Burgess included an interview with a 71 year old mechanical engineer who claimed to be a former employee at Area 51 during the 1950s. His claims included that he had worked on a flying disc simulator which had been based on a disc originating from a crashed extraterrestrial craft and was used to train US Pilots. He also claimed to have worked with an extraterrestrial being named J-Rod and described as a telepathic translator.(Dreamland, Transmedia and Dandelion Production for Sky Television (1996).) In 2004, Dan Burisch (pseudonym of Dan Crain) claimed to have worked on cloning alien viruses at Area 51, also alongside the alien named J-Rod. Burischs scholarly credentials are the subject of much debate, as he was apparently working as a Las Vegas parole officer in 1989 while also earning a PhD at SUNY.()Portrayal in media and popular cultureNovels, films, television programs, and other fictional portrayals of Area 51 describe itor a fictional counterpartas a haven for extraterrestrials, time travel, and sinister conspiracies, often linking it with the UFO incident. In the 1996 action film Independence Day, the United States military uses alien technology captured at Roswell to attack the invading alien fleet from Area 51. The Hangar 51() government warehouse of the Indiana Jones films stores, among other exotic items, the of the Covenant and an alien corpse from Roswell. The television series Seven Days takes place inside Area 51, with the base containing a covert NSA travel operation using alien technology recovered from Roswell. The 2005 video game Area 51 is set in the base, and mentions the Roswell and moon landing hoax conspiracy theories. See also* Proving Ground, a restricted facility in the Utah desert.* Range, a mountain range north of the lakebed.* Yar, a Russian rocket launch and development site.* Prohibited Area, a defense and aerospace testing area in Australia.References;General* Rich, Ben R.; Janos, Leo (1994). Skunk Works: A personal memoir of my years at Lockheed. Boston: Little, Brown. ISBN 978-0-316-74300-6* Darlington, David (1998). Area 51: The Dreamland Chronicles. New York: Henry Holt. ISBN 978-0-8050-6040-9* Patton, Phil (1998). Dreamland: Travels Inside the Secret World of Roswell and Area 51. New York: Villard / Random House ISBN 978-0-375-75385-5* Area 51 resources at the of American Scientists.* Stahl Area 51 / Catch 22 Minutes Television 17 March 1996, a US TV news magazines segment about the environmental lawsuit.(Transcript)* Area 51 related article archive from the pages of the Vegas Review-Journal* Jacobsen, Annie (2011). Area 51. New York, Little, Brown and Company.  ISBN 978-0-316-13294-7 (hc) ;SpecificExternal links;General* Dreamland Resort  Detailed history of Area 51* Roadrunners Internationale, a project covering the history of the U2 and Blackbird projects* How Area 51 Works, on HowStuffWorks;Maps and photographs* Dreamland Resorts map of Area 51 buildings* Topographic Map of the Emigrant Valley / Groom area* Aerial photos from different decades, overlaid with Google Maps interface* Photographs of McCarran EG&G terminal and JANET aircraft* Official FAA aeronautical chart of Groom Lake* Historical pictures of Groom Lake, Groom Lake Mining District, Department of Special Collections, Digital Image Collections, of Nevada, Reno,  accessed 30 January 2009515151515151515151eremua51ko:51515151515151kk:51-zonakrzet5151ja:51515151515151515151515151515151Blge51zh:51
2377
Andhra_Pradesh
 footnotes               Andhra Pradesh ( ), is one of the 28 states of India, situated on the southeastern coast of India. It is Indias fourth largest state by area and fifth largest by population. Its capital and largest city by population is Hyderabad.The total GDP of Andhra Pradesh is $100 billion and is ranked third among all states in India() .The State has the second-longest coastline of  among all the States in India.()  The primary official language of Andhra Pradesh is Telugu and Urdu is the secondary official language in some places,() while other languages spoken in Andhra Pradesh are Hindi, Marathi, Tamil, Kannada, Oriya. 10281 persons declare English as their first language in Andhra Pradesh according to the 2001 census.(English Demography)Andhra Pradesh lies between 1241 and 22N latitude and 77 and 8440E longitude, and is bordered by Maharashtra, Chhattisgarh and Orissa in the north, the of Bengal in the East, Nadu to the south and Karnataka to the west.  Andhra Pradesh is historically called the Rice Bowl of India.  More than 77% of its crop is rice; Andhra Pradesh produced 17,796,000 tonnes of rice in 2006.( )  Two major rivers, the Godavari and the Krishna, run across the state.  The small enclave () of Yanam, a district of Puducherry, lies in the Godavari Delta in the northeast of the state.On 1 November 1956, the Reorganization Act formed Andhra Pradesh by merging Telugu-speaking areas of State(Telangana) and the already existing Andhra State .()Early HistoryFile:Ramappa temple stone carved Lord Ganapathi Relief near palampet of Warangal dist Andhra Pradesh.jpg|thumb|150px|left|Ramappa temple stone carved Lord Ganapathi Relief near palampet of Warangal dist Andhra PradeshImage:Kondavid6.jpg|thumb|left|120px|KondaveeduFile:Kakateeya Sculpture.jpg|thumb|120px|left|Kakatiya sculpture at WarangalFile:A pillar at Ahobilam temple in Kurnool District of Andhra Pradesh.jpg|thumb|100px|right|A pillar at Ahobilam temple in District of Andhra PradeshFile:Rock-cut Lord --Buddha-- Statue at Bojjanakonda near Anakapalle of Visakhapatnam dist in AP.jpg|thumb|120px|Rock-cut Lord --Buddha-- Statue at Bojjanakonda near Anakapalle, VisakhapatnamHistorical evidences reveal that Non-Aryans like Kirata (Andhra Charitamu, part 1, Author: Chilukuri Veerabhadra Rao, Ananda Print house, Chennai, 1910) tribes lived in dense forests of South India before Aryans can enter India through Sindhu river coast, about 4000 B.C. Rigveda reveals that these Non Aryans have built their towns and dynasties and fought against Aryans. Aryans hated Non Aryans for their strange traditions. The black color complexion, ugly look, rude behavior of Non Aryans, and their un-understandable language made Aryans to mention them as Asuras  who are not having a language and deity in their scriptures. Non Aryans could not digest Aryans who grabbed their lands and exercising authority. As a result, battles happened between them; nevertheless Non Aryans could not win against invincible and witty Aryans. Unable to face the fierceness of Aryans, Non Aryans used to hide in caves during the day and used to grab food grains, destroy routes and fire rituals, and abduct Aryan women at night times. To protect their Women, Males of Aryans insisted their women not to move out of habitations. Centuries passed by Aryans got mixed with Non Aryans and it resulted in formation of new cultured social groups.  These evidences say that the people of Andhra are a breed of Aryans and Non-Aryans. An Andhra tribe was mentioned in the epics such as Brahmana (800 BCE) and Mahabharata (400 BCE).() The Shastra written by Bharatha (1st century BCE) also mentions the Andhra people.() The roots of the language have been seen on inscriptions found near the Guntur district() and from others dating to the rule of Renati Cholas in the 5th century CE.(Indian Epigraphy, R. Saloman, University Press, 1998,ISBN 0-19-509984-2, p. 106)Megasthenes, a Greek traveller and geographer who visited the Court of Maurya (322297 BCE), mentioned that the region had three fortified towns and an army of 100,000 infantry, 200 cavalry, and 1,000 elephants. Buddhist books reveal that Andhras established their huts or tents near the River at that time.(Pliny the Elder, The Natural History)Inscriptional evidence shows that there was an early kingdom in Andhra (Guntur District) ruled first by Kuberaka and then by his son Varun, with Pratipalapura (Bhattiprolu) as the capital. Around the same time, Dhanyakatakam/Dharanikota (present day Amaravati) appears to have been an important place, which was visited by Buddha. According to the ancient Tibetan scholar Taranatha: On the full moon of the month Chaitra in the year following his enlightenment, at the great stupa of Dhanyakataka, the Buddha emanated the mandala of The Glorious Lunar Mansions (Kalachakra).(Helmutt Hoffmann, Buddhas Preaching of the Kalachakra Tantra at the Stupa of Dhanyakataka, German Scholars on India, Vol. I. PP. 136140. (Varanasi, 1973))()Literary evidence shows that long before Satavahanas, a legendary king named Vi?h?u ruled in and around the Diviseema region of Andhra Pradesh. After his reign, people came to believe that he had an amsa of the divine savior Lord Maha Vishnu himself. Perhaps in his honor, people dedicated a new temple now located at Srikaku?am, District. The lord of the temple is known as Andhra Vi?h?u or Srikaku?andhra Vi?h?u. The Mauryans extended their rule over Andhra in the 4th century BC. With the fall of the Maurya Empire in the 3rd century BC, the Satavahanas became independent. After the decline of the Satavahanas in 220 CE, the dynasty, Pallavas, Gotrikas, Rashtrakutas, Vishnukundinas, Chalukyas, and Cholas ruled the land.(G. Durga Prasad, History of the Andhras up to 1565 A. D., P.G. Publishers, Guntur, p. 116)During this period, Telugu emerged as a popular language, supplanting Prakrit and Sanskrit.(Epigraphica Indica, 27: 220228) Telugu was made the official language by the Vishnukundina kings (5th and 6th centuries), who ruled from their capital city of Vengi. Eastern Chalukyas ruled for a long period after the decline of Vishnukundinas; their capital was also Vengi. As early as the 1st century CE, Chalukyas were mentioned as being vassals and chieftains under the Satavahanas and later under the Ikshvakus. The Chalukya ruler Narendra ruled Rajahmundry around 1022 CE.()The battle of Palnadu (1182) resulted in the weakening of the Eastern Chalukya dynasty and led to the emergence of the dynasty in the 12th and 13th centuries CE. The Kakatiyas were at first vassals of the Rashtrakutas, and ruled over a small territory near Warangal. Eventually all the Telugu lands were united by the Kakatiyas. In 1323 CE, Delhi Sultan al-Din Tughluq sent a large army under Ulugh Khan to conquer the Telugu country and captured Warangal. King Prataparudra was taken prisoner. Nayaks recaptured Warangal from the Delhi Sultanate in 1326 CE and ruled for fifty years. Inspired by their success, the Empire, one of the greatest empires in the history of Andhra Pradesh and India, was founded by Harihara and Bukka, who served as treasury officers of the Kakatiyas of Warangal.(Robert Sewell, A Forgotten Empire (Vijayanagar): A contribution to the history of India, Chapter 2 Gutenberg.org) In 1347 CE, an independent Muslim state, the Sultanate, was established in India by Bahman Shah in a revolt against the Delhi Sultanate. The Shahi dynasty held sway over the Andhra country for about two hundred years from the early part of the 16th century to the end of the 17th century.() Although Hyderabad was founded less than 500 years ago, archaeologists have unearthed Iron Age sites near the city that could date back to 500 BC. Approximately over 1000 years ago this region was ruled by Kakatiyas until 1310 AD, and fell under Delhi sultanate from (13101345), when the central sultanate became weak the Bahmani Sultan revolted against the Sultan of Delhi Muhammad bin Tughluq and established an independent state in Deccan within the Delhi Sultanates southern provinces and ruled until 1518 AD. Quli Qutb-ul-Mulk, governor of golconda, declared Independence from Bahmani Dynasty, and announced himself a sultan of golconda in the year 1518 AD, and founded the Qutb Shahi dynasty.()Muhammad Quli Qutb Shah, a fifth Sultan of the Qutb Shahi dynasty (the ruling family of the Golconda Sultanate, previously a feudatory of Bahmani sultanate that declared independence in 1512) founded the city of Hyderabad on the banks of the Musi River in 159120 to relieve a water shortage the dynasty had experienced at its old headquarters at Golconda city(11 kilometers west of Hyderabad city on the other side of Musi). He also ordered the construction of the Charminar. The Mughal emperor Aurangzeb captured kingdom of Golconda including the city of Hyderabad in 1687 and, during this short Mughal rule, Mughal-appointed governors of the city soon gained autonomy.(http://www.ourmch.com/hyd/hydhistory.asp)In 1724, Asaf Jah I, who was granted the title Nizam-ul-Mulk (Governor of the country) by the Mughal emperor, defeated a rival official to establish control over kingdom of Golconda renamed it as Hyderabad state. Thus began the Asaf Jahi dynasty that ruled Hyderabad State until a year after Indias independence from Britain. Asaf Jahs successors ruled as the Nizams of Hyderabad. The rule of the seven Nizams saw the growth of Hyderabad city both culturally and economically. Hyderabad city became the formal capital of the kingdom (Hyderabad state) and Golkonda city was almost abandoned. Huge reservoirs, like the Nizam Sagar, Tungabhadra, Osman Sagar, and Himayat Sagar, were built. Survey work on Nagarjuna Sagar had also begun during this time; the actual work was completed by the Government of India in 1969. The wealth and grandeur of the Nizams is demonstrated by the fabled Jewels of The Nizams, which is a tourist attraction. The state was the richest and the largest among the princely states of India. The land area of the state was 90,543 mi; its population in 1901 was 50,073,759. It enjoyed an estimated revenue of 90,029,000.(nameGolcondathroughtime)(nameTheNocturnalCourt)File:Charminar in hyderabad AP.jpg|thumb|150px|left|Charminar at HyderabadEarly modern   APImage:vizagcity.jpg|thumbnail|right|Vizag skylineIn India, Circars became part of the British Presidency. Eventually this region emerged as the Andhra region. Later the Nizam rulers of Hyderabad ceded five territories to the British which eventually emerged as Rayalaseema region. The Nizams retained control of the interior provinces as the state of Hyderabad, acknowledging British rule in return for local autonomy. However, Bheem, a tribal leader, started his fight against the erstwhile Jahi Dynasty for the liberation of State.() Meanwhile, the French occupied Yanam, in the Godavari delta, and (save for periods of British control) would hold it until 1954.India became independent from the United Kingdom in 1947. The Nizam wanted to retain the independence of the Princely Hyderabad State from India, but the people of the region launched a movement to join the Indian Union. The state of Hyderabad was forcibly joined to the Republic of India with Polo in 1948.()In an effort to gain an independent state  based on the linguistic and protect the interests of the Andhra (Telugu-speaking) people of State, Sreeramulu fasted until death in 1952. After his death, Andhra attained statehood on 1 November 1953, with Kurnool as its capital.()On 1 November 1956, the Reorganization Act merged the Telugu-speaking areas of the former Hyderabad state with the Telugu-speaking areas of the former Madras state to form the state of Vishalandhra, which is named as Andhra Pradesh. The city of Hyderabad, the former capital of the Hyderabad State, was made the capital of the new state. There were several movements to disintegrate Andhra Pradesh into two states viz. Andhra and Telengana in the late 1960 which are continuing till date.On 9 December 2009, it was announced that a separation proposal for Telangana would be introduced to the state assembly.() Controversy arose as to the future status of Hyderabad City, part of one of the ten districts of Telangana region.() This move was opposed by protesters from Kosta and Rayalaseema regions. On 23 December 2009, the government decided to put the decision of bifurcating the state on hold until a consensus is achieved among the different political parties.This agitated supporters of a separate Telangana state.() On 5 January 2010, the Central Government represented by Home Minister P Chidambaram conducted a meeting by inviting all the recognised political parties of AP and recorded their stand on the issue. The Government of India appointed a committee, headed by N. Srikrishna, to guide the central government to settle the issue of Telangana amicably.() The committee submitted its report on 30 December 2010, a day before its term was to expire.()Geography and climateImage:Godavari satellite view.jpg|left|x150px|thumb|The Mouth of the River (East) emptying into the Bay of BengalFile:Greater Flamingoes (Phoenicopterus roseus) taking off W2 IMG 9855.jpg|thumb|200px|Flamingoes (Phoenicopterus roseus) taking off Pocharam lakeFile:Vizag Seaport aerial view.jpg|150px|thumbnail|right|Aerial view of Visakhapatnam portGeographically, Andhra Pradesh is composed of most of the eastern half of the plateau and the plains to the east of the Ghats. Andhra Pradesh is divided into three regions. The northern part of the plateau is the Telangana region and the southern part is known as Rayalaseema. These two regions are separated by the Krishna. The third region is Andhra.()  The plains to the east of Eastern Ghats form the coastal plains. The Eastern Ghats are discontinuous and individual sections have local names. The Kadapa Basin() formed by two arching branches of the Eastern Ghats is a mineral rich area. The coastal plains are for the most part delta regions formed by the Godavari, Krishna, and Penner rivers. The Eastern Ghats are a major dividing line in the states geography. The Ghats become more pronounced towards the south and extreme north of the coast. The Eastern Ghat region is home to dense tropical forests, while the vegetation becomes sparse as the Ghats give way to the Deccan Plateau, where shrub vegetation is more common. Most of the coastal plains are put to intense agricultural use. The west and southwest parts of Andhra Pradesh have semi-arid conditions.Space Research Organisations Dhawan Space Centre is located at the Island of Sriharikota, in Nellore district of Andhra Pradesh.File:Ethipothala Water Falls2.jpg|thumb|left|200px|FallsThe climate of Andhra Pradesh varies considerably, depending on the geographical region. Monsoons play a major role in determining the climate of the state. Summers last from March to June. In the coastal plain, the summer temperatures are generally higher than the rest of the state, with temperature ranging between 20 C and 41 C.()July to September is the seasons for tropical rains in Andhra Pradesh. The state receives heavy rainfall from Southwest Monsoon during these months. About one third of the total rainfall in Andhra Pradesh is brought by the Northeast Monsoon. October and November see low-pressure systems and tropical cyclones form in the Bay of Bengal which, along with the Northeast Monsoon, bring rains to the southern and coastal regions of the state. November, December, January, and February are the winter months in Andhra Pradesh. Since the state has a long coastal belt the winters are not very cold. The range of winter temperature is generally 12 C to 30 C.(Hyderabad is the capital and, along with the adjoining twin city Secunderabad, is the largest city in the state.Visakhapatnam, Andhra Pradeshs main seaport, is the second largest city and is home to the Navys Eastern Naval Command.  Due to its location and proximity to major rail and road routes, Vijayawada is a major trading center and is the third largest city of the state, followed by Tirupati, Warangal, Rajahmundry, Kakinada and Guntur. Other important places of the state are Nellore, Srikakulam, Kurnool, and Kadapa.Demographicsstate color4  BrownTelugu is the official language of the state, spoken by 83% of the population. Major linguistic minority groups include Urdu (8.63%), Hindi (3.23%),  and Tamil (1.01%).Other languages spoken in Andhra Pradesh by less than 1% each are Marathi (0.8%), Kannada(0.74%), and Oriya (0.44%). Languages spoken by less than 0.2% of the population include Malayalam (0.08%), Gujarati (0.06%), Bengali (0.05%), Gorkhali/Nepali (0.03%), Punjabi (0.01%) and Sindhi(0.01%).()The main ethnic group of Andhra Pradesh is the people, who are primarily Dravidians.Andhra Pradesh ranks tenth compared to all Indian States in the Human Development Index scores() with a score of 0.416.The National Council of Applied Economic Research district analysis in 2001 reveals that Khammam, Krishna, Godavari, Chittoor, and Medak are the five districts with the highest Development Indexscores in ascending order in rural AP. The data show that the poor make up 16.3 per cent of the total population in rural AP and expenditure on consumption is around 13.5 per cent of the total consumption expenditure. The female literacy rate is 0.66 compared to male literacy rate in rural AP. The district-wise variations for poverty ratio are high and low for the ratio of female/male literacy rate.()EconomyAndhra Pradeshs GSDP for 2010 was estimated at $100.35 billion in current prices. The state ranks third in terms of overall Gross State Product among all the states of the Indian Union.() In terms of per capita GSDP the state compares very favorably with other large states. In the 2010 list by Magazine, there are Seven from Andhra Pradesh among the top 100 richest Indians.Image:EastGodavari 1.JPG|left|thumb|180px|Coconut fields in GodavariFile:Srisailam-dam-with-gates-open-2.jpg|thumb|right|180px|Dam - Hydro Electric Power SourceAgriculture has been the chief source of income for the states economy. Andhra Pradesh is an exporter of many agricultural products. Four important rivers of India, the Godavari, Krishna, Penna, and Thungabhadra flow through the state, providing irrigation. Rice, sugarcane, cotton, pepper, mango, and tobacco are the local crops. Recently, crops used for vegetable oil production such as sunflower and peanuts have gained favour. There are many multi-state irrigation projects in development, including River Basin Irrigation Projects and Sagar Dam.()()The service sector of the state accounts for 43% of the gross state domestic product (GSDP) and employs 20% of the work force.( Andhra Pradesh economy has registered over 5.5% annual economic growth rate during the last two decades. The state is one of the most industrially developed states of India.Andhra Pradesh ranks second in India in terms of mineral wealth. The state has about one third of Indias limestone reserves, estimated at about 30 billion tonnes. The Tumalappalli Uranium mine in Andhra has confirmed 49,000 tonnes of ore and there are indications that it could hold reserves totalling three times its current size, The Times of India quoted Srikumar Banerjee as saying. The mines proven reserve is enough to support a 8,000 mega watts nuclear power plant for 40 years, the report added. The Godavari Basin has huge reserves of natural gas and petroleum. The state has a large amount of coal reserves.( The state ranks first nationwide in hydro electricity generation, with a national market share of over 11%. Andhra Pradesh has the second largest power generating utility in the country, with an installed capacity of around 10,650 MW. The two cheapest sources of thermal power generation  coal and natural gas  are in abundance.Information technology and other key sectorscity.jpg|thumb|180px|left|Cyber Towers at HyderabadIn 20042005, Andhra Pradesh was at the second position in the list of top technology exporting states of India. The IT sector is expanding at a rate of 52.3% every year. The IT exports reached  19,000 crores ($4.5 billion) in 20062007, contributed to 14 per cent of total IT exports of the nation and ranked fourth in India.(http://www.pppinindia.com/business-opportunities-andhra-pradesh.asp) Other key sectors include, Biopharmaceuticals, Power, Automobile, Tourism, Textiles, Leather, Mining and Religious tourism.Administrationpx|left|The Andhra Pradesh State Legislative Assembly at the centre of Hyderabad City.Andhra Pradesh has a Sabha (legislative assembly, lower house) of 294 seats, and a Parishad (legislative council, upper house) of 90 members. 31 members are elected from local bodies, 31 members are elected from the assembly, eight members are elected from teachers, eight members are elected from graduates, and 12 members are nominated by the Governor. In the of India Andhra Pradesh has 18 in the Sabha, the Upper House, and 42 in the Sabha, the Lower House.()()Andhra Pradesh had a series of governments headed by Indian National Congress (INC) Party until 1982. N. Chandrababu Naidu held the record for the longest serving chief minister (1995 to 2004). V. Narasimha Rao served as the chief minister of the state from 1971 to 1973, and went on to become the Prime Minister of India in 1991. The first Chief Minister of Andhra Pradesh was Sanjiva Reddy, who later served as President of India. The Congress Chief Ministers of the state are Sanjivayya, Brahmananda Reddy, V. Narasimha Rao, Vengala Rao, Chenna Reddy, Anjaiah, Venkatarami Reddy, Vijaya Bhaskara Reddy, Bhaskara Rao, Janardhana Reddy, S. Rajasekhara Reddy, Rosaiah and Kiran Kumar Reddy.File:Highcourt11.jpg|thumb|280px|Pradesh High Court at Hyderabad, the main judicial body for the StateUntil 1962, the CPI, along with socialist parties, played an important role as opposition parties. Parties namely Praja Socialist Party and Krishi Lok Party played important role in 1950s. In the 1967 state assembly elections all socialist parties were eliminated and CPI lost opposition party status. N.G. Rangas Swatantra Party became the Opposition Party. They also failed to hold control later and became defunct. In 1978  Jalagam Vengal Rao and Kasu Brahmananda Reddy formed the Reddy Congress and contested against Congress (I) but lost.In 1983 the Desam Party (TDP) won the State elections and Rama Rao (NTR) became the chief minister of the state for the first time. This broke the long time single party monopoly enjoyed by the INC from 1956 until 1982. A few months after the election, Bhaskara Rao usurped power when NTR was away in the United States for medical treatment. After coming back, NTR campaigned for a comeback by demonstrating the support of the majority of the elected MLAs. The  governor Ram Lal was ousted by Gandhi and in his place she appointed Dayal Sharma. NTR was reinstated as Chief Minister. Within a month NTR recommended the dissolution of the assembly and called for fresh elections. Gandhi was assassinated on 31 October 1984 by her Sikh bodyguard and Gandhi was made Prime Minister by President Giani Singh. In the ensuing elections for Lok Sabha and the AP Assembly, the Telugu Desam Party won in Andhra Pradesh and NTR came back to power.The 1989 elections ended the rule of NTR, with the INC party returning to power with Chenna Reddy at the helm. He was replaced by Janardhan Reddy in 1990, who was replaced by Vijaya Bhaskara Reddy in 1992. In 1994, Andhra Pradesh gave a mandate to the Telugu Desam Party again, and NTR became the chief minister again. Chandrababu Naidu, the son-in-law of NTR, usurped power with the backing of a majority of the MLAs. The Telugu Desam Party won both the assembly and Lok Sabha election in 1999 under the leadership of Chandrababu Naidu. There was an assassination attempt on Naidu in 2003 in Tirupathi; he survived the attack. In the ensuing elections the party lost power to a resurgent Congress Party and its allies. S. Rajasekhar Reddy became the Chief Minister.S. Rajasekhar Reddy became the CM again by fending off the Rajyam Party and a major alliance of TDP, TRS, CPI and CPM. He died on 2 September 2009 in a helicopter crash. Rosaiah, a senior statesman and former State Finance Minister, became the Chief Minister of AP on 3 September 2009. On 24 November 2010, Rosaiah submitted his resignation on the grounds of increased work pressure. Kiran Kumar Reddy Reddy was sworn in as the new CM on the following day.(thehindu.com)Religious TourismFile:Tirumalatemple.jpg|thumb|200px|left|Venkateswara Temple, an important pilgrimage site in TirupatiMandir Hindu templeFile:Diguva mangalagiri temple guntur dist AP.jpg|thumb|200px|right|Diguva Mangalagiri TempleFile:Kanaka Durga Temple.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Durga Temple in VijayawadaFile:Ramappa1.jpg|thumb|200px|right|TempleFile:Malluru Ugra Narasimha Swamy Temple at Mangapet of Warangal District Andhra Pradesh, India.jpg|thumb|150px|right|Malluru Ugra Narasimha Swamy Temple at Mangapet of District Andhra Pradesh, IndiaVenkateswara Temple in the town of Tirumala in Chittoor district is a very important pilgrimage site for Hindus throughout India. It is the richest piligrimage city of any religious faith in the world.() Its main temple is dedicated to the god Venkateswara, it was also a perfect example of dravidian architecture under Tamil kings.The five ancient temples of Shiva, known as Kshetras, are located at - Amararama, Draksharama, Somarama, Ksheerarama and Kumararama. The Sivalingas at these temples are made from a single Sivalinga. Simhachalam is another popular pilgrimage site of national importance located on a hill  north of the Visakhapatnam city centre. Simhachalam is said to be the abode of the savior-god Narasimha, who rescued Prahlada from his abusive father Hiranyakashipu. One of the most exquisitely sculpted shrines of Andhra Pradesh, it has a  beautifully carved 16-pillared Natya mantapa and a 96-pillared Kalyana mantapa. The temple was built in 11th century by Kullotunga chola. Engaged couples go to this temple as a ritual just before marriage. It is one of the most crowded temples of Andhra Pradesh.File:India food.jpg|thumb|right|150px|biryani served with other Indian dishesSrisailam temple in district is a very famous Shiva temple, and is one of the twelve Jyotirlinga shrines. Lord Ramahimself installed the Sahasralinga, while the Pandavas lodged the Panchapandava lingas in the temple courtyard. The Purana, an ancient religious text, has a chapter called Srisaila Kandam dedicated to this temple, which points to its ancient origin. It is said that Shankara (c. 788821 CE) visited this temple at the time that he composed his Sivananda Lahiri.   Srisailam is located in Kurnool district.Temple is a temple to Lord Rama in the town of Bhadrachalam in district. It is situated on the banks of the river Godavari. This is the place where Gopanna (16201680) wrote his devotional songs dedicated to lord Rama. It was believed that lord Rama spent some years on the banks of river Godavari here in Yuga. Gopanna raised the funds and constructed the temple during the reign of Tanisha in the 17th century. Rama Navami, a celebration of the Marriage of Lord Rama and sita, is celebrated here every year. Government of Andhra Pradesh sends pearls for the event.File:Uggani bajji .jpg|thumb|right|150px|Uggani bajji - typical snack of RayalaseemaDurga Temple is a temple to the goddess Durga situated on the Indrakeeladri Hill in the city of Vijayawada on the banks of River.  Special pujas are performed during Dasara, also called Navratri. The most significant are Saraswati puja and Theppotsavam. The festival of Dasara for the Goddess Durga is celebrated there every year. A large number of pilgrims attend the colourful celebrations and take a holy dip in the Krishna River.Other temples and piligrimage sites in Andhra Pradesh*Saraswati Temple, Basar is a temple to the goddess Saraswati, goddess of education. Basar is located in district 50 kilometers from Nirmal.*Yaganti Caves and Mahanandi are pilgrimage centres in Kurnool District.*Kailasagiri Temple Hill, in Visakhapatnam.*Mandir, in Hyderabad.*Temple, at Hayathnagar, in Hyderabad.*Balaji Temple, on the banks of Sagar Lake.*Temple, constructed in 1213, is located 77 km from Warangal.*Masjid in Hyderabad.*There is a statue of Buddha that was erected in 1992 on the Hussain Sagar Lake in Hyderabad.*Temple is an ancient Shiva temple located on the banks of river Swarnamukhi in Chittoor district.*Satyanarayana Swamy temple in Annavaram in Godavari district.*Vemulavada in Karimnagar district is another popular place of pilgrimage. It is best known for the Raja Rajeshwara temple.*Venkateswara Temple in Chinna Tirupathi(Dwaraka Tirumala) near to Tadepalligudem and Eluru.*Veerabhadra temple at Lepakshi in Ananthapur district.*Viswa Viznana Vidya Adhyatmika Peetham is a theosophical congregation based on the principles of oneness of God, and discovering divinity in the self. The ashram is situated in Pithapuram, Godavari district.CultureBapus paintings, Venkata Subba Raos Yenki Paatalu (Songs about a washerwoman called Yenki), mischievous Budugu (a character by Mullapudi), Annamayyas songs, Aavakaaya (a variant of mango pickle in which the kernel of mango is retained), Gongura (a chutney from Roselle plant), Atla Taddi (a seasonal festival predominantly for teenage girls), the banks of river Godavari, and the Dudu basavanna (the ceremonial ox decorated for door-to-door exhibition during the harvest festival Sankranthi) have long defined Telugu culture. The village of Durgi is known for stone craft, producing carvings of idols in soft stone that must be exhibited in the shade because they are prone to weathering. Kalamkari is an ancient textile art form dating back to the Valley Civilization. Andhra Pradesh is famous for doll making. Dolls are made from wood, mud, dry grass, and lightweight metal alloys. Tirupathi is famous for redwood carvings. Kondapalli is famous for mud toys with rich colors. The village of Etikoppaka, located in district, produces lacquered toys. Nirmal paintings are expressive and are usually painted over a black background. Story telling in Andhra Pradesh is an art form in itself. Folk dances unique to Andhra Pradesh include Yaksha ganam, Burra katha (usually done by three people, telling stories using three different musical instruments), Jangama kathalu, Hari kathalu, Chekka bajana, Urumula natyam (usually done at festivals, where a group of people dance in circles with loud music), and Ghata natyam (performances done with earthen pots over ones head).Andhra Pradesh has many museums,  the Jung Museum in Hyderabad, which features a varied collection of sculptures, paintings, and religious artifacts, including the Archaeological Museum() at Amaravati near Guntur City that features relics of nearby ancient sites, and the Museum, in Visakhapatnam, which displays the history of the pre-Independence and thotla konda which depicts the age old budhist stupas and cultural style, Presidency in a rehabilitated Dutch bungalow.() Victoria Jubilee Museum in Vijayawada has a good collection of ancient sculptures, paintings, idols, weapons, cutlery and inscriptions. Other ancient sites include dozens of ancient Buddhist stupas in Nagarjunakonda which is now an island in Sagar, an artificial lake that formed after the construction of Sagar Dam. The Island has a large museum that houses many Buddhist relics.(IndiaTourism.com, Victoria Jubilee Museum.)Just like in other parts of the country, many festivals are celebrated in Andhra Pradesh, which inlcude -Ugadi, Sankranthi, Dasara, Vratham,  Vinayaka Chavithi,  Deepavali, Batukamma, Rakhi poornima, Christmas, Rama Navami, Bonalu, Shivaratri, Chaviti, Holi, ul-Fitr, al-Adha, Muharram, Milad-un-Nabi etc.CuisineThe cuisine of Andhra Pradesh is one of the spiciest of all cuisines. There are many variations to the cuisine (all involving rice) depending on geographical regions, caste, and traditions. Pickles and chutneys, called thoku  also called as pachadi in Telugu, are particularly popular in Andhra Pradesh and many varieties of pickles and chutneys are unique to the State. Chutneys are made from practically every vegetable including tomatoes, brinjals (eggplant), and roselle (Gongura).Avaakaya (mango) is probably the best known of the Andhra Pradesh pickles. Rice is the food and is used in a wide variety of ways. Typically, rice is either boiled and eaten with curry, or made into a batter for use in a crepe-like dish called attu (pesarattu is made of a mixture of this batter and mung beans) or dosas, a crepe filled with black beans or lentils.Meat, vegetables and greens are prepared with different spices (masala) into a variety of strongly flavored dishes such as Hyderabadi Biryani, fish curry, brinjal curry,  and Gongura pachadi the most popular dish of andhra pradesh.An Andhra dish is recognized with the dish being listed in the menu. The coastal region is even more well versed with the varieties in sea food specially known for Chapala Pulusu, Bommidala pulusu, Koramenu kura. Especially Hyderabadi cuisine is influenced by the Muslims who arrived in Telangana in the 14th century. Much of the cuisine revolves around meat. It is rich and aromatic, with a liberal use of exotic spices and ghee (clarified butter). Lamb, chicken, and fish are the most widely used meats in the non-vegetarian dishes. Biriyani is perhaps the most distinctive and popular dish of Hyderabadi cuisine.DanceFile:Yamini Reddy kuchipudi.jpg||thumb|right|150px|Kuchipudi, dance by Yamini ReddyClassical dance in Andhra can be performed by both men and women; women tend to learn it more often. Kuchipudi is the states best-known classical dance form. The various dance forms that existed through the states history are Bonalu, Dappu,  Chenchu Bhagotham, Kuchipudi, Bhamakalapam, Burrakatha, Veeranatyam, Butta bommalu,  Tappeta Gullu, Lambadi,  Dhimsa, Kolattam, and Chindu. Jaanapadam theenmar is a popular folk dance.File:A Kuchipudi Dancer from Andhra Pradesh.JPG|thumb|left|150px|Kuchipudi DancerJayapa Senani was the first person to write about the dances prevalent in Andhra Pradesh.(TeluguPeople.com, Ntitya Ratnavali.) Both Desi and Margi forms of dances are included in his Sanskrit treatise Nrutya Ratnavali.LiteratureImage:Sets in Ramoji Film City.jpg|thumb|120px|left|A western street replica at Film CityFile:Balamuralikrishna in Kuwait.jpg|thumb|120px|left|Balamuralikrishna during a concert in Kuwait on 29 March 2006, accompanied by Mavelikkara Sathees Chandran (violin), Perunna G. Harikumar (mridangom), Manjoor Unnikrishnan (ghatam)File:Medakcathedralsideview.png|thumb|150px|right|The of South India Cathedral at MedakNannayya, Tikkana, and Yerrapragada form the trinity who translated the great Sanskrit epic Mahabharata into Telugu. Pothana is the poet who composed the classic SriMad Maha Bhagavatamu, a Telugu translation of Sri Bhagavatham, authored by Veda Vyasa in Sanskrit. Nannayya (c. 11th century AD), the earliest known Telugu author, was patronized by the king Narendra who ruled from Rajamahendravaram (now Rajahmundry). The Vijayanagara emperor Krishnadevaraya wrote Amuktamalyada. The Telugu poet Vemana, a native of Kadapa, is notable for his philosophical poems. Telugu literature after Veeresalingam (18481919) is termed modern literature. Known as Gadya Tikkana, Satyavathi Charitam was the author Telugu-language social novel, Satyavathi Charitam.  Award winners include Sri Viswanatha Satya Narayana and Dr. C. Narayana Reddy. The Andhra Pradesh native and revolutionary poet Sri Sri brought new forms of expressionism into Telugu literature.Other modern writers include Seshendra Sarma, the only person nominated from India for a Nobel prize in literature since Tagore. The West Bengal Government conferred on him the title Rashtrendu (Moon of the Nation). Telugu University awarded him an honorary Doctorate in Literature in 1994. He received the Kalidas Samman award from the Madhya Pradhesh government, and he won the Central Sahitya Akademi fellowship in 1999. Narayanacharyulu is one of the scholarly poets of Telugu literature. He wrote the books Sivatandavam and Panduranga Mahatyam. Other notable writers from Andhra Pradesh include Sreenivasarao, Jashuva, Suri, Satyanarayana.CinemaIn the early 90s the Telugu film industry, had completely shifted its base to Hyderabad from Madras. Hyderabad, houses  IMAX theatre which was the biggest 3D IMAX screen in the world when it was built in 2007.() Tollywood is among the, highest number of film producing industries in India.()thumb|right|200px|Mecca Masjid in HyderabadIt is also home to Film City which is the worlds largest integrated film studio complex at over 2,000 acres (8.1 km2) of land.() Prolific film producer from the state, Ramanaidu holds a Record for the most number of films produced by a person.(http://www.asiantribune.com/news/2010/09/11/prestigious-phalke-award-conferred-veteran-film-producer-d-rama-naidu)  Andhra Pradesh has around 3,300 cinema halls. The state produces about 200 films a year. It has around 40% (330 out of 930) of the Digital theatres in India.MusicMany composers of music like Annamacharya, Tyagaraja, Kshetrayya, Sastri and Bhadrachala Ramadasu were of Telugu descent. Modern Carnatic music composers like Ghantasala, M.S Subbalakshmi and Sri Balamuralikrishna are also of Telugu descent. The Telugu film industry hosts many music composers and playback singers such as P. Balasubrahmanyam. Folk songs are popular in the many rural areas of the state. Forms such as the katha and Poli are still performed today.()ReligionThe state is home to Hindu saints of all castes. An important figure is Saint Yogi Potuluri Virabrahmendra Swami. He was born in the Vishwabrahmin (goldsmith) caste and had Brahmin and Dalit disciples.() Fisherman Raghu was a Shudra saint.() Saint Kakkayya was a chura (sweeper) Harijan saint.barsSeveral important Hindu modern-day saints are from Andhra Pradesh. These include Nimbarka, who founded Dvaitadvaita; Meera, who runs an ashram in Madanapalle; Sathya Sai Baba, Sri Sivabala Yogi Maharaj who advocates religious unity in worship; Swami Sundara Chaitanyanandaji of the Aurobindo Mission; and Subhash Patri,  founder of the pyramid spiritual societies movement.Islam in Hyderabad, with historical patronizing by the rulers, has a strong Sufi influence, with various moments active in the last two decades. Hyderabad has also produced many renowned religious scholars of representing different Islamic sects and trends, including Abul Ala Maududi, Turab-ul-Haq Qadri, and Allamah Rasheed Turabi.(Muslims)Most Christians are Protestant belonging to major Indian Protestant denominations such as the Church of South India, the Andhra Evangelical Lutheran Church, the Samavesam of Telugu Baptist Churches and several others.SportsThe Sports Authority of Andhra Pradesh, is the governing body which looks after the infrastructure development in Cricket, hockey, Football, weightlifting, Chess, Sports, Tennis, Badminton, Tennis, Cycling etc. Sports like kho, kabaddi, chinni daandu and goli (marbles) are played mostly in coastal Andhra & Telangana areas.One of the most popular sports in Andhra  pradesh is cricket. The Cricket Association nurtures potential international players. The Hyderabad cricket team has won the Trophy twice. The Gandhi International Cricket Stadium in Hyderabad, regularly hosts international matches. The Chargers, an Indian Premier League franchise, is based in Hyderabad. Notable cricketers from Andhra Pradesh, include K. Nayudu, of Vizianagram, V. Narasimha Rao, Azharuddin, S. K. Prasad, Laxman, Suman, Ayub, Rayudu, Valthaty, Raju, Naidu, Venugopal Rao etc.Other accomplished sports-persons include, Ramana Rao, Malleswari, Gopichand,  Mirza, Nehwal, Kamal, Chetan Anand (Badminton), Mukesh Kumar (Hockey), Najeeb Qureshi, Gutta, Raman Subbarao, Kamineni Eswara Rao, etc. Grandmasters in Chess like, Humpy, Harikrishna, Harika and Gogineni Rohit hail from the state.Education and ResearchFile:Ind school of business.jpg|thumb|250px|School of BusinessAndhra Pradesh is served by more than 20 institutes of higher education. All major arts, humanities, science, engineering, law, medicine, business, and veterinary science are offered, with first degrees and postgraduate awards available. Advanced research is conducted in all major areas.Andhra Pradesh has 1,330 arts, science and commerce colleges; 1,000 MBA and MCA colleges; 847 engineering colleges; 53 medical colleges, and one Institute of Technology (in Hyderabad). The student to teacher ratio in higher education is 19:1. According to the 2001 census, Andhra Pradesh has an overall literacy rate of 61.11% (as per Andhra pradesh Govts official website). The male literacy rate is 70.3% and the female literacy rate is 67.4%.Andhra Pradesh is the home to Osmania University, it is one of the oldest modern universities in India. It is one of the largest university systems in the subcontinent with over 300,000 students on its various campuses and affiliated colleges.(University) The Government of Andhra Pradesh has established Gandhi University of Knowledge Technologies (RGUKT)(http://www.rgukt.inwww.rgukt.in) in 2008 to cater to the educational needs of the gifted rural youth of Andhra Pradesh. The Institute specializes in teaching and research in Information Technology and other emerging disciplines under the control of a common university Governing Council and following a common syllabus.The state has recently made strides in setting up several institutes. Andhra Pradesh is home to the Institute of Technology Hyderabad,() Institute of Fundamental Research Hyderabad,(http://www.univ.tifr.res.in) International Institute of Information Technology, Hyderabad (IIIT-H),() National Institute of Technology NIT Warangal,() the University of Law, for Cellular and Molecular Biology(CCMB)Hyderabad, Institute of Chemical Technology (IICT), Hyderabad, Institute of Technology and Science (Hyderabad Campus), of Hyderabad, of Planning and Architecture, Gandhi University of Knowledge Technologies(Rajiv Gandhi University of Knowledge Technologies IIIT, Nuzvid) and the School of Business (ISB). The National Institute of Fashion Technology (NIFT) and The Institute of Hotel Management, Catering Technology and Applied Nutrition are also located in Hyderabad. Also Institute of Technology,(http://www.gatech.edu/,) is in the process of setting up their campus in Hyderabad.Apart from this Andhra Pradesh was home to many more top class universitys like and Foreign Languages University, Nehru Technological University,() University,() University,() University,() University,() Venkateswara University,() Krishnadevaraya University,() Sreeramulu Telugu University,(http://www.teluguuniversity.ac.in/) N. G. Ranga Agricultural University,() and private engineering colleges like College of Engineering, Bharathi Institute of Technology, MVSR Engineering College to serve their people across Andhra Pradesh.The Government of Andhra Pradesh has established the first University of Health Sciences, fulfilling the recommendations of several committees. The Andhra Pradesh University of Health Sciences was established by Act.No. 6 of the Andhra Pradesh legislature and was inaugurated in 1986 by the late Sri N.T. Rama Rao, then Chief Minister of Andhra Pradesh. After the death of its founder Sri N.T. Rama Rao the University was named after him as University of Health Sciences, Andhra Pradesh.TourismFile:Cave entrance.jpg|thumb|left|150px|CavesFile:Yaganti cave temple in kurnool District of Andhra Pradesh.jpg|thumb|right|150px|Yaganti cave temple in District of Andhra PradeshFile:RishikondaBeachmain.jpg|thumb|left|150px|Rishikonda beachFile:vb125.jpg|thumb|left|150px|Caves (stalagmites and stalactites)Andhra Pradesh is promoted by its tourism department as the Koh-i-Noor of India.Andhra Pradesh is the home of many religious pilgrim centres. Venkateswara Temple in Tirupati, the abode of Hindu god Venkateswara, is most visited religious center of any faith in the world. Srisailam, nestled in the Hills is the abode of Mallikarjuna and is one of twelve Jyothirlingas in India. Amaravatis Shiva temple is one of the Pancharamams, as is Yadagirigutta, the abode of an avatara of Vishnu, Lakshmi Narasimha. The Ramappa temple and Thousand Pillars temple in Warangal are famous for their temple carvings. The state has numerous Buddhist centres at Amaravati, Konda, Bhattiprolu, Ghantasala, Nelakondapalli, Dhulikatta, Bavikonda, Thotlakonda, Shalihundam, Pavuralakonda, Bojjannakonda(Sankaram), Phanigiri and Kolanpaka.() The Empire built number of monuments, including the Srisailam temple and Lepakshi temples.File:Araku-valley.gif|thumb|150px|right|ValleyFile:North View of Bhimili beach.jpg|thumb|right|150px|North View of Bhimili beachThe golden beaches at Visakhapatnam, the one-million-year-old limestone caves at Borra, picturesque Valley, hill resorts of Horsley Hills, river Godavari racing through a narrow gorge at Papi Kondalu, waterfalls at Ettipotala, Kuntala and rich bio-diversity at Talakona are some of the natural attractions of the state. Kailashagiri is a park near the sea in Visakhapatnam. Visakhapatnam is home to other tourist attactions such as the Kursura S20 Submarine museum (the only one of its kind in India), the longest beach road in India, Yarada Beach, Araku Valley, and Indira Gandhi Zoological Gardens.The Caves are located in the Anatagiri Hills of the Eastern Ghats, near Vishakapatnam. They are at an altitude of about 800 to 1300 metres and are famous for million-year-old stalactite and stalagmite formations. They were discovered by British geologist William King George in 1807. The caves get their name from a formation inside the caves that looks like the human brain, which in the local language, Telugu, is known as burra. The Belum caves were formed due to erosion in limestone deposits in the area by the weakly acidic water of the Chitravati River millions of years ago.The Hills are located in Khammam district, near Bhadrachalam. Boat cruises are available on the river Godavari.The Caves in Kurnool District have a length of , making them the second largest natural caves on the Indian subcontinent. The Belum Caves derive their name from Bilum, the Sanskrit word for caves. In Telugu, the caves are known as Belum Guhalu. The caves have long passages, spacious chambers, freshwater galleries, and siphons. The caves deepest point is  from the entrance and is known asPatalganaga.Hills, elevation , is a summer hill resort in Andhra Pradesh, about  from Bangalore and from Tirupati. The town of Madanapalle lies nearby. Major tourist attractions include the Mallamma temple and the Valley School. Horsely Hills is the departure point for the Wildlife Sanctuary at a distance of .Nirmal is famous for its handicrafts and paintings. Kuntala waterfall, at , is the biggest in the state. Charminar, Golconda Fort, Chandragiri Fort, Palace, and Palace are some of the monuments in the state.Durga Temple in Vijayawada in district, Venkateswara Temple in Tirumala, Godavari District, and Surya temple in Arasavelli in District are also places to see in Andhra Pradesh.The Annavaram Satayannarayana Swami temple is in Godavari, near Kakinada.Konaseema is another place in Godavari for nature lovers with scenic greenery of lush paddy fields and coconut groves. All along the banks of river Godavari and its canals.RoadImage:Godavari Bridge.JPG|thumb|150px|left|The railroad bridge between Rajahmundry and KovvurA total of  of roads are maintained by the State, of which State Highways comprise , National Highways , and District Roads . The growth rate for vehicle ownership in Andhra Pradesh is the highest in the country at 16%.()Pradesh State Road Transport Corporation (APSRTC) is the major public transport corporation owned by the government of Andhra Pradesh that connects all the cities and villages. APSRTC is in the Guinness Book of World Records for having the largest fleet of vehicles (approximately 21,000), and the longest distance covered daily. Vijayawada is the 2nd largest Bus-Standing in Asia.() Thousands of private operators also run buses connecting major cities and towns. Private vehicles like cars, motorised scooters, and bicycles occupy a major share of the local transport in the cities and adjoining villages.RailFile:Secbad rly stn.jpg|thumb|120px||The Railway Station, headquarters of the Central RailwayFile:Vizag seaport.jpg|thumb|150px|right|Visakhapatnam seaportRailways are a major means of transport connecting all major cities and towns. The history of railways in Andhra Pradesh dates back to the time of of Hyderabad. This Railway Station is located in the heart of Telangana Region. Most of Andhra Pradesh falls under the auspices of the Central Railway, founded in 1966 with its headquarters at Secunderabad. The Coast Railway serves Srikakulam, Vizianagaram District, and part of Visakhapatnam district including Visakhapatnam City. Vijayawada Railway Station is one of the  busiest railway junctions in India.5th largest Railway station  in South.AirInternational Airport, also known as Rajiv Gandhi International Airport, is the international airport for the city of Hyderabad. It is the largest airport in the state and one of the busiest airports nationwide. Other airports in the state are Airport, Airport, Airport, and Airport. The government also has plans to start airports in eight other cities: Guntur, Ongole, Nellore, Warangal, Kadapa, Tadepalligudem, Kurnool, Karimnagar, Ramagundam and Kothagudem.SeaAndhra Pradesh has two of the major ports of India at Visakhapatnam and Kakinada and three minor ports at Krishnapatnam (Nellore), Machilipatnam, and Nizampatnam (Guntur). A private port is being developed at Gangavaram, near Visakhapatnam. This deep seaport can accommodate ocean liners up to 200,000250,000 DWT.Newspapers and journals* Chronicle* Bhoomi* Sakshi* Suryaa* Vaartha* Jyothy* Prabha* Eenadu* Prajasakti* Islamic Voice - TeluguUrdu language newspapers* Awam* Munsif Daily* Siasat DailyNewspapers from Other States* The Business Line* Economic Times* Hindu* New Indian Express* Times of IndiaSee also* State* Dravidian* of India* of people from Andhra Pradesh* kingdoms of India* Rayalaseema* Telangana* Uttarandhra* games of Andhra PradeshReferencesExternal links* Map of Andhra Pradesh* Official website of the Government of Andhra Pradesh* Andhra Pradesh Government Tourism Department* * Andhra Pradesh Portal at NIC website* AP Directorate of Economics & Statistics* Official website of State Police of Andhra Pradesh* Citizen Reports and Latest News from Andhra Pradesh*http://www.islamicvoice.co.inPradeshPradeshPradebn:Pradeshbe:-be-x-old:-bo:PradeshPradeshcs:ndhrapradPradeshPradeshPradeshPradeshPradesheo:Andra-PradeoPradeshPradeshPradeshPradexPradePradeshPradeshPradeshPradeshka:-PradeshPradeshPradaPradeasPradesml:PradeshPradeshnew:ja:PradeshPradeshpnb:PradeshPradeshPradeshPradeshru:-sa:Pradeshsk:ndhrapradPradeshPradeshPradeshPradeshth:Pradeuk:-PradeshPradeshPradeshzh:
2382
Aalen
Counts of Oettingen who pawned them in to the of Wrttemberg in 1358 or 1359.Aalen () is a city in the German state of Baden-Wrttemberg, about  east of Stuttgart and  (Aalen, Britannica; retrieved May 5, 2011, from Encyclopdia Britannica Online) north of Ulm. It is the seat of the Ostalbkreis district, and its largest city, as well as the largest city within the Ostwrttemberg region. In planning, Aalen is designated a Mittelzentrum (medium-level centre). Since 1 April 1956, Aalen has the status of Kreisstadt (major district town).With an area of 146.63 km2, Aalen is ranking position 7 in Baden-Wrttemberg and position 2 within the Government Region of Stuttgart, after Stuttgart. With a population of about 66,000, Aalen is on position 15 within Baden-Wrttemberg. Geography  Situation Aalen is situated on the upper reaches of the river Kocher, at the foot of the Jura to the south and south-east and close to the hilly landscape of the Berge to the north.In terms of regions, the west of Aalens territory is on the foreland of the eastern Swabian Jura, and the north and north-west is on the Swabian-Franconian Uplands, both being part of the Keuper-Lias Plains. The south-west is part of the Albuch, the east is part of the Hrtsfeld, these two both being parts of the Swabian Jura.(Naturrume Baden-Wrttembergs. Landesanstalt fr Umwelt, Messungen und Naturschutz Baden-Wrttemberg, Stuttgart 2009.)The Kocher enters the citys territory from Oberkochen on the south, crosses the city district of Unterkochen, then the city centre, where the Aal flows into it. The Aal is a small river stretching only on the towns territory. Next, the Kocher crosses the city district of Wasseralfingen, then leaves the city for Httlingen.(Geographical information system of the town of Aalen) Rivers originating near Aalen are the Rems (near Essingen, west of Aalen) and the Jagst (near Unterschneidheim, east of Aalen), both being subsidiaries of the Neckar, just like the Kocher.The elevation in the centre at market square is 430 meters relative to Normalhhennull. The territorys lowest point is at the Lein river near Rodamsdrfle, the highest point is the Grnbergs peak near Unterkochen at 733 m.( Geology Aalens territory ranges over all lithostratigraphic groups of the south-German Jurassic: Aalens south and the Flexner massif are on top of the Weier Jura (White Jurassic), the city center is on the Brauner Jura (Brown Jurassic), and a part of Wasseralfingen is on the Schwarzer Jura (Black Jurassic). Therefore, the city advertises itself as a Geologists Mecca.(Cf. Ulrich Sauerborn: Das Aalenium on urweltmuseum-aalen.de, retrieved 24 April 2010.)(Erlebnis Erdgeschichte in Baden-Wrttemberg, Mekka der Geologen on erdgeschichte.de, retrieved 24 April 2010.)Most part of the territory is on the Opalinuston-Formation (Opalinum Clay Formation) of the Aalenian subdivision, which is named after Aalen. On the Sandberg, the Schnaitberg and the Schradenberg hills, all in the west of Aalen, the Eisensandstein (Iron Sandstone) Formation emerges to surface. On the other hills of the city, sands (Goldshfer Sande), gravel and residual rubble prevail.The historic centre of Aalen and the other areas in the Kocher valley are founded completely on holocenic floodplain loam (Auelehm) and riverbed gravel that have filled in the valley.Most parts of Dewangen and Fachsenfeld are founded on formations of Jurensismergel (Jurensis Marl), Posidonienschiefer (cf. Shale), Amaltheenton (Amalthean Clay), Numismalismergel (Numismalis Marl) and Obtususton (Obtusus Clay, named after Asteroceras obtusum) succeeding from south to north, all belonging to the Jurassic. They are at last succeeded by the Trossingen Formation already belonging to the Triassic.On the Braunenberg hill, until 1939 ore was mined (see Tiefer Stollen section). Extent of the citys territory The maximum extent of the citys territory amounts to  in north-south dimension and  in east-west dimension. The area is 14,662.8 hectares, which includes 42.2 % (6,186.2 hectares) agriculturally used area and 37.7 % (5,534.9 hectares) of forest. 11.5 % (1,692.3 hectares) are built up or vacant, 6.4 % (932.8 hectares) is used by traffic infrastructure. Sporting and recreation grounds and parks comprise 1 % (152.7 hectares), other areas 1.1 % (163.9 hectares).(Statistisches Jahrbuch der Stadt Aalen 2007/2008.) Adjacent towns The following municipalities border on Aalen. They are listed clockwise, beginning south, with their respective linear distances to Aalen city centre given in brackets:Oberkochen (), Essingen (), Heuchlingen (), Abtsgmnd (), Neuler (), Httlingen (), Rainau (), Westhausen (), Lauchheim (), Bopfingen () and Neresheim (), all in the Ostalbkreis district, furthermore an der Brenz () and Knigsbronn (), both in Heidenheim district. Boroughs Aalens territory consists of the city centre (Kernstadt) and the municipalitiesmerged to between 1938 (Unterrombach) and 1975 (Wasseralfingen, see mergings section).The municipalities merged in the course of the latest municipal reform of the 1970s are also called Stadtbezirke (city districts), and are Ortschaften (settlements) in terms of Baden-Wrttembergs Gemeindeordnung (municipal code), which means, each of them has its own council elected by its respective residents (Ortschaftsrat) and is presided by a spokesperson (Ortsvorsteher).The city centre itself and the merged former municipalities consist of numerous villages (Teilorte), mostly separated by open ground from each other and having their own independent and long-standing history. Some however have been created as planned communities, which were given proper names, but no well-defined borders.List of villages:(Teilorte von Aalen, on aalen.de, retrieved 9 July 2010.) Spatial planning Aalen forms a Mittelzentrum (medium-level centre) within the Ostwrttemberg region. Its designated catchment area includes the following municipalities of the central and eastern Ostalbkreis district: Abtsgmnd, Bopfingen, Essingen, Httlingen, am Ries, Lauchheim, Neresheim, Oberkochen, Riesbrg and Westhausen, and is interwoven with the catchment area of Nrdlingen, situated in Bavaria,  east of Aalen. Climate As Aalens territory sprawls on escarpments of the Swabian Jura, on the Albuch and the Hrtsfeld landscapes, and transcends a difference in elevation of 355 metres, the climate varies from district to district.The station the following data originate from is located between the city centre and Wasseralfingen at about  and is operative since 1991.The sunshine duration is about 1800 hours per year, which averages to 4.93 hours per day. So Aalen is above the German average of 1550 hours per year. However, with 167 days of precipitation, Aalens region also ranks above the German average of 138. The annual rainfall is 807 millimetres, which puts Aalen into the moderate middle within Baden-Wrttemberg.(cf. Precipitation map of Baden-Wrttemberg, by Landesamt fr Umwelt, Messungen und Naturschutz.)Mean fluctuations in temperature of up to -11.6 C in January and 32.7 C in July result in an annual mean temperature of 9.9 C. Here Aalen as well ranks above the German average of 8.2 C and the Baden-Wrttemberg average of 8.1 C. History  Civic history  First settlements Tools made of flint and traces of human settlement of the Mesolithic dated between the 8th and 5th millennium BC were found on several sites on the margins of the Kocher and Jagst valleys. On the Schlobaufeld plateau (appr. 650 by 350 metres), situated behind Kocherburg castle near Unterkochen, a hill-top settlement was found, with the core being attributed to the Age. In the Appenwang forest near Wasseralfingen, in Goldshfe and in Ebnat, tumuli of the culture were found. In Aalen and Wasseralfingen, Golden and silver coins left by the Celts were found, who also fortified the Schlobaufeld settlement with sectional embankments and a stone wall. Near Heisenberg (Wasseralfingen), a celtic nemeton is situated.( Roman era Around 150 AD, Aalens territory became part of the Empire, in direct vicinity of the Limes. The Romans erected a castrum to house the cavalry unit Ala II Flavia milliaria; its remains are known today as Kastell Aalen (Aalen roman fort). The site is west of todays city centre at the bottom of the Schillerhhe hill. With about 1,000 horsemen and nearly as many grooms, it was the greatest fort of auxiliaries along the Rhaetian Limes. Civilian settlements were adjacent on the south and the east. Around 260, the Romans gave up the fort as they withdrew their frontier to unoccupied Germania back to the Rhine and Danube rivers, and the Alamanni took over the region.()(Das Aalener Stadtgebiet in der Antike, Stadt Aalen.) Inferred from coins found related to the late 3rd and the 4th century, the civilian settlement continued to exist for the time being. However, a continuous inhabitation between the Roman era and the ages is not detectable.( Foundation of the city Archeologists regard findings of alamannic graves originating from the 7th century as the root of the village of Aalen. In the northern and western walls of St. Johns church, which is located directly adjacent to the eastern gate of the Roman fort, Roman stones were incorporated. The building existing today probably dates to the 9th century.In the Ages, the first time a place today being part of Aalen was mentioned was 839, when emperor the Pious permitted the monastery to exchange estate in the Hammerstadt village, then known as Hamarstat.()Aalen itself was first mentioned in an inventory list of Abbey, dated ca. 1136, as the village Alon, along with a lower nobleman named Conrad of Aalen. This gender probably had its ancestral castle at a site south of todays city centre and were probably first subject to Ellwangen abbey, later to the of Hohenstaufen, and at last to the of Oettingen. 1426 was the last time a member of that house was attested in connection with Aalen.Middle-aged documents indicate that the city of Aalen was founded by the Hohenstaufen between 1241 and 1246, but at a different site than the like-named village, which is supposed destroyed in 1388 in the course of the war between the Alliance of Swabian Cities and the Dukes of Bavaria.Later, the counts of Oettingen were rulers of the city, which is attested for the first time for 1340.They pawned the city to Count Eberhard II and thus to the of Wrttemberg in 1358 or 1359 in exchange for an amount of money.( Imperial city  Designation as Imperial City In the war of the Holy Roman Empire against Wrttemberg, Emperor Charles IV took the city after a siege without a fight. On 3 December 1360, he declared Aalen an Imperial City, a city responsible only to the emperor (often misreferred to as Free City), a title it kept until 1803. In 1377, Aalen joined the Alliance of Swabian Cities. 1385, for the first time the term civitas appeared in the citys seal. 1398, it was granted the right to hold markets, in 1401 a proper jurisdiction. However, Aalen could not acquire a large territory, it consisted only of the city itself and a few villages.The oldest preserved city view was made in 1528. It was made as the basis of a lawsuit of the city versus the Counts of Oettingen at the Reichskammergericht in Speyer. It shows Aalen surrounded by walls, towers and double moats. The situation of the moats, which had an embankment belt between them, is recognizable by todays street names of Nrdlicher, stlicher, Sdlicher and Westlicher Stadtgraben (Northern, Eastern, Southern and Western Moat respectively). The wall was about 6 metres tall, 1518 single paces (990 metres) long and enclosed an area of 5.3 hectares. On its foundation, the city had two gates: The Upper or Ellwangen Gate in the east, and St. Martins gate in the south. Due to frequent floods, St. Martins gate was bricked up in the 14th century and replaced by the Lower or Gmnd Gate built in the west before 1400. Later, several minor side gates were build. The central street market took place on the Wettegasse (today called Marktplatz, market square) and the Reichsstdter Strae. So the market course was, as usual by then, from one gate to the other, however in Aalen it was bent L-like between southern (St. Martins) gate and eastern (Ellwangen) gate.Around 1500, the civic graveyard was relocated from the city church to St. Johns Church.( In 1514, the Vierundzwanziger (Group of 24) was the first assembly constituted by the citizens. Reformation Delegated by Wrttembergs Duke Louis III, on 28 June 1575, nealy 30 years after Luthers death, Andreae, professor and chancellor of the of Tbingen, arrived in Aalen. The sermon he held the following day convinced the mayor, the council and the citizens to adopt the reformation in the city. Andreae stayed in Aalen for four weeks to help with adaptation.( This brought along enormous changes, so the council forbade the Roman Catholic priest to celebrate masses and sermons. However, after victories of the imperial armies at the beginning of the Years War, the Prince-Provostry of Ellwangen, which still held the right of patronage in Aalen, were able to temporarily restitute Catholicism in Aalen.After military successes of the Union, protestant church practices were instituted again. City fire of 1634 In the night of 5 September 1634,(Im Rckspiegel, Geschichts- und Altertumsverein Aalen, retrieved 15 April 2010.) two ensigns of the army of of Saxe-Weimar fighting in the alliance of the Swedes and retreating after the Battle of Nrdlingen set afire two powder carriages, lest ceding the war material to Croatian soldiers already entering the city and to prevent their advance. The result was a city fire. About its extent, differing evaluations exist. According to 17th century accounts, the church and all the citys buildings, except of the Schwrturm tower, were casualties of the fire, and only nine families survived. 19th century research by Hermann Bauer, Lutheran pastor and local historian, evaluated this as not coherent and exaggerated, but it is beyond question that the city church and buildings in a rather large circumcircle around it were destroyed. The fire also destroyed the city archive accommodated in an addition to the church, with all of its documents.( After the fire, soldiers of both armies went through the city looting.(Aalen im dreiigjhrigen Krieg, retrieved 19 April 2010.) It took nearly 100 years for the city to re-approach its population of 2,000.French troops traversed Aalen in 1688 in the course of the Years War, however, unlike at other places, without leaving severe damages. The French pulled through again in 1702 during the of the Spanish Succession and in 1741 during the of the Austrian Succession,( the latter also caused imperial troops to traverse in 1743.(Beschreibung des Oberamts Aalen, Chapter A 7 on Wikisource.)The City Churchs tower collapsed in 1765, presumably because statics was not taken into account well enough at the reconstruction after the city fire of 1634. The collapsing tower struck two children of the tower watchman who died of their injuries, and destroyed the nave, leaving only the altar cross intact. The remaining walls had to be knocked down due to the great damage. Reconstruction began the same year, creating the building still existing today.(On 22 November 1749, in Aalen, being an imperial and thus neutral city, the Aalen protocol was signed by the Duchy of Wrttemberg and the Prince-Provostry of Ellwangen, regulating cohabitation of Lutherans and Roman Catholics in the jointly ruled place of Oberkochen. Napoleonic era In the of the First Coalition, Aalen was severely looted in 1796.( The War of the Second Coalition concluded in 1801 to the of Lunville, which led to the Mediatisation of 1803 that assigned most Imperial Cities to the neighbouring principalities. Aalen was assigned to the electorate of Wrttemberg (later to become the Kingdom of Wrttemberg) and became seat of the District (Oberamt) of Aalen. During the of the Third Coalition, on 6 October 1805, Bonaparte arrived in Aalen, carrying along an army of 40,000. This event, along with Bavarian and Austrian troops moving in some days later, caused miseries that according to the city clerk no feather could describe.(In 1811, the municipality of Unterrombach was formed out of some villages previously belonging to Aalen, some to the Barons of Wllwarth, and the eastern villages were assigned to the municipality of Unterkochen.In the age of the Napoleonic wars, the walls were no longer of use. In the 18th century, the maintenance of walls, gates and towers was neglected more and more, so ever more components of the wall went into a state of disrepair. For thorough repairs, funds were lacking, not at least in the face of the enormous war expenditures. Starting in 1800, most towers were demolished, the other buildings followed soon, so the fortifications today are nearly completely vanished.( Industrial revolution Before the revolution, Aalens economy was shaped by its rural setting. Many citizens were pursuing farming besides their craft. An often pursued craft was tanning; in the mid of the 19th century, there were twelve tanneries in Aalen, an important sales market for them being Ulm. Other focusses of craft were weaving mills, which produced linen and woolen goods, and baking of sweet pastry and gingerbread.(()In Aalen, industrialisation became noticeable only slowly. A first peak were the 1840s, when three factories for nails and some other factories emerged.( It was the link with the railway network, by the opening of the Railway from Cannstatt to Wasseralfingen in 1861, that brought along an industrial rise in Aalen, along with the royal mill (later Schwbische Httenwerke) in Wasseralfingen. The Rems Railways extension to Nrdlingen in 1863, the opening of the Railway in 1864 and of the Jagst Railway in 1866 turned Aalens station into a hub. Furthermore, between 1901 and its shutdown in 1972, the Railway connected Aalen with an der Donau via Neresheim. A maintenance facility, a roundhouse, an administrative office, two track maintenance shops and a freight station with an industrial line shaped the city scape, so that Aalen in that historical context is labelled by todays historians as a railwaymans city.(Eugen Hafner: Aalen. Der Stadtfhrer. P. 5 ff.) In 1866, the Aalen gasworks was opened and lighting was introduced. In 1870, a modern supply system was started and in 1912 the electricity. In 1935 at last, the first electrically powered lights were installed.(To fight housing shortage during and after War I, the city set up the barracks settlement areas at the Schlauch and Alter Turnplatz grounds. In spite of the industry being crippled by the Depression of 1929, the public baths at the Hirschbach creek where modernized, extended and re-opened in 1931.( Nazi era In the federal election of 1932, the Party performed below average in Aalen with 25.8 % of votes compared to 33.1 % on the national level, thus being second to the Centre Party which resulted in 26.6 % (11.9 % nation-wide) and ahead of the Democratic Party of Germany with 19.8 % (20.4 %). However, until the March 1933 federal elections, this setting had changed: The Nazi Party resulted still below German average with 34.1 % (43.9 % nation-wide), but became the by far strongest party in Aalen, followed by the Centre party unaltered at 26.6 % (11.3 %) and the Social Democrats (18.6 %/18.3 %).(During Nazi rule in Germany, in 1936 a military district riding and driving school was deployed in Aalen, as well as an army replenishment office (Heeresverpflegungsamt), a branch arsenal office (Heeresnebenzeugamt) and a branch army ammunitions institute (Heeresnebenmunitionsanstalt).In 1935, mergers of neighbouring towns began. In 1938, the Oberamt was transformed into the Landkreis of Aalen and the municipality of Unterrombach was disbanded. Its territory was mostly added to Aalen, with the exception of Hammerstadt, which was added to the municipality of Dewangen. Forst, Rauental and Vogelsang were added to Essingen (in 1952 the entire former municipality of Unterrombach was merged into Aalen, with the exception of Forst, which is part of Essingen until present).In September 1944, the Wiesendorf concentration camp, a subcamp of Natzweiler-Struthof, was put up. It was designated for between 200 and 300 prisoners who were held to forced labor in industrial businesses nearby. Until the camps dissolution in February 1945, 60 prisoners died.( Between 1946 and 1957, the camp buildings were torn down, its foundations are still in place in house Moltkestrae 44/46. Besides, several labour camps existed where prisoners of war and women and men from countries occupied by Germany were pooled, who had to work for the arms industry in major businesses like Schwbische Httenwerke and the Alfing Keler machine factory.(Aalen was mostly spared of combat activity in War II. It was only in the last weeks of the war that Aalen became target of air warfare, which led to destruction and severe damage of parts of the city, the train station and other railway installations. A series of air attacks lasting for more than three weeks had its peak on 17 April 1945, when States Army Air Forces planes bombed the branch arsenal office and the train station. 59 people were killed, more than half of them buried by debris, and more than 500 lost their homes.( 33 residential buildings, 12 other buildings and 2 bridges were destroyed; 163 buildings, including 2 churches, were damaged.( Five days later, the Nazi rulers of Aalen were unseated by the US forces. Post-war era Upon foundation of the State of Baden-Wrttemberg in 1952, Aalen became part of that state. With the Baden-Wrttemberg territorial reform of 1973, the District of Aalen was merged into the Ostalbkreis district. Aalen became seat of that district. In 1975, the city territory attained its present dimension (see below).The population of Aalen exceeded the limit of 20,000, the requirement for the status of Kreisstadt (major district town) in 1946. On 1 August 1947, Aalen was declared Unmittelbare Kreisstadt (immediate district town), and with the coming into effect of the Gemeindeordnung (municipal code) of Baden-Wrttemberg on 1 April 1956, it was declared Groe Kreisstadt. Religions On 31 December 2008, 51.1 percent of the entire citys inhabitants were members of the Church, 23.9 percent were members of the Evangelical-Lutheran Church. About 25 percent belong to other or no religious community or gave no information.(Religion aalen.de, retrieved 29 June 2010.) The city district of Waldhausen was the district with the highest percentage of Roman Catholic inhabitants 75.6 percent, the central district was the one with the highest percentage of Evangelical-Lutheran inhabitants (25.6 percent) as well as those adhering to other or no religious communities (32.5 percent).( Protestantism Aalens population originally was subject to the patronatus of Ellwangen Abbey, and thus subject to the Catholic Diocese of Augsburg.By the help of the Duke of Wrttemberg, in 1575 the reformation was implemented in Aalen. Subsequently, Aalen had been a predominantly Protestant city for centuries, with the exception of the years from 1628 until 1632 (see reformation section). Being an Imperial City, Aalen could govern its clerical matters on its own. Clerics, organists and choir masters were direct subjects to the city council, which thus exerted bishop-like power; even a proper hymn book for Aalen did exist.( After the transition to Wrttemberg in 1803, Aalen became seat of a deanery, with the dean church being the City Church (with the building of constructed from 1765 to 1767, existing until present). Another utilized church is St. Johns Church, located on the cemetery, refurbished in 1561.As Aalens population grew in the 20th century, more parishes were founded: St. Marks parish with its church building of 1967 and St. Martins parish with its church of 1974. In the borough of Unterrombach, Aalen had implemented the reformation as well, but the community remained a chapel-of-ease of Aalen. A proper church, the Christ Church, was erected in 1912 and a proper parish was established in 1947. In Fachsenfeld, the ruling family of Woellwarth resp. of Leinroden implemented the reformation. A parish church was built in 1591, however an influx of Catholics in the 18th century established a Catholic majority. The other districts of present Aalen remained mostly catholic after the reformation, however Wasseralfingen established a Lutheran parish in 1891 and a church in 1893, St. Magdalenes Church. In Unterkochen, after World War II a parish was established as well and a church was built in 1960. All four parishes belong to the deanery of Aalen within the Church in Wrttemberg. Furthermore, in Aalen there are Old Pietistic communities. Catholicism The few Catholics of todays central district were covered by the parish of Unterkochen until the 19th century, a situation which continued for some years even after completion of St. Marys Church in 1868 constructed by Morlok.( However, in 1872 Aalen got its proper parish again, and in 1913, a second Catholic church was completed, Salvators Church, and in 1969 the Holy Cross Church. In 1963, a second parish had already been set up, which in 1972 got a new Church, the new St. Marys Church, which has been erected in place of the old St. Marys church, which had been torn down in 1968. Another church of the second parish was St. Augustines Church, completed in 1970. In 1976 and 1988 at last, St. Elizabeths Church resp. St. Thomas Church were completed. Furthermore, in 1963 the St. Michael pastoral care office is existing since 1963.Hofherrnweiler is also having its own Catholic church, St. Bonifaces, since 1904. The villages of Dewangen, Ebnat, Hofen, Waldhausen and Wasseralfingen had remained Catholic after reformation, so old parishes and churches persist there. The Assumption of Mary Church in Dewangen has an early Gothic tower and a new-build nave of 1875. Todays building of the Marys Immaculate Conception Church in Ebnat was constructed in 1723, but the church was first mentioned in 1298.Hofens Georges Church is a church, whose present nave was built from 1762 to 1775.(Die Geschichte der St. Georgskirche mit Bildern..., Kirchengemeinde Hofen, retrieved 11 April 2011)Beside the church, the Late Gothic St. Odiles Chapel is standing, whose entrance has the year 1462 engraved. Foundations of predecessor buildings were dated to the 11th and 13th century.(Ottilienkapelle, Kirchengemeinde Hofen, retrieved 11 April 2011)St. Marys Church of Unterkochen was first mentioned in 1248, and for long time served the Catholics of Aalen. Waldhausens parish church of St. Nicholas was built from 1699 until 1716. Wasseralfingen at first was a chapel-of-ease of Hofen, but had a chapel, St. Stephen, which was built presumably in 1353 and extended in 1832. In 1834, a proper parish was established, which built a new St. Stephens Church in Revival architecture between 1881 and 1883, which has remained the parishs landmark until present. Fachsenfeld got its own church as well, Heart of 1895. All Catholic parishes within Aalen are today incorporated into four pastoral care units within the Ostalb Deanery of the Diocese of Rottenburg-Stuttgart, but these some of these units also comprise some parishes outside of Aalen. Pastoral Care Unit two comprises the parishes of Essingen, Dewangen and Fachsenfeld, unit four comprises Hofen and Wasseralfingen, unit five comprises both parishes of Aalens centre and Hofherrnweiler, unit five comprises Waldhausen, Ebnat, Oberkochen and Unterkochen. Other christian communities Besides the two major christian denominations, in Aalen there are also churches and other communities, including the Methodist Church, the Baptists, the Adventist Church and the Apostolic Church. Other religions Until the late 19th century, no Jews are testified in Aalen. It was not before 1886 that four Jews were living in Aalen, a number that rose to ten in 1900, fell to seven in 1905, and remained so until 1925. Upon the Nazis rise to power in 1933, seven Jews, including two children, lived in Aalen.( During the Kristallnacht in 1938, the vitrines of the three Jewish shops in the city were smashed and their proprietors imprisoned for several weeks. After their release, most Aalen Jews emigrated. The last Jew of Aalen, Fanny Kahn, was forcibly resettled to am Ipf, which had a large Jewish community. Today, a street of Aalen is named after her. The Jew Max Pfeffer returned from Brussels to Aalen in 1948 to continue his shop, but emigrated to Italy in 1967.(In Aalen, there is an Islamic Ditib community, which maintains the D.I.T.I.B. Mosque of Aalen (Central Mosque) located at Ulmer Strae.( The mosques construction started on 30 August 2008. The Gr organisation maintains the Fatih Mosque, as well at Ulmer Strae.( Mergings Todays city of Aalen was formed on 21 June 1975 by unification of the cities of Aalen and Wasseralfingen, with the initial name of Aalen-Wasseralfingen, with a territory one third larger than Aalens prior territory.( Already on 1 July 1975, it was renamed to Aalen. Before, the former city of Aalen had already merged the following municipalities:* 1938: Unterrombach* 1 January 1970: Waldhausen* 1 July 1972: Ebnat* 1 January 1973: Dewangen, Fachsenfeld (including the village of Hangendenbach, which was transferred from Abtsgmnd in 1954) and Unterkochen. The merging of Dewangen nearly doubled the territory of Aalen. Populations progression and structure During the Ages and the modern period, Aalen was just a small city with a few hundred inhabitants. The population grew slowly and doubled back over and again due to numerous wars, famines and epidemics. It was the beginning of the industrialisationin the 19th century that accelerated growth. While in 1803, only 1,932 inhabited the city, in 1905 it were already 10,442. The number continued to rise and amounted to 15.890 in 1939.The influx of refugees and ethnic Germans from Germanys former eastern territories after War II pushed up the citys population to 31,814 in 1961. The merger with Wasseralfingen on 21 June 1975 added 14.597 persons and resulted in 65.165 inhabitants. On 30 June 2005, the population figure determined officially by the Statistical Office of Baden-Wrttembergby updating and by matching with other statistical offices amounted to an unprecedented 67,125 (accounting only main domiciles).The following overview shows the population figures of the city territory of the respective year. Until 1823, the figures are mostly estimates, thereafter census results or official updates by the state statistical office. Until 1871, the figures were determined by non-uniform elicitation methods, since 1871 they refer to the population present at the place, since 1925 to the resident population and since 1987 to the population at the place of main domicile.{|| valigntop || valigntop || valigntop ||} Census resultOn 31 December 2008, Aalen had precisely 66,058 inhabitants, of them 33,579 female and 32,479 male. The average age of Aalens inhabitants rose from 40.5 years on 31 December 2000 by 1.9 years to 42.4 on 31 December 2008.( Within city limits, 6,312 persons of a nationality other than German were living, which is a share of 9.56 percent. Of them, the largest fraction comprises Turkish citizens (38 percent of all foreigners), the second largest fraction comprises Italians (13 percent), followed by Croatians (6 percent) and Serbs (5 percent). The remaining 35 percent have another nationality.(The number of married inhabitants fell from 32,948 on 31 December 1996 to 31.357 on 31 December 2007, while the number of divorced rose in the same period from 2,625 to 3.859. The number of unwed inhabitants slightly increased between 1996 and 2004 from 25,902 to 26,268 an, and until 2007 fell again to 26,147. The number of widowed fell from  5.036 on 31 December 1996 to 4,783 on 31 December 2007.(File:Durchschnittsalter Aalen.png|Average age of Aalens inhabitantsFile:Familienstand Aalen.png|Ratio of married inhabitants contrasted to unmarried Politics Aalen has arranged a association with Essingenand Httlingen. City council Since the election of 7 June 2009, the city council consists of 54 representatives having a five years term of office. The seats are distributed as follows on parties and groups (changes refer to the second last election of 2004): Mayors Since 1374, the mayor and the council form the head of the city. In the 16th century, the city had two, later three mayors. In 1552, the council had 13 members. Later, the head of administration was reorganised several times. In the Wrttemberg era, initially the mayors title was called Brgermeister, from 1819 it was Schulthei, and since 1947 it is Oberbrgermeister. The mayor is elected for a term of eight years. He is chairman and member of the city council and has the right to vote there. He has one deputy with the official title of Erster Brgermeister (first mayor) and one with the official title of Brgermeister (mayor).Heads of city in Aalen since 1802* 1802: Theodor Betzler* 18121819: Ludwig Hlder* 18191829: Theodor Betzler* 1829: Palm* 18291848: Philipp Ehmann* 18481873: Gustav Oesterlein* 18731900: Julius Bausch* 19001902: Paul Maier* 19031934: Friedrich Schwarz* 19351945: Schbel* 19451950: Balluff* 19501975: Karl Schbel* 19762005: Pfeifle (SPD)* 2005: Gerlach (independent) Coat of arms and flag Aalens of arms depicts a black eagle with a red tongue on golden background, having a red shield on his breast with a silver bent eel on it. Eagle and eel were first testified as Aalens heraldic aminals in the city seal of 1385, with the eagle representing the citys immediacy.( After the territorial reform, it was newly bestowed by the Administrative District of Stuttgart on 16 November 1976.The coat of arms blazon reads: In gold, the black imperial eagle, with a red breast shield applied to it, therein a bent silver eel (In Gold der schwarze Reichsadler, belegt mit einem roten Brustschild, darin ein gekrmmter silberner Aal).Aalens flag is striped in red and white and contains the coat of arms.The origin of the citys name is uncertain. Merian (15931650) assumed the name to stem from the citys situation at the Kocher river, where frequently eels are caught, while Aal is German for eel. Other explanations point to Aalen as the garrison of an ala during the Roman empire, respectively to an abridgement of the Roman name  Aquileia as a potential name of the Roman fort, a name that nearby an der Brenz bore as well. Another interpretation points to a Celtic word including the meaning water.( Twinned cities The Twin Cities Society of Aalen (Stdtepartnerschaftsverein Aalen e. V.) promotes friendly relations between Aalen and its twin cities,(Stdtepartnerschaftsverein Aalen e. V. on aalen.de, retrieved 9 July 2010) which comprises mutual exchanges of sports and cultural clubs, schools and other civic institutions. On the occasion of the Reichsstdter Tage, from 11 until 13 September 2009 the first conference of twinned cities was held.Aalen has five twin cities:* Saint-L (France), since 1978* Christchurch (United Kingdom), since 1981* Tatabnya (Hungary), since 1987* Antakya (Turkey), since 1995. This twinning arrangement was initiated by Ismail Demirtas, who emigrated in 1962 from Turkey to Aalen and was social adviser for foreign employees.(Wir sind einfach in den Zug gestiegen, Federal Government, retrieved 6 May 2011)* Cervia (Italy), since 2011 Godparenthood On the occasion of the 1980 Reichsstdter Tage, Aalen took over godparenthood for the more than 3000 ethnic Germans displaced from the Wischau lingustic enclave, 972 of them settled to Aalen in 1946. The Wischau Linguistic Enclave Society (Gemeinschaft Wischauer Sprachinsel) regularly organises commemorative meetings in Aalen. Their traditional costumes are stored in the Old Town Hall. Municipal finances According to the 2007 municipal poll by the Baden-Wrttemberg chapter of the Taxpayers Federation, municipal tax revenues totalling to 54.755 million Euros (2006) resp. 62.148 million Euros (2007) face the following debts:(Der Steuerzahler, September 2007.)* 2006 total: 109.9 million Euros debts (64.639 millions of the finance department and 48.508 millions of the city-operated enterprises and fund assets)* 2007 total: 114.5 million Euros debts (69.448 millions of the finance department and 45.052 millions of the city-operated enterprises and fund assets) Culture and sights  Theatre The city operates the Theatre of the City of Aalen (Theater der Stadt Aalen). Having been founded in 1991 and featuring six salaried actors, it is the newest as well as the smallest civic theatre in Germany.(Theater der Stadt Aalen on aalen.de, retrieved 29 June 2010.) Besides regular plays, it also offers four theatre clubs for all age levels. During the season of 2008/2009, 400 performances of ten productions attracted more than 21,000 visitors. The theatres director is Katharina Kreuzhage. Schubart Literary Award Tributing to Friedrich Daniel Schubart, who spent his childhood and youth in Aalen, the city endowed the Schubart Literary Award (Schubart-Literaturpreis) in 1955, which is one of the earliest literary awards in Baden-Wrttemberg. It is awarded biennially to German-language writers, whose work accord with Schubarts liberal and enlightening reasoning(Schubart-Literaturpreis der Stadt Aalen.) and is remunerated with 12,000 Euros. Music Since 1958, the School of the City of Aalen exists, where today about 1,500 students are taught by 27 music instructors in 30 subjects. Since 2009, the school is being directed by Ralf Eisler.(Musikschule der Stadt Aalen on aalen.de, retrieved 20 June 2010.)In 1977, a orchestra was founded in Aalen, which today is called Aalener Sinfonieorchester, and consists mostly of instructors and students of the music school. It performs three public concerts annually: The New Years Concert in January, the Symphony Concert in July and a Christmas Concert in December.(Aalener Sinfonieorchester e. V. on aalen.de, retrieved 20 June 2010.)Beyond that, music festivals regularly take place in Aalen, like the Aalen Jazz Festival (see below).The Aalen volunteer fire department since 1952 has a band whose roots date back to 1883. In 1959, the band received its first glockenspiel from TV host Frankenfeld on the occasion of a TV appearance.(Spielmannszug on feuerwehr-aalen.de, retrieved 3 December 2010) Museums and memorial sites  Museums In the central district of Aalen, there are two museums: The Aalen Limes Museum (Limesmuseum Aalen) is located at the place of the largest Roman cavalry fort north of the Alps until about 1.800 years ago. The museum exposes numerous objects from the time of Roman occupation. The ruin of the cavalry fort located beside the museum is open to the museum visitors. Every other year, a Roman festival is held on the museum area (see below).In the Geological-Paleontological Museum located in the historic town hall, more than 1500 fossils from the Swabian Jura, including ammonites, ichthyosaurs and corals, are displayed.In the Waldhausen district the Heimatstble museum of local history has an exhibition on agriculture and rural living.In the Wasseralfingen district, there are two more museums: The Museum Wasseralfingen comprises a local history exhibition and an art gallery including works of Plock, Schuster and Kder. Besides, the stoveplate collection of the Schwbische Httenwerke steel mill is exhibited, with artists, modellers and the production sequence of a cast plate from design to final product being presented.The House of Civic History (Haus der Stadtgeschichte) opened in March 2008 and closed in 2010 featured alternating exhibitions on Aalens history. It was accommodated in the Rennaissance-Revivalstyle former mortuary of St. Johns cemetery. Memorial sites A memorial stone at the Schillerlinde tree above Wasseralfingens ore pit reminds of four prisoners of the subcamp of Natzweiler-Struthof concentration camp killed there. Also in Wasseralfingen, on the cemetery a memorial with the Polish inscription To the victims of Hitlerism reminds of the deceased forced labourers buried in a Polish respective a Soviet section.(In 1954, on the Schillerhhe hill the city erected a bell tower as a memorial to Aalens victims of both world wars and to the displacement of ethnic Germans. The tower was planned by Leo, the bell was endowed by Carl Schneider. The tower is open on request. Every evening at 18:45 (before 2003: at 19:45), the memorials bell rings.(Announcement of the City of Aalen of 4 March 2004.) Buildings  Churches The city centre is dominated by the Evangelical-Lutheran St. Nicholas Church in the heart of the pedestrian area. The church, in its present shape being built between 1765 and 1767, is the only major Baroque building in Aalen and is the main church of the Evangelical-Lutheran parish of Aalen.St. Johns Church is located inside of St. Johns cemetery in the western centre. The building presumably is from the 9th century and thus is one of Wrttembergs oldest existing churches. The interior features frescos from the early 13th century.For other churches in Aalen, see the Religions section. Historic Town Hall with Spy The Historic Town Hall was originally built in the 14th century. After the city fire of 1634, it was re-erected in 1636 and after. For this building, the city bought a clock in Lauterburg,( and the Imperial City of Nuremberg donated a Carillon. It features a figurine of the Spy of Aalen and other figurines, however the latter ones were lost by a fire in 1884. Since then, the Spy resides inside the reconstructed tower and has become a symbol of the city. The building was used as the citys town hall until 1907. Since 1977, the Geological-Paleontological Museum resides in the Historic Town Hall.(According to legend, the citizens of Aalen owe the Spy of Aalen (Spion von Aalen)  their city having been spared from destruction by the emperors army:The Imperial City of Aalen once was were in quarrel with the emperor, and his army was shortly before the gates to take the city. The people of Aalen got scared and thus dispatched their most cunning one out into the enemys camp to spy out the strength of their troops. Without any digression, he went straight into the middle of the enemy camp, which inescapably led to him being seized and presented to the emperor. When the emperor asked him what he had lost here, he answered in German: Dont frighten, high lords, I just want to peek how many cannons and other war things youve got, since I am the spy of Aalen. The emperor laughed upon such a blatancy and acted navety, steered him all through the camp and then sent him back home. Soon the emperor withdrew with his army as he thought a city such wise guys reside in deserved being spared.(Oral tradition according to Ernst Heinrich Meier: Deutsche Sagen, Sitten und Gebruche aus Schwaben, Stuttgart 1852, p. 368, and Der Spion von Aalen in Wikisource) Old Town Hall The Old Town Hall was first documented in 1575. Its outside wall features the oldest known coat of arms, which is of 1664. Until 1851, the building also housed the Krone-Post hotel, which coincided with being a station of the Thurn und Taxis postal company. It has housed notable persons. Thus the so-called Napoleon Window reminds with its N painted on of the stay of French emperor Bonaparte in 1805. According to legend, he rammed his head to bleed on this window, when he was startled by the noise of his soldiers ridiculing the Spy of Aalen.( The building was used as Aalens town hall from 1907 until 1975. Today it houses a cabaret caf and the stage of the Theatre of the City of Aalen. The Wischau Linguistic Enclave Society the city has taken over godparenthood for stores their traditional constumes in the building. Brgerspital The Brgerspital (Civic Asylum) is a timber-frame house erected on Spritzenhausplatz (Fire Engine House Square) in 1702. Until 1873, it was used as civic hospital, later as a retirement home. After comprehensive renovation, since 1980 it is a senior citizens community centre.( Limes-Thermen On a slope of the Langert mountain south of the City, the Limes-Thermen (Limes Thermae) springs are located. They were built in ancient Roman style and opend in 1985. The accredited health spa is supplied with water about  warm stemming from about  underneath. Market square The market square is the historic hub of Aalen and runs along about  from the town hall in the south to the Historic Town Hall and the Old Town Hall in the north, where it disembogues into Radgasse alley. Since 1809, it is site of the weekly market on Wednesday and Saturday. About  in front of the Reichsstdter Brunnen fountain at the town hall, the coats of arms of Aalen, its twinned cities and of the Wischau linguistic enclave are paved into the street as mosaic. Market fountain Aalen.jpg|thumb|Statue depicting Joseph I at the market fountainIn 1705, for the water supply of Aalen a well casing was erected at the northern point of the market square, in front of the Historic Town Hall. It was a present of duke Eberhard Louis. The fountain bore a statue of emperor Joseph I., who was enthroned in 1705 and in 1707 renewed Aalens Imperial City privileges.( The fountain was supplied by a wooden pipe. Excessive water was dissipated through ditches branched from Kocher river. When in the early 1870s Aalens water network was constructed, the fountain was replaced by a smaller fountain about  off. In 1975, the old market fountain was re-erected in baroque style. It bears a replica of the emperors statue, with the original being exhibited in the new town halls lobby. The iron casing plates depict the 1718 coat of arms of the Duchy of Wrttemberg and the coats of arms of Aalen and of the merged municipalities. Reichsstdter Brunnen The Reichsstdter Brunnen fountain (Imperial Civic Fountain) is located in front of the town hall at the southern point of the market square. It was created by sculptor Nuss in 1977 to remind of the times of Aalen being an Imperial City (13601803). On its circulatory frieze, bronze figurines illustrate the citys history.( Radgasse The Radgasse (Wheel Alley) features Aalens oldest faade. Originally a small pond was on its side. The buildings were erected between 1659 and 1662 for peasants with citizenry privileges and renovated in the mid-1980s. The name giver for the alley was the Wheel tavern, which was to be found at the site of todays address Radgasse 15.( Tiefer Stollen The former iron ore pit Wilhelm at Braunenberg hill was converted into the Tiefer Stollen tourist mine in order to remind of the old-day miners efforts and to maintain it as a memorial of early industrialisation in the Aalen area. It has a mining museum open for visitors. A railway takes visitors deep into the mountain. The City of Aalen, a sponsorship association and many citizens volunteered several thousand hours of labour to put the mine into a state of being visited. As far as possible, things were left in the original state. In 1989, a sanitary gallery was established where respiratory diseases are treated within rest cures. Thus the Aalen village of Rthard, where the gallery is located, was awarded the title of Place with sanitary gallery service in 2004.(OB Pfeifle zum Jahreswechsel 2004/2005.) Observatory The Aalen Observatory was built in 1969 as school observatory for the Schubart Gymnasium. In 2001, it was converted to a public observatory. Since then, it is managed by the Astronomische Arbeitsgemeinschaft Aalen (Aalen Astronomical Society). It is located on Schillerhhe hill and features two telescopes. They were manufactured by Zeiss AG which has its headquarters in nearby Oberkochen and operates a manufacturing works in Aalen (see below). In the observatory, guided tours and lectures are held regularly. Windpark Waldhausen The Windpark Waldhausen farm began operating in early 2007. It consists of seven REpower MM92 wind turbines with a capacity of 2 MW each.() The hub height of each wind turbine is , with a rotor diameter of . Aalbumle observation tower On Langert mountain, the  tall Aalbumle observation tower is standing. This popular hiking destination was built in 1898 and given its present shape in 1992. It features a good view over Aalen and the Welland region, until the Rosenstein mountain and Ellwangen. Beneath the tower, an adventure playground and a cabin is located. A flag on the tower signals whether the cabins restaurant is open. Natural monuments The Baden-Wrttemberg State Institute for Environment, Measurements and Natural Conservation has demarcated six protected landscapes in Aalen (the Swabian Jura escarpment between Lautern and Aalen with adjacent territories, the Swabian Jura escarpment between Unterkochen and Baiershofen, the Hilllands around Hofen, the Kugeltal and Ebnater Tal valleys with parts of Heiligental valley and adjacent territories, Laubachtal valley and Lower Lein Valley with side valleys), two sanctuary forests (Glashtte and Kocher Origin), 65 extensive monuments, 30 individual natural monuments and the following two areas:(Directory of protected areas of  Baden-Wrttemberg State Institute for Environment, Measurements and Natural Conservation (LUBW).)The  large Dellenhule protected area between Aalens Waldhausen district and Neresheims Elchingen district, demarcated in 1969, is a sheep pasture with juniper and pasture of old willow oaks.(Protected areas profile at LUBW)The  large Goldshfer Sande protected area was demarcated in 2000 and is situated between Aalens Hofen district and Httlingen. The sands on a hill stemming from the Pleistocene are of geological importance, and the various grove structures offer habitat to severely endangered bird species.(Protected areas profile at LUBW) Sports The soccer team of 1921-founded Aalen is playing in the 3rd German League as of season 2010/2011. Its playing venue is the Scholz-Arena situated in the west of the city, which bore the name Stdtisches Waldstadion Aalen (Civic Forest Stadium of Aalen) until 2008. From 1939 until 1945, the VfR played in the Wrttemberg, then one of several parallel top-ranking soccer leagues of Germany.In the Wrestling Federal League, the Aalen is fighting. It was German champion in team wrestling in 2010, and its predecessor, the KSV Germania Aalen disbanded in 2005, was German champion for eight times and runner-up for five times since 1976. Another Aalen club, the Dewangen, was until 2009 as well wrestling in the Federal League.Two American sports, Football and Baseball, are pursued by the MTV Aalen. Volleyball as well is playing an important role in Aalen for years. The first mens team of DJK Aalen accomplished re-promotion for regional league in the season of 2008/09.South of the city centre, at the northern slope of the Swabian Jura, the Ostalb ski lifts are located. The skiing area comprises two lifts that have a vertical rise of  resp. , two runs of a length of  resp.  and a beginners run.(Ostalb-Skilifte Aalen, City of Aalen, retrieved 3 December 2010) Regular events  Reichsstdter Tage Since 1975, Reichsstdter Tage (Imperial City days) festival is held annually in the city centre on the second weekend in September. It is deemed the largest city festival of the Ostwrttemberg region,(Aalen feiert, Zeitung, Artikel vom 6. September 2007, abgerufen 11. Juli 2011) and is connected with a shopping Sunday in accordance with the Ladenschlussgesetz code. The festival is also attended by delegations from the twinned cities. On the town hall square, on Sunday an ecumenical serviceis held. Roman Festival The international Roman Festival (Rmertage) are held biannially on the site of the former roman fort and the modern Limes museum. The festivals ninth conduct in 2008 was attended by around 11,000 people.(Bilder der IX. Internationalen Rmertage 2008 on aalen.de, retrieved on 9 May 2010.) Aalen Jazz Festival Annually in the second week of November, the Jazz Festival brings known and unknown artists to Aalen. It already featured musicians like Davis, B. King, Charles, David Murray, Tyner, Jarreau, Svensson and Mangelsdorff. The festival is complemented by individual concerts in spring and summer, and, including the individual concerts, comprises around 25 concerts with a total of about 13,000 visitors. Economy and infrastructure In 2008, 30,008 employees liable to insurance were living in Aalen. With 13,946 (46.5 percent), most of them were employed in the manufacturing sector. In commerce, catering, hotels and transport, 4,715 persons (15,7 percent) were employed, in other services, 11,306 persons (37,7 percent).(Beschftigte, aalen.de, retrieved 5 June 2010) Besides, in 2008 there were about 16,000 employees commuting into the city and about 9,000 commuting out.(Berufspendler, aalen.de, retrieved 5 June 2010)Altogether, in Aalen there are about 4,700 business enterprises in Aalen, 1,1000 of them being registered in the trade register. The others comprise 2,865 small enterprises and 701 craft enterprises.(Unternehmen und Betriebe, aalen.de, retrieved 5 June 2010.)In Aalen, metalworking is the predominant branch. Besides machine-building, the branches of optics, paper, technologyand textiles are relevant.Notable enterprises include SHW Automotive (originating from the former Schwbische Httenwerke steel mills and further from a mill of 1671 in Wasseralfingen), the Alfing Kessler engineering works, the precision tools manufacturer MAPAL Dr. Kress, the snow chain manufacturer RUD Ketten Rieger & Dietz and its subsidiary Erlau, the Gesenkschmiede Schneider forging die smithery, the SDZ Druck und Medien media company, the Papierfabrik Palm paper mill, the alarm system manufacturer Telenot, the laser show provider LOBO electronic and the textile finisher Lindenfarb, which all have their seat in Aalen. A branch in Aalen is maintained by optical systems manufacturer Carl Zeissheadquartered in nearby Oberkochen.(Transport Rail station is a regional railway hub on the Railway from Stuttgart, the Railway from Ulm, the Jagst Railway to Crailsheim and the Railway to Donauwrth. Until 1972, the Railway connected Aalen with an der Donau via Neresheim. More stations within city limits are Hofen (b Aalen), Unterkochen, Wasseralfingen and station. The Aalen-Erlau stop situated in the south is no longer operative.Aalen station is served in two-hour intervals trains of Intercity line 61 KarlsruheStuttgartAalenNuremberg. In regional traffic, Aalen is served by various lines of Interregio-Express, Regional-Express and Regionalbahn categories. The city also operates the Aalen Industrial Railway (Industriebahn Aalen), which carries about 250 carloads per year.(2002 Annual Report, Edited by the City of Aalen, Hauptamt.) Street The junctions of Aalen/Westhausen and Aalen/Oberkochen connect Aalen with the Autobahn A7 (WrzburgFssen). Federal roads (Bundesstraen) connecting with Aalen are B 19 (WrzburgUlm), B 29 (WaiblingenNrdlingen) and B 290 (TauberbischofsheimWesthausen). The Dichterstrae (Swabian Poets Route) tourist route established in 1977/78 leads through Aalen.Within city limits, several bus lines operate. The Omnibus-Verkehr Aalen company is one of the few in Germany that use buses, it does so since 1966.(Historie on the website of OVA-Omnibus-Verkehr Aalen.) A district-wide fare system, OstalbMobil, is in effect since 2007. Air transport Stuttgart Airport, offering international connections, is about  away, the travel time by train is about 100 Minutes. At Airport, located  south-east of Aalen, minor aircraft are admitted. Gliding airfields nearby are in Heubach and Bartholom. Bicycle Bicycle routes stretching through Aalen are the Deutscher Limes-Radweg (German Limes Bicycle Route) and the Kocher-Jagst Bicycle Route. Public facilities Aalen houses an Amtsgericht (local district court), chambers of the Stuttgart Labour Court, a notarys office, a tax office and an agency. It is seat of the Ostalbkreis district office, of the Aalen Deanery of the Evangelical-Lutheran Church and of the Ostalb deanery of the Catholic Diocese of Rottenburg-Stuttgart.The Stuttgart Administrative Court, the Stuttgart Labour Court and the Ulm Social Welfare Court are in charge for Aalen.Aalen had a civic hospital, which resided in the Brgerspital building until 1873, then in a building at Alte Heidenheimer Strae. In 1942, the hospital was taken over by the district. The district hospital at the present site of Klblesrain, today known as Ostalb-Klinikum, was opened in 1955.( Media The first local newspaper, Der Bote von Aalen (The Herald of Aalen), was published on Wednesdays and Saturdays since 1837.(Currently, local newspapers published in Aalen are the Schwbische Post, which obtain their supra-regional pages from the Ulm Sdwestpresse, and the Aalener Nachrichten (erstwhile Aalener Volkszeitung), a local edition of Zeitung in im Allgu.Two of Germanys biggest Lesezirkels (magazine rental services) are headquartered in Aalen: Brabandt LZ Plus Media and Lesezirkel Portal.Regional event magazines are Xaver, la, lakultur.The commercial broadcasters Radio Ton and Radio 7 have studios in Aalen. Education A school was first mentioned in Aalen in 1447; it was rearranged in 1616 and later in various buildings that were all situated near the city church, and persisted up into the 19th century. In the course of the reformation, a German school was established in parallel, being a predecessor of the latter Volksschule school type. In 1860, the Ritterschule was built as a Volksschule for girls; the building today houses the Pestalozzischule. In 1866, a new building was erected for the Latin school and for the Realschuleestablished in 1840. This building, later known as the Alte Gewerbeschule, was torn down in 1975 to free the area for the new town hall. In 1912, the Parkschule building was opened. It was designed by Bonatz and today houses the Schubart-GymnasiumThe biggest educational institution in the city is the Hochschule Aalen, which was founded in 1962 and focusses on engineering and economics. It is attended by 5000 students of five faculties and employs 129 professors and 130 other lecturers. The city provides three Gymnasiums, four Realschulen, two Frderschulen (schools), six combined Grundschulen and Hauptschulen and eight standalone Grundschulen. The Ostalbkreis district provides three vocational schools and three additional special schools. Finally, six non-state schools of various types exist.The German EsperantoLibrary (German: Deutsche Esperanto-Bibliothek, Esperanto: Germana Esperanto-Biblioteko) is located in the building of the city library since 1989. TV and radio transmission tower The Sdwestrundfunk broadcasting company operates the Aalen transmission toweron the Braunenberg hill. The tower was erected in 1956, it is  tall and made of concrete. Things named after Aalen The following vehicles are named Aalen:* The Lufthansa 737-500 D-ABJF* The Bahn 3 Tz309 (since 2 June 2008)(Presseamt der Stadt Aalen.)File:Lufthansa.b737-500.d-abjf.arp.jpg|Boeing 737-500 AalenFile:ICE Aalen.jpg|ICE Aalen at Aalen station Persons connected to Aalen  Honorary citizens * Ruland Aylinger, Composer* Rommel (18911944), Field Marshal of World War II, grew up in Aalen* Paul Edel(Treff der Eisenbarths, Ellwanger Zeitung, 15 May 2008 (online).)* Wilhelm Jakob Schweiker (18591927), founder of the Aalen Historical Society (Geschichts- und Altertumsverein Aalen) and name giver of the Wilhelm Jakob Schweiker Award(Richtlinie zur Vergabe des Wilhelm-Jakob-Schweiker-Preises, Geschichts- und Altertumsverein Aalen, retrieved 24 May 2010.)* Pfeifle, Mayor of Aalen from 1976 until 2005 Persons born in Aalen * Joseph von Hefele (18091893), Roman Catholic theologian, clerical historian and bishop* Wahl (18921981), Nazi Gauleiter of Swabia* Heck (19171989), Politician of the CDU, former minister of the federal government and CDU secretary general* Walter Adams (born 1945 in Wasseralfingen), middle distance runner* Sobek (born 1953), architect and structural engineer* Ilg (born 1957), steeplechaser and world champion (1983)* Gerlach (born 1965), independent politician, mayor of Aalen (since 2005)* Thomas Zander (born 1967), wrestler, winner of Olympic silver medal and world champion (1994)* Steeb (born 1967), tennis player* Fischer (born 1989), footballer* Funk (born 1990), footballer Other * Friedrich Daniel Schubart (17391791), poet, organ player, composer and journalist; lived in Aalen as a child and adolescent* Duala Manga Bell (18731914), Duala king and resistance leader in the German colony of Kamerun, lived in Aalen from 1891 until 1896.* Elser (19031945), opponent of Nazism, worked in 1923 as an apprentice carpenter in Aalen.* Bickelhaupt (* 1939), football coach, lives in Aalen since 2004.* Thiele (* 1953 in Heidenheim), physicist and former astronaut, attended school in Aalen.* Andreas Beck (* 1987 in Kemerovo/Soviet Union), German footballer, grew up in Aalen. Literature * *  External links * City of Aalens websiteReferencesrefs()()()()()(Statistisches Jahrbuch 2007/2008, Stadt Aalen (PDF, 2.1 MB).)()()()()()()()(Aalen  Citybummel, on: aalen.de, retrieved 12 July 2010.)als:Aalenroa-rup:Aalenbg:ca:Aalencs:Aalenda:Aalende:Aalenet:Aalenel:es:Aaleneo:Aalen()fr:Aalenga:Aalen( )hr:Aalenid:Aalenit:Aalenpam:Aalensw:Aalenla:Alalv:lene(BV)lmo:Aalenhu:Aalennl:Aalen()no:Aalennn:Aalenpnb:(Niemcy)pt:Aalenro:Aalen(-)simple:Aalensl:Aalen()sh:Aalenfi:Aalensv:Aalentr:Aalen()vo:Aalenwar:Aalen(-)
